Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing tliis resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for in forming people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http: //books .google .com/I 




L);.I..=.J by Google 



^l«^?^ 



Aa.. £ /S4- 



,i'..i by Google ^^' 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



SIGHT'S OF MAN: 



ANSWER TO Mr. BURKE's ATTACK 



FRENCH REFOLUTION. 



^FSICS THREE SHILLIHGS.] 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



RIGHTS OF MAN: 



BEINO AH 



ANSWER TO Mr. BURKE*s ATTACK 



FRENCH RErOLUriON. 



THOMAS PAINE, 

SECRETARY FOR FOREIGN AFPAIR3 TO CONGRESS IN THK 

AMERICAN WAR, and 

AUTHOR OF THE WORK JNTITLED » COMMON SMNBM." 



L O ND O Nj 

BRINTED FOR J; 8. JORDAN, No. 166. ELEET-STRBET. 
MDCCXCI. 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



GEORGE WASHINGTON, 

PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA, 

SIR, 

1 PRESENT you a fmall Treatife in de- 
fence of thofe Principles of Freedom which 
your exemplary Virtue hath fo eminently con- 
tributed to eftablifli. — That the Rights of Man 
may become as univerfal as your Benevolence 
can wlfii, and that you may enjoy the Hap- 
pincfs of feeing the New World regenerate 
the Old, is the Prayer of 

S I R, 

Your much obliged, and 

Obedient humble Servant, 

THOMAS PAINE. 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



PREFACE 

TO THE 

ENGLISH EDITION. 



FROM the part Mr. Burke took in the 
American Revolution, it was natural 
that I fhould confider him a friend to mankind ; 
and as our acquaintance commenced on that 
ground, it would have been more agreeable 
to me to have had caufe to continue in that 
opinion, than to change it. 

At the time Mr. Burke made his violent 
fpeech laft winter iu the Englifh Parliament 
againft the French Revolution and the Na-, 
tional Aflerably, I was in Paris, and had ' 
written him, but a fhort time before, to in- 
form him how profperoufly matters were 
going on. Soon after this, I faw his adver- 
tifement of the Pamphlet he intended to pub- 
li£h: As the attack was to be made in a 
Language but Httle ftudied, and lefs underilood, 
in France, and as every thing fuffers by 
tranflation, I promifed fome of the friends 
of the Revolution in that country, that when- 
ever Mr. Burke's Pamphlet came forth, I 
would 

Dgiw^dbv Google- 



[ '»" ] ■ 

would anfwer it. This appeared to. me the 
more ncCeflkry to be donej when 1 faw the 
flagratit miffeprefentations which Mr. Burke's 
Pahiphlet contains ; ahd (hat while it is aa 
outrageous abufe on the French Revolution, 
and the principles of LiBerty, it is an impo- 
fition on the reft ei the worli 

I am the more aftonifhed and.difappointed 
at this condiifl in Mr. Burke, as (from dift 
circumttahce I afn going to ihentioh),- 1 had 
formed other expeditions. 

thad feen enough of tliemifciresof war, to 
■Wifh it nriight never more have exiftetice in the 
■wotld;an'dtfiatfcimet)therfti5d^mightbefoiind[ 
out to fettle the dltfeferices that fhould occa- 
fiortaUy drife in the ftiighijpurho6d of Nations, 
tins certainly might be done if Courts wef^ 
^pofed to fet honeftly about it, of if to\xr,y 
tries -tt^efe enligdteiieiS eAoiigh ftbt tftfee m^^S 
(he dupes of Coiirts. The peojSltf of Afnfrici 
had been bred ixp in thi fitfie prejudrceis^ 
x^aimft Fi^Ariee,- ^'feieh at' that' fttae charadef-^ 
ized tfte pe6p!e of Englarid j bttWcpti^ericri 
dnd an acqewrtt^ce ■vfrith tin French Natibrf 
have rtioft effeQuany fho^n to t^e Artiericansf 
thd fstKehtoS of th'ofe prejudices ; and f <ft>' 
not befieve that a iW6re cbrdJal ahd confiden-' 
fiil ititetcbtsfe extfts bervfr-den jiny two c6Viri- 
fries thafl bet'Sv'ee"!! America and frauce. 

When 

Dgitiz^d by Google 



"When I came to Sraj^ce in tlie Spring pf 
1787, the AKh^V3i«T^of-T^<jH*Ioufc wa$;tti(eft 

Secretary of tha^,Mip^«S a nu^ of an ep^-n 
ged bepewqlent hetwt } ^^4 i^wwitl, tl>5S 'hi^ 
fentiments ap4 niy own g^eftly agreed 
with refp^ to th^ laa^nefs of war, and ih^ 
lyretched impolicy of two nations, like Engr 
^nd and 'Frivnce, CQnjtUi^aJly w<srry(iig giit^ 
<jther, tp no ojjber end tkap thflt of a ipvtK^i 
increafe of I^fdens aad tstsflfc That I E^g^ 
J)* aflured I hid not mjiunderftoptj hiip^ noc 
he me, I put the fubftsnse of our opiiidoBR 
into writing, and fent it. to .Um ; fuhjpifting 
a requeft, that if I fhOuJd fte among the pecH 
yk of England, any djXpofuion to cuhiy^te a 
better underftanding between the two nations 
than had hitherto prevailed, how far I might 
be authorized to fay that the fame difpol;tida- 
prevailed on the part of Fritnce ? ' He an- 
fwered me by letter in the mpft unreferred 
manner, and that not for himfelf only, but 
iox the Minifter, with whofe knowledge, the 
letter was declared to be written. 

I put this letter into the hands of Mr. Bui^e 
almoft three years ago, and left it with- him, 
where it flill remains ; hoping, and at the- 
iame time naturally expeding, from the opi- 
nion 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



[ X ] 

nion I had conceived of him, that he would 
find fome opportunity of making a good ufe 
of it, for the purpofe of removing thofe errors 
ftnd prejudices, which two neighbouring na-i 
tions, from the want of knowing each other^ 
had entertained, to the injury of both. 

When the French Revolution broke out, it 
^Certainly afforded to Mr. Burke an opportu- 
nity of doing fome good, had he been difpofed 
to it ; inftead of which, no fooner did he fee 
the old prejudices wearing away, than he 
immediately began fowing the feeds of a new 
inveteracy, as if he were afraid that England 
and France would ceafe to be enemies. That 
there are men in all countries who get their 
Kving by war, and by keeping up the quar- 
rels of Nations, is as fhocking as it is true ; 
but when thofe who are concerned in the go- 
vernment of a country, make it their ftudy to 
fow difcord, and cultivate prejudices between 
Nations, it becomes the more unpardonable. 

With refpeii to a paragtaph in this Wort 
alluding to Mr. Burke's having a penfion, the 
report has been fome time in circulation, at 
leaft two months ; and as a perfon is often 
the laft to hear what concerns him the moft 
to know, I have mentioned it, that Mr. Burke 
may have an opportunity of contraditaing the 
rumour, if he thinks proper. 

THOMAS PAINE. 






RIGHTS OF MAN, &c. 



AMONG the incivilities by which nations or 
individuals provoke and irritate each other, 
Mr. Burke's pamphlet oii the French Revolution 
is an extraordinary inftance. Neither the people 
of France, nor the National AITembly, were trou- 
bling themfelves about the affairs of England, or 
the Engliih Parliament ; and why Mr. Burke fliould 
commence an unprovoked attack upon them, both 
-in parliament and in public, is a conduct that can- 
not be pardoned on the fcore of manners, nor jut 
tified on that of policy. 

There is fcarcely an epithet of abufe to be found 
in the EngHlh language, with which Mr. Burke 
has not loaded the French nation and the National' 
Affembly. Every thing which rancour, prejudice, 
ignorance or knowledge could fuggeft, are poured 
forth in the copious fury of near four hundred pages. 
In the drain and on the plan Mr. Burke was writ- 
ing, he niight have wrote on to as many thoufands. 
When the tongue or the pen is let toofe in a phrenzy 



C « ] 

of paffion, it is thfe man, and not the fubje£t, that 
' becomes exhaufted. 

Hitherto Mr. Burke has been miftaken and dif- 
appointed in the opinions he had formed of the 
aSairs of France ; but fucfa is the ingenaity of his 
hope, or the malignancy of his defpair, that it 
fiirnilhes him with new pretences to go on. There 
was a time when it was impolfilDle to make Mr. 
Burke believe there would be any revolution in 
France. His opinion then was, that the French 
"had neither fpirit to undertake it, nor fortitude to 
fupport it ; and now that there is one, he feeks on 
cfcape by condemning it. « 

Not fufficiently content imth abufing the Na- 
tional Afferably, a great part of his work is taken 
up with abufing Dr. Price (one of the beft-hearted 
men that lives), and the two focieties in England 
known by the name of the Revolution and the 
tonftitututional Societies. 

Dr. Price had preached a fermon on the 4th of 
November, 1789, being the'anniverfary of what is 
palled in England the Revolution' which took place 
l688. Mr. Burke, fpeaking.of this fermon, fays, 

* The political Divme proceed* dogmatically tO af- 

* fert, that, by the principles of the Revdotibn, the 

* people of England have acquired three funda- 

* mental rights : 

- * I; To chafe our own governors. 

* 2. To caffiier them for ■imfconduQ:. 
■ * 3. To frame a government for ourfelvee.' 

I^. Price does not fay thastbe right to do thefe 
things exifts in this or in -that perfon, or in this or 



E 7 3 

, in ttut defcription of perTcKis, but that it exifts ia 
the whole; that it is a right refident ta the nation* 
—Mr. Burke, on the contrary, denies that luch a 
right exifls in the nation, either in whole or in part, 
OF that it exifts any where ; and what is (till more 
ftrange and marvellous, he fays, ' that the pet^k 
*' of England utterly difclaim fuch a right, and that 
' they wHI refill the practical aiTertion of it TKitk 
* their lives and fortunes.* That men fhould take 
up arrtis, and fpend their lives and fortunes, not to 
maintain their rights, but to maintain they have 
not rights, is an entire new fpecies of difcoveryi 
and fuited to the paradoxial genius of Mr. Burke. 
The method which Mr. Burke takes to prove 

■ that the people of England have no fuch rights, and 
that fuch rights do not now exift in the nation, ei- 
ther in whole or in part, or any where at all, is of ' 
the fame marvellous and monRrous kind with what 
he has already faid ; for his arguments a>e, that the 
perfons, or the generation of perfons, in whom they 
did exift, »e dead, and with them the right is dead 
alfo. To prove this, he quotes a declaration inade 
by parliament about a hundred years ago, to Wif- 
liam.and Mary, in thefe words :—" The Lords 
** fpiritual and temporal, and Commons, do, in 
*' the name of the people aforefaid — (meaning the 
people of England then living) — moft humbly and' 
*' ^thfuUy fitbmit themfelves, their heirs and pof- 
*' teritiesy for ever." He alfo quotes a claufe of 
another a^ of parliament made in the iame reign, 
the terms of which, he lays, *' binds us-^ meaning 
thepet^e of tjiat day)—" our i«rj and our p^ 
B a ** terity. 



C 8 ] 

" ieriiyy t6 thettiy their heirs and pujierttyy to the 
" end of time." 

Mr. Burke conceives his point fufficiently efta- 
blifhed by producing thofe claufes, which he en- 
forces by faying that they exclude the right of the 
nation for ever : and not yet content with making 
fuch declarations, repeated over and over again, he 
ftirther fays, • that if the people of England poffef- 

* fed fuch a right before the Revolution, (which he 
acknowledges to have been the cafe, not only in 
England, but throughout Europe, at an early pe- 
riod; ' yet that the Englijh nation did, at the time of 

* the Revolution, moft folemnly renounce and ab- 

* dicate it, for therafelves, and for all their pojierity 

* jvr ever* 

As Mr. Burke occafidnally applies the poifon 
drawn from his horrid principles (if it is not a 
prophanation to call them by the name of princi- 
ples) pot only to the Engli(h nation, but to the 
French Revolution and the National Affembly, 
and charges that auguft, illuminated apd illuminat- 
ii^ body of men with the epithet of ufurpersy I 
.■^all, fans ceremoniey place another fyften^ of prin-' 
ciples in oppofition to his. 

The Englifli Parliament of 16&8 did a certain 
thing, which, for themfelves and their conflituents, 
they had a right to do, and which it appeared right 
ihould be done : but, in addition to this right, 
which they pofTeffed by delegation, iheyfet up ano- 
ther ri^ht by ajfumpiiony that of binding and con- 
troulittg pofterity to the end of time. The cafe, 
therefore, divides itfelf into two parts j the right 
vbicli 



C 9 ] 

1i4iich they poiTefied by delegadon, and the right 
■which they fet up by affumption. The firft is ad- 
mitted ; but, with refped to the fecond, I reply- 
There never did, there never will, and there ne- 
ver can exift a parliament, or any defcription of 
men, or any generation of men, in any country, 
poffeffed of the right or the power of binding 
and controuljng pofterity to the *' end of timet* or 
of commanding for ever how the world ffiall be 
governed, or who fhall govern it : and therefore 
all fuch claufes, a^s or declarations, by which the 
makers of them attempt to do what they have nei- 
ther the right nor the power to do, nor the power 
to execute, are in themielves null and void. — 
Every age and generation muft be as fi-ee to afl: for 
hfelf, in all cafes J as the ages and generations which' 
preceded it. The vanity and prefumptlon of go- 
verning beyond the grave, is the moft ridiculous 
and infolent of all tyrannies. Man has no proper- 
ty in man ; neither has any generation a property 
in the generations which are to follow. The par- 
liament or the people of 1688, or of any other pe- 
riod, had no more right to difpofe of the people of 
the prefent day, or to bind or to controul thora 
in anyjhape whaWveVy than the parliament or the 
people of the prefent day have to difpofe of, bind or 
controul thofe who are to live a hundred or a thou- 
land years hence- Every generation is and muH 
be competent to all the purpofes which its occa-. 
fions require. It is the living, and not the dead, 
that are to be accommodated. When man ceafes 
t9 be^ his power and his wauts ceafe with him ; 

and' 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



C fo ] 

and having no longer, any participation in the con* 
cerns' of this world, he has no longer any authority 
kt-direding who fhall be its governors, or how its 
goyenunent fliall be organized, or how admini> 
ftered. 

I am not contending for, nor againd, any forn^ 
of government, nor for, nor againl)', any party here 
or elfewhere. That which a whole nation choofes, 
to do, it has a right to do. Mr. Burke fays. No. 
Where then does the right exift ? I am contend- 
ing for the right of the livings arid againlt their 
being willed away, and controuled and contrafled 
for, by the manufcript affumed authority of the 
dead ; and Mr. Burke is contending for the autho- 
rity of the dead over the rights and freedom of the 
living. There was a time when kings difpofed of 
their crowns by will upon their death-beds, and 
configncd the people, like beads of the field, to 
whatever fucceffor they appointed. This is now fo 
exploded as fcarcely to be remembered, and fo 
monftrous as hardly to be believed : But the par- 
yameDtary claufes upoawhich Mr. Burke builds 
his political church, are of the fame nature. 

The laws of every country muft be analogous to 
fome common principle. In England, no parent 
or mafter, nor all the authority of parliament, om- 
nipotent a« it has called itfelf, can bind or controuf 
the perfonal freedom even of an individual beyond 
the age of twenty-one years : On what ground of 
right then could the parliament of 1688, or any 
other parliament, bind all pofterity for ever ? 

.Thofe 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



£ n -] 

Thofe wHo have quitted the world, and thofc 
who are not ^et arrived at it, are as remote from 
each other -as the utmoO: ftretch of mortal imagine 
don can conceive; What poffible obligation thai i 
.ean exifl: betweeBthem.what rule or principle-can 
(he laid down, that two non-entities, the one out of 
-existence, and the other not in, and who never can 
Vieet in this world, that the one ihould contKuU 
tbe odier t^^^ .end of time i 
• Itt England jit is faid that money cannot be taken 
ittdt of the. pockets of the peop^ without thdr c(^ 
Seat : fint who authoiizod, and y/ho could authfr 
*ize' tile parliament of i6a8:ti? conttoul and take 
■away lhe;freedom oi pofterity, and limit and con- 
fineA-eir rights of afting in certain cafes forever, 
who were not in ejtiftence to give ot to w^di-bcM 
their confent ? 

A greater abfiifdity cannot pref«\t itfelf to the 
widerftandingof man, than what Mr. Burke offers 
to his, readers. He tells them, and he teJls the ' 
worid to -come, riiat acettainbody of men, who 
csafted a hundred years ago, made a law, and that 
there ^does »ot now exitt in the nation, nor ever 
will, .nor.' ever can, a power to alter it. Under 
how many fubtilties, or'abfunfities, has AeiJivine 
right to gcfvern beai irhpofed on the credulity of 
mankind ! Mr. Burke has difcovefed a new one, 
and he-has fhortened his journey to Rome, by ap- 
pealmg to the power of this infallible parliament of 
• former days ; and he produces what it has done, as 
of divine authority : for that power rauft certainly 
— 3 be 



be more than human, which no human pow«r to 
the end of time can alter. 

But Mr. Burke has done feme fervice, not to 
his caufe, but to his country, by bringing thofe 
claufes into public view. They ferve to deihofi- 
ftrate how neceffary it is at ' all times to watch 
againft the attempted'encfoachmentpf power, and 
to prevent its running to excels". It is fomewhat 
extraordinary, that the offence for which James II. 
was expelled, that of fetting up power hjaffumptlott, 
flibuld be re-afted, under anotherfjiape andform, by 
-the parliament that expelled him. It fliews, that 
the rights of man were but imperfedly underftood 
at the Revolution j for certain it is, that the right 
which that parliament fet up by ajumption (for by de- 
legation it had it not, and could riot have it, becaufe 
jlone 'could give it) over the perfons and freedom 
of pofterity for ever, was of the fame tyrannical 
unfounded' kind which James' attempted to fet up 
oVfir the parliament and the nation, and for which," 
he was expelled. The only difference is, (for ia 
principle they differ not) that the onewas an ufurper 
over the living, and the other over the unborn ; 
and as the one has no better authority to ftand upon 
than the other, both of them mufl be equally null 
and Void, and of no effe£t. 

From what,, or from whence, does Mr. Burke 
prove the right of any human power to bind pof- 
terity for ever ? He has: produced his claufes ; but 
he mull produce alfo his proofs, that iucb a right 
cxifled, and Ihew how it exifted. If it ever exift> 
fd, it mud now exift.; for whatever appertains to ~ 

the 



t «3 3 
the Bcature of B»a, cannot bf anmhUated by nuiu. 
It ia the nature of Hiaii to dici uid tu will ceatk(ute 
to die as loag at he contiauet to bf born^ But 
Mr. Burke has fet up a fort of political Adaf9, lA 
vhom all pofterity are bound for ever ; he muft 
therefore prove that his Adam poffitfied filch a 
power, or fuch a right. 

The weaker any cord i^ the Ids will it bear to 
be ftretched, and the worfe is the poticy to ftretch 
It, unlefs it is intended to break it. Had a perfoa 
contemplated the overthrow of Mr. Burke's pofi- 
tlons, he would have proceeded as Mr. Burke has 
done. He would have magmfied the authorities, 
on purpofe to have called the right of them into 
queftion ; and the inftant the question of right was 
ftarted, the authorities mull have been given up. 

It requires but a very fmall glance of thought tp 
perceive, that altho' laws made in one generation 
pfteB continue in force through fucceeding genera* 
tions, yet that they continue to derive their force 
fi-om the confent of the living. A law not re- 
pealed continues in force, not becauTe it cannot be 
Tfpealedj but becaufe it is not repealed; and the 
non-repealing paJles for confent. 

But Mr. Burke's claures have not even this qpall* 
fication in their favour. They become nuU, by 
attempting to become immortal. The nature of 
them precludes confent. They deftroy the right 
which they might have, by grounding it on a right 
which they cannot have. Immortal power, is not a 
human right, and therefore cannot be a right of 
purti»ment. Tbe parliament of 1688 ought as 
C well 



t J4 "] 

well have, g^^afed an aft to have authorifed them-- 
felves" to live for ever; as to make their authority live 
for "ever. All therefore that can be faid of them is, * 
that they are a formality of words, of as much im-\ 
port," as if thofe who ufed them had addreffed a con- 
gratulation to themfelves, and, in the oriental ftilc 
of antiquity, hadfaid, O Parliament; livefor ever - 

The circiimftarices of the world are continually 
changing, and the opinions of men change alfof 
and as government is for the living, a^d not for 
the dead, it is the living only that has any right 
in it. That which may be thought right antf 
found convenient in one age, may be thought 
wrong and found inconvenient in another. In 
fuch cafes, Who is to decide, the living, or the 
dead? ' ' , ' . '" 

As almoll one hundred pages of Mr. Burke's 
book are employed upon thefe claufes, it will con- 
fequently follow, that if the claufes themfelves, fo 
, far as they fet up an ajfumed, uftirped dominioii 
oyer pollerity for ever, are unauthoritative, and in 
their nature null and void, that all hts voluminous 
inferences and declamation drawn therefrom, or 
founded thereon, are null and void alfo : and on 
this ground I reft the matter. 

We now come more particularly to the affairs 
of France. Mr. Burke's book has the appear- 
ance of beiog written as inftruftion to the French 
. nation; but if I may permit myfelf the ufe of ah 
extravagant metaphor, fuited to the estrav'agance 
of the cafe. It is darknels attempting to illumi- 
. jiate light, 
'.,; ■ 'While 

• "' L);.I..=.J by Google 



r-V5 ;] 

, While I am writing this, there is accidcntallf 

t>efore me fome propofals for a declaration of rights 

by the Marquis de la Fayette (I aOi his pardon for 

uHng his former addrefs, and do it only for dif- 

.tinftion's fake) , to the National Aflembly on the 

.nth of July 1789, three days before the taking of 

■;the Baflilte j and I cannot but be ftruck how op- 

.pofite the fources are from. which that Gentleman 

.and Mr.. Burke draw their principles. Inflead of 

i: referring to mufty records and mouldy parchments 

to prove that the rights of the living areloft, " 15- 

■" nounced and abdicated for ever," by thofe who 

jare now no more, as Mr. Burke has done, M. de 

: la Fayette applies to the living world, and empha- 

.tically fays, " Call to mind the fentiments which 

, *' Nature has engrayed in the heart of every citizen, 

.** and which take a new force when they are fo- 

. *' lemnly recognized by all : — For a nation to love 

*' liberty, it is fufficient that ffie knows it ; and to 

.**,be free, it is fufficient that fhe wills it." How 

• dry, barren, and obfcure, is the fource from which 

.Mr. Burke labours; and how ineffectual, though 

, gay, with flowers, are all his declamation and his 

, argument, compared with thefe clear, concife, and 

I,' ^foul-animating fentiments ! Few and (hort as they 

.are, they lead on to a vaft field of generous and, 

: manly thinking, and do not finifli, like Mr. Burke's 

.-periods, with mufic in the ear, and nothing in the 

; heart. 

As I have introduced the inention of M. de la ^^ 
^ Fayetle, I will take the liberty of at^ding an anec- 
, dote refpe^ing his farewel addrcia to the Gongrefs 
C 2 ¥ 

, L);.I..=.J by Google 



t >« 1 

of America lA 17^3, iaA w9ticfa occnrftiS frdh to 
miy mind when I faw fib. Bulge's '^btindermg it- 
tack on the French Revolution.— M. de la Fayette 
went t6 America at an early period of the war, and 
contifiued a vohiHteer in h«?r fd-vice to the end. 
His conduct through the whole <*f ihat enterprifft 
ts brie of the moft ejttrabrdinSry thift is to be found 
tn the 'hi (lory of a yodng 'man, fcarcely tha twenty 
"years of age. Sitoated in a cotmtry that was ^e 
the lap of fenfaal pieafure, and "with the means of 
enjoymg it« how fe# are there to 'be foimd who 
Hrould excTiange fuch a fcene for the woods and 
■^ildtfrnefs Of America, -and paft' the flo*ery years 
of youth in imprdfitable dang6r and h'ardlhip ! but 
'fQ(!h is the fsd. Whenthe war ended, and he was 
on the point of taking his final departure, he pfe- 
fehted himfelf to 'Conjgrefs, and contemplating, in 
"his afflfcftipnate fai'rt'el,'the revolution he had ffien, 
e'ipi'effed Himfelf in thefe words : " JWi?/ tbit great 
■•' tnmuminty Yaiftd fo Liberty, /er*ve as -b kjonjo 
** ihe opprejor, and an exaMple'to the oppfejedt** 
— Wheh ^his adiJrds came to tbe'hSnds df DoSor 
Tranklin, 'who was then in ^^nce, he api^ied tb 
'Count Ver^ennes to have "it iriferted in the French 
'Gazette, blit never could obtainhis confent. The 
fea vittj that Count Vtfgfeiines was an 3rifto> 
cratical ddpot at home, and dreadtsd the example 
of the American 'revolution in Frarice, as certaifl 
other perfons now dread the example. of the French 
■^erolution id England; sltid Mr. Burke's tribute of 
fear (for in-this light his ^book'muftl^ cctftfidered) 
rune parallel with Count -Vergenii£&*'KfbfaI. -B6t» 
to return more particularly to his work--- 

" We 



r -7 ] 

*t W£ have feen (&yi Mr. Bwke) the Erenoh 
** rebel agfunft a mild and lawful Monarch, with 
." more fury, outrage, and infuh, than any, people 
** has been blown to -rUe againft %he moll illegal 
■•* ufurper, or ihe moft fanguinary tyrant.'*— This 
is :one atnoQg a thouland other inltances, in which 
Mr. Burke ihews that he is ignorant of the if rings 
•and principles of the French revolution. 

It was not agatnll Louis the XVIth, hut i^nft 
the defpotic principles Qf the government, that the 
nation revolted. Hiefe principles had not their 
-Osigin in him, . but in the ordinal fHabliihtnent, 
sctany centuries back ; . and they were become too 
deeply rooted tQ be removed, and the augean {table 
of jparaiites. and plunderers too abominably filthy - 
.to be,cieanred, by any thing fhort.of a complete 
. and nniverial revolution. When it becpme; necef- 
•£uy to do a thing, the whole heart ^dfoul fhould 
jgo Into the meafure, or jipt augnpt it. . T^t crifis 
vn* then arrived, and there remained ng chuce but 
■to aft with determined vigour, or not to adt at,all. 
^e:£ingwasknown.to>be the friend of the nation, 
. <and this drcumftance was ^vourable to the enter- 
^frife* Perhaps «o man bred up in the flile of an 
absolute King, ever {Kifiefled a heart fo little dlfpo- 
Icdtothe cxercifeof that fpecics of -power as the 
-{irefent King of France. But the jniQciplias of the 
-2«vcmtnem itfelf fiill remained the fame.. The 
'3MonaTch and ^e Monarchy were difUnj^^and^fepa- 
rate things; and it was againfl: the ,eftabliflie4 
' ^teipotttn of the kiter, and >npt agadnft the ,per- 
ilbn ct princtp^ of (he iormos -^t)^ ^ TcvcJt 
commenced, 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



[ 18 y 

Commenced, and ' the revolution has been 
carried. 

Mr. Burke does not attend to the diiHn£Koft 
between men and princfples^ and therefore he doe? 
■ not fee that a revolt may take place againft the def- 
potifm of the latter, while there lies no charge of 
defpotifm againft the former. 

The natural moderation of Louis XVI. contri- 
buted nothing to alter the hereditary defpotifm of 
the monarchy. All the tyrannies - of former 
reigns, a£ted under that hereditary defpotifm, wer« 
ftill liable to be revived in the hands of a fuc- 
ceffor. It was not the refpite of a reign that 
• would fatisfy France, enlightened as fte was then 
become. A cafual difcontinuance of the fra£liee 
of defpotifm, is not a difcontinuance of its pririd- 
ples; the former depends on the virtue of the in- 
dividual who 18 in immediate pofleflion of the 
power; the latter, on the virtue and fortitude of 
the nation. In the cafe of Charles i. and James II, 
of England, the revolt was againft the perfonal 
defpbtifin of the men ; whereas in France, it- was 
againft the hereditary defpotifm of the eftabliflicd 
government. But men who can confign over the 
rights of pofterity for ever on the, authority, of a 
mouldy parchment, like Mr. Burke, are not qua- 
lified to judge of this revolution. It takes, iji a 
field too vaft for their views to expjore,, and pro- 
ceeds with a mightinefs of reafon they cantiot keep 
pace with. 

But there are many points of. view. in. which 
:tlut revolution may be coniidered. : Wh^a defpo- 

tiiin 

■ Dgiw^dbv Google" 



[ -9 ] 

tifitt has eftablifiied itfelf for ages in a ■country, W 
in France, it is not in the perfon of the King only 
that it refides. It has the appearance of being fo 
in ihow, and in nominal authority ; but it is not , 
fo in prai^ice, and in h£t. It has its .ftandard. 
every wherd. Every office and department has 
its defpOtiftn, founded upon, cuftom and ufage.. 
Every place bas its BaftiUe, and every Baftille its 
defpot. The. original hereditary ddpotifin rer\-> 
dent in the perfon of the Bang, divides and fubdi- 
vides itfelf into a thoufand Ihapes and forms, till 
at lad the whole of it is zGtei by deputation. 
This was' the cafe in France; and agaiaH: this 
]pecies of de^potifm, proceeding on through an 
endlefs labyrinth of otHce till the fource of It is 
fcarcely perceptible, there is no mode of rc^refs. 
It ftrengthens itfelf by afluming the appearance of 
duty, and tyrannifes under the pretence of obey- 
ing- '..-., 

When a man reflc'Ss on. the. condition which 
France veas, in from the nature of her govem- 
nrent, he will fee other caufes for revolt than thofq 
which immediately conned themfelves with the 
perfon or charafter of Louis XVI. There were, 
if I may fo exprefs it, a thoufand defpotifms to 
be. reformed in France, which had grown up un- 
der the hereditary defpotifm of the monarchy, and 
became fo rooted as to be in a great meafure Inde- 
pendent of it. Between the monarchy, the par^ 
liament, and the church, there was a rivalj^ip of 
defpotifm; befides the feudal defpotifm operating 
locally, and the minifterial defpotifm operating 
cvery-where. But Mr. Burke, by confidering the 
4 Kinir 



[ " ] - 

Ktng a« the only poflible oh^tSt of a revok, tptik» 
'zs if France vas a vitiage, in which every thing 
that pafled maft be known to its commanding 
officer, and no e^preffion could be aftcd but 
what he could immediately controuL Mr. Burka- 
might have been in the Baflills his whole Kfe, at 
well under Louis XVI. as Louis XIV. and neither 
the one nor the other have known that fuch a man 
as Mr. Burke exited, llie defpodc principles of 
the government were Ae fame in both rdgna, 
rfiough the difpofitions of the men were as remote 
as tyranny and benevolence. 

What Mr. Burke confiders as a reproach tft 
the French Revolution (that of bringing it for-v 
ward under a reign more mild than the preced- 
ing ones), is one of its highcft honours. The 
revolntions that have taken place in other Euro- 
pean "countries, have been excited by perfonal 
hatred.' The rage was againft the man, and he 
became the viftim. But, in the mftance of France, 
ve fee a revolution generated in the rational 
contemplation of the rights of man, and dif- 
tiogififtring from the .beginning between perfont 
and principles. . 

But Mr. Burke appears to have no idea of 
principles, when he is contemplating governments. 
" Ten years ago (fays he) I could have felicitated 
** France on her having a government, without 
*' enquiring what the nature of that government 
** was, or how it was adminiftered." Is this the 
language of a rational man? Is it the language 
of a heart feeling as it ought to feel for the rights 
and happinefs of the human race? On this 
ground,^, 



[ 2, ] 

ground Mr. Burke muft compliment every go. 
vernmenl in the world, while the vidims who 
fuffer under them, whether fold into flavery, or 
tortured out of exillence, are wholly forgotten. 
It is power, and not principles, that Mr. Burke 
venerates ; and under this abominable depravity, 
he is difqualified to judge between them. — Thus 
much for his opinion as to the occafions of the 
French Revolution. I now proceed to other 
confiderations. 

I know ,a place in America called Point-no- 
Point ; becaufe as you proceed along the fliore, 
gay and flowery as Mr. Burke's language, it con- 
' tinually recedes and prefents itfelf at a dillance 
a- head ; and when you have got as far as you can 
go, there is no point at all. Juft thus it is with 
Mr. Burke's three hundred and fifty-fix pages. It 
is therefore difficult to reply to him. But as the 
points he wiflies to eftablilh may be inferred from 
what he abufes, it is in his paradoxes that we 
muft look for his arguments. 

As to.the tragic paintings by which Mr. Burke 
has outraged his . own imagination, and feeks to 
work .upon that of his readers, they are very well 
calculated for theatrical reprefentation, where 
fadls are manufaflured for the fake of fliow, and 
accommodated to produce, through the weaknefs 
of fympathy, a weeping effeO:. But Mr. Burke 
fliould recollect that he is writing Hiftory, and 
not Plays. ; and that his readers will expeS truth, 
and not the fpouting rant of high-toned exclama- 
tion. 

D When ■ 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



t " ] 

"When We fee a man dramatically lamenting In a 
publication intended to be believed, that, *' The age 
*' of chivalry is gone ! that The glory of Europe is ex- 
" iingutfhed for ever .' ihsX The unbougbt grace of life, 
** (if any one knows what it Is)) the cheap defence of 
*' nations, the nurfe of manly fentiment and heroic enter- 
" prize^ is gone/" and all this becaufe theQuixote age 
of chivalry nonfenfe is gone. What opinion can we 
form of his judgment, or what regard can we pay to 
his fa£ts ? In the rhapfody of his imagination, he 
has difcovered a world of wind-mills, and his ibr- 
foivs are, that there are no Quixotes to attack 
them. But if the age of ariftocracy, like that of 
chivalry, ftiould fall, and they had originally feme 
connexion, Mr. Burke, the trumpeter of the Or- 
der, may continue his parody to the end, and finifli 
with exclaiming — *' Othello's occupation's gone .'" 

Notwithftanding Mr. Burke's horrid paintings, 
when the French Revolution is compared with 
that of other countries, the aftonilhinent will be, 
that it is marked with fo few facrifices ; but this 
aftonifliment will ceafe when we reflect that it Ws 
principles, and not perfons, that were the meditated 
objefts of deftruftion. The mind " of the nation 
■was a£ted upon by a higher ftimulus than what 
the confideration of perfons could infpire, and 
fought a higher conqueft than could be produced 
by the downfal of an enemy. Among the few 
who fell, there do nor appear to be any that 
were intentionally fingled out. They all of them 
had their fate in the circumftaiices of the moment, 
and were not purfucd with that long, cold-blooded, 
2 unabated 

' L);.I..=.J by Google 



. [ "-S ] 

unabated revenge which purfucd the unfortunate 
Scotch in the affair of 1 745. 

Through the whole of Mr, Burke's book I 
do not obferve that the Baftille is mentioned more 
than once, and that with a kind of implication 
as if he were forry it is pulled down, and wiflied 
it were built up again. *' We have rebuilt New- 
*' gate (fays he), and tenanted the manfion; and 
" we have prifcms almofl: as ftrong as jhe Baftille 
*' for thofe who dare to libel the Queens of 
" France*." As to what a madman, like the perfpn 
called Lord George Gordon, might fay, and to 
whom Newgate is rather a bedlam than a prifon, 
it. is unworthy a rational confideration. It was a 
madman that libelled — and that is fufficient 
apology J and it aiforded an opportunity for con., 
fining him, which was the thing that was wiflied 
for : But certain it is that Mr. Burke, who does 
not call hinifelf a madman, whatever other people 
may do, has libelled, in the mofl unprovoked man. 
ner, and in the grofleft ftile of the moft vulgar ' 
abufe, the whole reprefentative authority of France; 
and yet Mr. Burke takes his feat in the Britifh 

■ Since writing the above, two other places occur in Mr. Burke's 
pamphlet, in which the name of the Baflille is mentioned, but in the 
lame, manner. In the one, he introduces it in a fort of obfcure 
queflion, and afks — " Will any minil^eri wliD now ferve fuch a king, 
with but a decent appearand of refpeft, cordially obey the orders of 
thofe whom but the other day, inbistiOme, they had committed to- 
the Baftille P" In the other, the taking it is mentioned as implying 
priminaliiy in the French guards who aflifted in demol i thing it.— 
'** They have not (fays he) forgot the taking the king's caftlea at 
pari*."..— tT Ilia is Mr, £urke, who pretends to wiiie oa cotiftitn. 
tiooal freedara. 

D 3 Houf« 

,. ..Google 



ttoufe of Commons ! From his violence and hi» 

■ grief, his fiience on fome points, and his excefs on^ 
others, it is difficuk not to believe that Mr. Burke 
is forry, extremely forry, that arbitrary power, the 
power of the Pope, and the Bailille, are pulled 
down. 

Not one glance of companion, not one commi- 
ferating reflexion, that I can find throughout his 
book, has he beftowed on thofe who lingered out 
the moft wretched of hves, a life without hope, in 
the moftmiferable of prifons. It is painful to be- 
hold a man employing his talents to corrupt him-' 
felf. Nature has been kinder to Mr. Burke than 
he is to her. He is not affeded by the reality of 
diftrefs touching upon his heart, but by the fliowy 
refemblance of it ftriking his imagination. He 
pities the plumage, but forgets the dying bird. 
Accuftomed to kifs the ariftocratical hand that 
hath purloined him from himfelf, he degenerates 
into a compofition of art, and the genuine foul of 
nature forfakes him. His hero or his heroine muft 
be a tragedy-vidim expiring in ihow, and not the 
real prlfoner of mifery, Aiding into death in the 
filence of a dungeon. 

As Mr. Burke has pafled over the whole tranfac- 

■ tion of the Baftille (and his filence is nothing in his 
favour), and has entertained his readers with reflec- 
tions on fuppofed fafts diftorted into real falfe- 
hoods, I will give, fince he has not, forae account 
of the circumftances which preceded that tranfac- 
tion. They will ferve to ihew, that lefs mifchief 

could 
L);.i....i by Google 



[ ^S ] 
could fcarcely have accompanied fuch an event, 
when conlidered with the treacherous and hoflile 
aggravations of the enemies of the Revolution. 

The mind can hardly pifture to'itfelf a more 
tremendous fcene than what the city of Paris exhi- 
bited at the time of taking the Badille, and for two 
days before and after, nor' conceive the poffibility 
of its quieting fo foon. At a diftance, this traniac- 
tion has appeared only as an zQ. of herolfm, Hand- 
ing on itfelf ; and the clofe political connection it had 
with the Revolution is loft in the brilliancy of the 
atchievement. But we are to confider it as the 
ftrength of the parties, brought man to man, and 
contending for the iffue. The Baftille was to be 
«ther the prize or the prifon of the affailants. 
The downfal of it included the idea of the down- 
fid of Defpotifm ; and this compounded image was 
become as figuratively united as Bunyan's Doubt- 
ing Caftle and giant Defpair. 

The National Affembly, before and at the time of 
taking the BafUUe, was fitting at Verfailles, twelve 
miles diftant from Paris. About a week before the 
rifmg of the Parifians, and their taking the Baftille, 
it was difcovered that a plot was forming, at the 
head of which was the Count d'Artois, the King's 
youngeft brother, for demolilhing the National Af- 
fembly, feizing its members, and thereby cruftiing, 
by a coup de main, all hopws and profpefls of form- 
ing a free government. For the fake of humanity, 
as well as of freedom, it is well this plan did not 
fucceed. Examples are not wanting to fliew how 
dreadfully vindiftive and cruel are ail old govern- 
ineiit«» 

■■u;.t.z=dbvGOOglC 



c 06 r 

ments, when they are fuccefsful agaioll what they, 
call a revolt. 

Thjs plan muft have been fome time in con- 
templation; becaufe, in order to carry it into exe- 
curionj it was neceflary to colled a large military - 
force round Paris, and to cut off the communica- 

' tion between that city and the National Affambly 
at- Verfailles. The troops deftined for this fervice 
were chiefly the foreign troops in the pay of. 
France, and \rfio, for this particular purpofe, were 
drawn, from the diftant provinces where, they were- 
then Itationed. When they were colleaedj to the: 
araount.of between twenty-five and thirty thoufandj 
if was judged time to put the plan into execution., 
The miniftry who were then in office, and who were 
friendly to the Revolution, were inftantlydifmiffed, 
and anew miniftry formed of thofe who had con- 
carted the prcgefl: y — among whom was Count de 
Broglio, and to his ihare was given the command of ■ 
thofe troops. The chara6ler of this man, as de- 
fcribad to me in a letter which I communicated to 
Mr. Burke before lie began to write his book, and' 
from an authority which Mr. Burke well knows 

' was good, was that of " an high-flying- ariftocrat, 
*' cool, and capable of every mifchief." 

While thefe matters were agitating, the National" 
Affembly ftood in the moft: perilous and critical 
fituation that a body of men can be fuppofed to a£t 
in. ■ They were the devoted viftims, and they knew 
it. They had the hearts and vvilHes of their coun- 
try on their fide, but military authority they had 
none. The guards of Broglio furrounded the hall 
where 

Dgiw^dlvGOOglC 



wliere the aflembly fat, ready, at the vrord of com- 
mand, to feize their perfons, as had been done the 
year, before to the parliament of Palis. Had the 
National Affembly deferted their truft, or had they 
e^diibited ligtis of weaknefs or fear, their enemies 
had been encouraged, and the country depreffed. 
When the lituation they flood in, the caufe they 
were engaged in, and thecrifis then ready to burft 
which fliould determine their perfonal and political 
fate, and that of their country, and probably of 
Europe, are taken into one view, none but a heart 
callous with prejudice, or corrupted by dependance, 
can avoid interefting itfelf in their fuccefs. 

The archbifhop pf Vienne was at this time pre- 
Cdeht of the National Aflembly ■, a perfon too old 
to undergo the fcene that a few days, or a few 
hours, might bring forth. A man of more ac- 
tivity, ajid bolder fortitude, was necdlary ; and 
the National Affembly chofe (under the form of 
a vice-prefident, for the prefidency ftill refided 
in the archbilhop) M. de la Fayette ; and this 
is the only inftance of a vice-prehdent being 
chofen. It was at the moment that this ftorm was 
pending (July ii.) that a declaration of rights 
was brought forward by M. de la Fayette, 
and is the fame which is alluded to in page i ^. 
It was hailily drawn up, and makes only a part of 
a more extenlive declaration of rights, agreed upon 
and adopted afterwards by, the National Aflembly. 
The particular reafon for bringing it forward at 
this mtoment, ( M. de la Fayette has fince in., 
formed me ) was, that if the National Aflembly 
feould fall in .the threatened deflruclion that then 
furromided 



C »8 ] 
furrounded It, fome traces of its princ?ples might ■ 
have the chance of furviving the wreck. 

Every thing now was drawing to a crifis. The 
event was freedom or flavery. On one fide, an 
army of nearly thirty thoufand men j on the other, ; 
an unarmed body of citizens ; for the citizens of 
Paris, on whom the National Aflembly muft then 
immediately depend, were as unarmed and as un- 
difciplined as the citizens of London are now.-^ 
The French guards had given (Irong fymptoms of 
their being attached to the national caufe; but 
their numbers were fmall, not a tenth part of the 
force that Broglio commanded, and their officers 
were In the intereft of Broglio. 

Matters being now ripe for execution, the rtew 
miniftry made their appearance in office. The 
reader will carry in his mind, that the Baftille.was 
taken the 14th of July:, the point of time I am 
now fpeaking to, is the i2th. Immediately on 
the news of the change of miniftry reaching Paris 
in the afternoon, all the play-houfes and places of' 
entertainment, (hops and houfes, werefiiut up. The 
change of miniftry was confidered as the prelude of 
hoftiliiies, and the opinion was rightly founded. 

The foreign troops began to advance towards the 
city. The Prince de Lambefc, who commanded a 
body of German cavalry, approached by the Place of 
Lewis XV. which connefts itfelf with fome of the 
ftreets. In his march, he infulted and ftruck an 
old man with his fword. The French are re- ' 
markable for their refpeft to old age, and the in- 
folence with which it appeared to be done, uniting 
with the general fermentation the\' were in, pro- 
duced ' 

U;.t.z=dbv Google 



[ n ] 

duced a powerful cffe£t, and a cry of To arms ! to 
arms,' fpread itfelf in a moment over the city. 

Arms they had noi^, nor fcarcely any who knew 
the ufe of them : but defperate refolution, when 
every hope is at (take, fupplies, for a while, the 
want of arms. Near where the Prince de Lam- 
liefc was drawn up, were large piles of ftpnes 
colleSed for building the new bridge, and 
with thefe the people attacked the cavalry. A 
party of the French guards, upon hearing the 
firing, ruffled from their quarters and joined the 
people ; and night coming on the cavalry retreated. 

The ftreets of Paris, being narrow, are favour- 
able for defence ; and the loftinefs of the houfes, 
contifling of many ftories, from which great annoy- 
ance might be given, fecured them againd noftur- 
pal enterprifes; and the night was fpent in provid- 
ing themfelves with every fort of weapon they 
could make or procure: Guns, fwords,'black- 
fmiths hammers, carpenters axes, iron crows, 
pikes, halberts, pitchfork^, fpits, clubs, &c. &c. 

The incredible numbers with which they ^dTem- 
bled the next morning, and the ftill more 
incredible refolution they exhibited, embarraffed 
and aftonilhed their enemies. Little did the new 
miniftry expect fuch a falule. Accuftomed to 
flavery theniftlves, they had no idea that Li- 
berty was capable of fuch infpiration, or that a 
body of unarmed citizeps would dare to face the 
military force of thirty thpuiand men. Every 
moment of this day was employed in collecting 
arms, concerting plans, and pranging themfelves 
into the belt order which fuch an inftanianeous 
E movC' 



C 30 ]; 

roovement couU aSbrd. BrogUo continued lying 
round the city, but made no further advances this 
day, and the fucceeding night paffed ^ith as much 
tranquilUty as fuch a fcene could poffibly produce. 
But defence only was not the obje£l of the ci- 
tizens. They had a caufe at flake, on -which de- 
pended their freedom or their flavery. They 
every moment expefted an attack, or to hear of 
one made on the National AfTembly j and in fuch 
a fituation, the moft prompt meafures are fome- 
times the beft. The objeft that now prefented it- 
felf, was the Baftille-j and the eclat of carrying- 
fuch a fortrefe in the face of fuch an army, could 
not ^1 to ftrike a terror into the new niiniftry, 
who had fcarcely yet had time to meet. By fome 
intercepted correfpondence this morning, it was dif- 
covered, that the Mayor of Paris, M. Deffleffeiles, 
■who appeared to be in their intereft, was betray- 
ing them; and from this difcovery, there remained 
no doubt that Broglio would reinforce the Baf- 
tJUe the enfuing evening. It was therefore necef- 
fary to attack it that day; but before this could 
be done, it was firft neceffary to procure a better 
fupply of arms than they were then poffeffcd of. 

There was adjoining to the city, a large maga- 
zine of arms depofited at the Hofpital of the In- 
valids, which the citizens fummonfed to furrender; 
and as the place was not defenfible, nor attempted 
much defence, they foon fucceeded. Thus fup- 
plied, they marched to attack the Baftiile ; . a vaft 
mixed multitude of all ages, and of all degrees, 
and armed with all forts of weapons. Imagina- 
tion would fail in defcribing to itfelf the appear- 
ance 



•t 3' ] 
an« of fuch a proceffion, and of the anxiety for 
the events which a few hoars or a few minutes 
might produce. What plans the miniftry was 
fornjjng, were as unknown to the people within 
the city, as what the citizens were doing vas un- 
inowB to them s and what movements Broglio 
might m^e forthe fupport or relief of the place, 
■were to the citizens equally as unkaown. Ail wa« 
nyftcry and hazard. 

That the Baftillc was attacked with an enthufi- 
afin of heroifm, fuch only as the higheft animation 
<^ libo-ty could infpire, and carried in the fpace 
■of a few hours, is an event which the world is fully 
po&Ced of. I am not undertaking a detail of the 
jUtack, but bringing into view the confpiracy 
againlt the nation which provoked it, and which 
ieir with the Baftille. The prifon to which the 
new miniftry were dooming the National Aflera- 
bly, in addition to its being the high altar and 
<afUe of deffiotifm, became the proper objeft to 
begin with. This enterprife broke up the new 
miniftry, who began now to fly from the ruin they ' 
had prepared ibr others. The troops of Broglio 
difperfed, and himfelf fled alfo. 

Mr. Burke has fpoken a great deal about plots, 
but he has never once fpoken of this plot againft 
the National Aflembly, and the liberties of the 
nationj and that he might not, he has pafTed over 
all the circumftances that might throw it in his 
way. The exiles who have fled from France, 
whole cafe he fo much interefls himfelf in, and 
from whom he has had his lefTon, fled in confe- . 
^uence of the loifcarriage of this plot. No plot 



I 3^ 1 

"teas formed againfi: them : it wete they frho weffi 
■ plotting agaitift bthefs; and thofe who fell, met, 
■not unjuftly, the punifliment they were preparii^ 
to execute. But will Mr. Burke fay, that if this 
plot, contrived with the fubtlety of an arabiifcade, 
had fucceeded, the fucce&ful party wouM have 
reftrained their wrath fo foon? Let the hiftory of 
all old governments ahfwer the queftion. 

Whom has the National Affembly brought to 
the fcaffold ? None. They were themfelves the 
devoted ^piftims of this plot, and they have not re- 
taliated ; why then are they charged with revenge 
they have not afled ? In the tremendous breaking 
forth of a whole people, in which all degrees, 
tempers and charafters are confounded, and de- 
livering themfelves, by a miracle of exertion, fix)m 
the dellrufliion meditated againlt them, is it to be ' 
expefted that nothing will happen ? When men 
are fore with the fenfe of opprellions, and menaced 
with the profpefl: of new ofles, is the calmnefs of 
philofophy, or the palfy of infenfibility, to be looked 
for ? Mr. Burke exclaims againft outrage ; yet 
the greateft is that which himfelf has committed. 
His book is a volume of outrage, not apologized 
For by the impulfe of a moment, but cherilhed 
through a fpace of ten months; yet Mr. Burke 
had no provocation, no life, no intereft at flake. 

More citizens fell in this ftruggle than of their 
opponents : but four or five perfons were feized by 
the populace, and inftantly put to death ;■ the 
Governor of the Baftille, and the Mayor of Paria, 
who was dcteSed in the a£t of betraying them j 
and afterwards Foulon, oae of the new miniftry, 

and 



[ 33 3 

alid Berthdr his fon-in.Iaw, who had accepted 
the office of mtendant of Paris. Thar heads Were 
ftuck upon fpikes, and carried about the city; and 
it is upon this mode of punifhraent that Mr. 
- Burke builds a great part of his tragic fceneg. 
Let us therefore examine how men came by die 
idea of puniOiing in this manner. 

They learn it from the govemmente they live 
under, and retaliate the punifliments they have 
:been accuilomed to behold. The heads ftuck 
upM>n fpikes, which'^emained for years upon Tem- 
ple-bar, differed nothing in the horror of the 
fcene from thofe carried about upon fpikes at 
-Paris : yet this was done by the Englifh govem- 
-ment. It may perhaps be faid, that it figmfies no- 
thing to a man what is done to him aftei^ he is 
dead ; but it fignifies much to the living: it either 
'tortures their feelings, or hardens their hearts; and 
■ia either cafe, it inftructs them how to puniih 
when power hSs into their hands. • 

Lay then the axe to the root, and teach govern- 
ments humanity. It is their languinary punifli- 
ments which corrupt mankind. In England, the 
puntfliment in certain cafes, is by hangingy draw~ 
ingt and quartering; the heart of the fufferer it 
cut out, and held up to the view of the populace. 
In France, uitder the former government, the pu- 
nifliments were not lefs barbarous. Who does 
not remember the execution of Damien, tpm to 
pieces by horfes ? The effed of thofe cruel fpefta- 
cles eshibited to the populace, is to deftroy ten- 
demefs, or excite revenge ; and by the bafe and falfc 
idea of governing men by terror, inftead of reafon. 



r 34 ] . 

tbeybecome^Bcedents. Itisoverthelcrweftclafsof 
mankind that govemment toy terror is intended to 
■operate, and tfip on them that it operates to the 
•word "effeft. They haye ftaife enough to feel they 
are the objeAs aimed at ; and they infiift in their 
turn the esampfes of terror they haTe been in- 
ftru3:ed to praftife. 

TTiere we in all European countries, a brge 
ckUe of people of that defcription which in Eng- 
land are called the . ** moi." Of this clafs wer-e 
thofe ^rfio committed the bnmings and devafia- 
tions in London in 1780, and of this dais were 
thofe who carried the heads upon fpikes in Paris. 
Foulon and Berthier were taken up in the coun- 
try, and fent to Paris, to undergo their examina- 
tian at the Hotel de Ville ; for the NatiMial M- 
fcmWy, immediately on the new miniftry coming 
into office, paifed a decree, which they communi- 
-c«ed to the King and Cabinet, that they (the Na-. 
tional Affembly) would hold the minifiry, of 
which Foulon was one, refponfible for the mea- 
fures they were advifmg and purfuing ; .but the, 
' mob, incenffld at the appearance of Foulon and Ber- 
thier, tore them from their conduiQiors before 
ihey were carried to the Hotel de Ville, and exe- 
cuted them on .the fpot. Why then does Mr, 
Burke charge outrages of this kind on a whole 
people ? As well may he charge the riots and 
outrages of 1780 on all the people of London, 
or thctfc in Ireland on all his country. 

But every thing we fee or hear offenfive to our 
feelings, and derogatory to the human charafter, 
fliould lead to other refieftions than thofe of re- 
proach.^, ^ 



[ JS„ 1 

ptcaA. Even the beii^ who commit them hsve- 
fome claim to our confideration. How then is it 
that fach vaft cla0es of mankind as are diftin- 
guilhed by the appellation of the vulgar, or the ig- 
norant mob, sn-e fo numerous in all old coim- 
tries ? The inftant we alk ourfelves this queftiony 
refleftion feels an anfwer. They arife, as an un- 
avoidable confequence, out of the ill eonftruftioa 
of all the old governments in Europe, England in- 
cluded with the reft. It is by diftortedly exalting- 
fome men,that others are diftortedly debafed,tiH the 
whole is out of nature. A vaft mafs of mankind" 
are degradedly thrown into the back-ground of 
the human piSiure, to bring forwiffd, with greater 
glare, the puppet-lhow of ftate and ariftocracy. 
Jn the commencement of a Revolution, thofe 
men are rather the followers of the camp than of 
the Jiandard of liberty, and have yet to ■ be in- 
ftrudled how to reverence it. 

I give to Mr. Burke all his theatrical exaggera> 
ttons for fads, and I then alk him, if they do not 
eftablilh the certainty of what I here lay down i 
Admitting them to be true, they ftiew the neceffity 
of the French Revolution, as much as any one 
thing he could have alferted. Thefe outrages 
were not the effed of the principles of the Revo- 
lution, but of the degraded mind that exifted be- 
fore the Revolution, and which the Revolution 
is calculated to reform. Place them then to their' 
proper caufe, and take the reproach of them to 
your own fide. 

It is to the honour of theNatlonalAflembly, and 
the city of Paris, that during fuch a tremendous 



C 3« 3 

fcene of aims and ccmfofian, beyond the antroul 
of all authority, that they have been able, by the 
influence of example and exliortation, to reftrain 
fo much. Never were more pains taken to inftnid 
and entighten mankind, and to make them fee 
that thor intereft conftfted in their virtue, and 
not in their revenge, th^n what have been dif- 
pUyed in the Revolution of France. — I now proceed 
to make fome remarks on Mr. Burke's account of 
the expedition to Verfailles, Oftober 5tb and 6tb. 

I cannot confider Mr. Burke's book in fcarcely 
any other light than a dramatic performance > and 
he muft, I think, have confidered it in the fame 
light himfelf, by the poetical liberties he has ta- 
ken of omittiDg fome fa^, diftorting others, 
and making the whole machinery bend to produce 
a ftage effe£l. Of this kind is his account of the. 
expedition to Verf^les* He begins this account 
by omitting the only fafts which as caufes are 
known to be true; every thing beyond thefe is con- 
jeftorc even in Paris ; and he then works up a tale 
accommodated to his awn paflions and prejudices. 

It is to be obferved throughout Mr. Burke's 
book, that he never fpeaks of plots aga'ui/l the 
Revolution; and it js irom thofe plots that all the 
mifchiefs have arifen. It fuits his purpofe to exhi- 
bit the confequences without their caules. It is one 
of the arts of the drama to do fo. If the crimes 
of men were exhibited with their fufferings, the 
ftage effed would fometimes be loft, and the au- 
dience would be inclined to approve where it was 
intended they fhould commiferate. 

After all the inveftigations that have been made 
into this intricafc affair, (the expedition to Ver- 
failles), 



I 37 1 

lilies) it ftUI remains enveloped in all that Idnd 
of myftery which ever accompanies events produ- 
ced more from a concurrence of awkward circum- 
ftances, than from fixed defign. While the cha- 
raders of men are forming, as is always the cafe 
in revolutions, there is a reciprocal fufpicion, and 
- a difpofition to mifinterpret each other; arid even 
parties directly oppofite iii principle, will fometimes 
concur in pufhing forward the fame movement with 
very different views, and with the hopes of its pro-, 
ducing very different confequences. A great deal 
of this may be difcovered in this embarraffed affair, 
and yet the iffue of the whole was what nobody 
had in view. 

The only things certainly known, are, that con- 
fider^ble uneafmefs was at this time excited at Pa- 
ris, by the delay of the King in not fandioning 
and forwarding the decrees of the National Affem- 
bly, particularly that of the Declaration of the 
rigbu of Marif and the decrees of the fourth of 
Augufi^ which contained the foundation principles 
on which the conftitutjon was to be erefted. The 
kindeft, and perhaps the faireft conjefture upon this 
matter is, that fome of the minifters intended to 
make remarks and obfervations upon certain partg 
of them, before they were finally fanfljoned and 
fent to the provinces ; but be this as it may, the 
enemies of the revolution derived hopes from the 
delay, and the friends of the revolution, uneafmefs. 
Puring this ftate of fufpenfe, the Garde du 
Cor^s, which was compofed, as fuch regiments 
generally are, of perfons much connefted with the 
F .. Court, 

u^itiz^dbv Google 



[ 38 ] 

Court, gave an entertainment at Verfailles (Oft. i ,) 
to fome foreign regiments then arrived ; and wHen 
the entertainment was at the height, on a fignal 
given, the Garde du Corps tore the national cockade 
from their hats, trampled it under foot, and re- 
placed it with a counted cockade prepared for the 
purpofe. An indignity of this kind amounted tq, 
defiance. It was like declaring war ; and if men 
will give challenges, they muft expefl: confequen- 
ces. But all this Mr. Burke has carefully kept 
out of fight. He begins his account by faying, 
" Hiftoiy will record, that on the morning of the 
*' 6th of Oftober 1789, the King and Queen of 
*' France, after a day of confulion, alarm, difmay, 
*' and fiaughter, lay down under the pledged fecu- 
*' rity of public faith, to indulge nature in a few 
" hours of refpite, and troubled melancholy re- 
** pofe." 1 is is neither the fober fKIe of hif- 
tory, nor the intention of it. It leaves every thing 
to be gueffed at, and miftaken. One would at 
leaft think there had been a battle ; and a battle 
there probably would have been, had it not been 
for the moderating prudence of thofe whom Mr. 
Burke involves in his cenfures. By his keeping 
the Garde du Corps out of fight, Mr. Burke has 
afforded himfelf the dramatic licence of putting 
the King and Queen in their places, as if the ob- 
je£t of the expedition was againft them.. — But, to 
return to my account— 

This conduft of the Garde du Corps, as might 

well be expefted, alarmed and enraged the Pari- 

fians. The colours of the catife, and the caufe 

itfel^ 



i: 39 ] ■ • 

itfelf, Tirere become too united to miftake the in- 
tention of the infuh, and the Parifians were deter- 
mined to call the Garde du Corps to an account. 
There was certainly nothing of the cowardice of 
aff^nation in marching in the face of day to de- 
mand fatisfaftion, if fuch a phrafe may ^be ufed, 
of a body of armed men who had voluntarily 
given defiant^. But the circumftance which ferveS 
to throw this affair into embarraffment is, that the 
enemies of the revolution appear to have encoura-. 
ged it, as well as Its friends. The one hoped to 
prevent a civil war by checking it in time, and the 
other to make one. The hopes of thofe oppofed to 
the revolution, relied in making the King of their ' 
party, and getting him from Verfailles to Metz, 
where they expefted to colleft a force, and fet up 
a ftandard. We have therefore two different 
objefls prefenting themfelves at the fame time 
and to be accomphfhed by the fame means : the 
one, to chaftife the Garde du CorpSf which was 
the objeft of the Parifians j the other, to render 
the confufion of fuch a fcene an inducement to 
the King to fet off for Metz. 

On the 5th of Odober, a very numerous body 
of women, and men in the difguife of women, col- 
lefted round the Hotel de Ville or town-hall at 
Paris, and fet off for Verfailles. Their profeffed 
objeft was the Garde du Corps ; but prudent men 
readily recolleft that mifchief is eafier begun than 
ended; and this impreffed itfelf with the more 
force, from the fufpicions already ftated, and the 
irregularity of fuch a cavalcade. As foon ther&. 
fore as a fufficientforce could be colleaed, M. de In 
Pa Fayette, 

U;.t.z=dbv Google 



[ 4° ] 

FayeKe, by -orders from the civil authority of Paris, 
fet off after thera at the head of twenty thoufand 
of the Paris militia. The revolution could derive 
no benefit from confufion, and its oppofers might- 
By an amiable and fpirited manner of addrefs, he 
had hitherto been fortunate in calming difquietudes» 
and in this he was extraordinarily fuecefsful ; to 
fruftrate, therefore, the hopes of thofe who might 
feek to improve this fcene into a fort of juftifiable' 
neceffity for the King's quitting Verfailles and 
■withdrawing to Metz, and to prevent at the fame 
time the confequences that might enfiie between 
tUe Garde du Corps and this phalanx of men and 
women, he forwarded expreffes to the King, thai 
he was on his march to Verfailles, afthe orders 
of the civil authority of Paris, for the purpofe of 
peace and protection, exprefling at the fame time 
the neceffiry of reftraining the Garde du Corps 
from firing upon the people*. 

He arrived at Verfailles- between ten and eleven 
at night. The Garde du Corps was drawn up» 
and the people had arrived fome time before, but 
every thing had remained fufpended. Wifdom 
and policy now confifted in changing a fcene of 
danger into a happy event. M. de la Fayette 
became the mediator between the enraged parties ; 
and the King, to remove the uneafinefs which 
had arifen from the delay already ftaled, fent for 
* the Prefident of the National Aifembly, and fignpd 
the Declaration of the rights sf Man, and fuch 
other parts of the conftitution as were in readinefs. 

• I am warranted in alfcrting tlii», as I had it perfonally from M. 
An la Fayette, with whom 1 havt lived in habits of friendfliip for 
lourtten years. 

It 

i);".'ibyC,00'^lc 



i: 4- ] 

- It was now about one in the moraing. Every 
thing appeared to be compofed, and a gener^ ^ 
congratulation took place. At the beat of 
drum a proclamation was made, that the citizens 
of Verfailles would give the Kofpitality of their 
houfes to their fellow-citizens of Paris. . Thofc 
who could not be accommodated in this manner, 
remained in the ftreets, or took up their quarters, 
in the churches, j and at two o'clock the King and 
Queen retired. 

In this ftate matters palTed till the break of day, 
■when a frefli diilurbance arofe from the cenfurable 
conduft of fome of both parties, for fuch charac- 
ters there will be in all fuch fcenes. One of the 
Carde du Corps appeared at one of the, windows 
of the palace, and the people who had remained 
during the night in the ftreets accofted him with 
reviling and provocative language. Inftead of 
retiring, as in fuch a cafe prudence would have 
dilated, he prefented his mufket, fired, and kil- 
led one of the Paris militia. The peace being 
thus broken, the people ruftted into the palace in 
queft of the offender. They attacked the quarters 
of the Garde du Corps within the palace, and pur- 
fued them throughout the avenues of it, and to 
the apartments of the King. On this tumult, not 
the C^een only, as Mr. Burke has reprefented it, 
but every perfon in the, palace, was awakened and 
alarmed ; and M. de la Fayette had a fecond time 
to interpofe between the parties, the event of 
which was, that the Garde du Corps put on the 
national cockade, and the matter ended as by 
«bUvioli, after the lofs of two or three lives. 

Soring 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



t 4« 1 

During the laittf part of the timfe in which 
thift confuli6a was ailing, the KJng and Queen 
Were in public *.t the balcony, and neither of 
them concealed fot fafety's fake, as Mr. Burke in- 
fifiuatts. MAtteri being thus appeafed, and tran- 
qilillity reftored, a geiio-al acclamation broke forth^ 
of Le Rot (J Paris—Le R«i a Paris — The King to 
Paris. It was the fliout of peace, and immediately 
dcce{)t€d 6n the part of the King. By this mea- 
fure, all future projefts of trapanning the King to 
Metz, and fetting up the ftandard of oppoiition 
to the conftitution, were prevented, and the fufpi- 
ciofts txlingailhed. The King and his family 
reached Paris in the erening, and were congratu- 
lated on their arrival by M. Bailley the Mayor of 
Paris, in the name of the citizens. Mr. Burke, 
who throughout his book confounds things, per- 
fons, and principles, has in his remarks on M. 
Baillcy's addtefs, confounded, time alfo. He cen- 
(ufes M. Bailley for calling it, " un bon joitr" 2 
good day. Mr. Butke fliould have informed him- 
feif, that this fcene took up the fpace of two days, 
the day oil which it began with every appearancfc 
of danger and mifchief, and the day on which it 
terminated without the mifchiefs that threatened j 
and that it is to this peaceful termination that 
M. Bailley alludes, and to the arrival of the King 
at Paris. Not lefs than *hree hundred thoufand 
perfons arranged themfelves in the proceffion from 
Verfailles to Paris, and not an adt of moleftation 
was committed during the whole march. 

Mr. Burke, on the authority of M. Lally Tollen- 

dal, a deferter from the National Affembly, fays, 

A that 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



[ 43 5 

that on wtMing Paris, the people fiiouted, ** Toittlu 
wequei a la iantfrne." AH Bi^op^ te b« haag^d at 
the lanthorn or lamp-pDfta.-r-It is furpiifing that 
nobody fhottld hear this but I^ally ToWendal, and 
that nobody ftiould believe it but Mr. Burke. It 
has not the le^H coqnedion with any part of th^ 
tranfaciiQn,' and is totally foreign- to «very cif- 
cumftance of it. The tjllhops have never b$a% 
iptroduced before into any fcene of Mr- Burke** 
drama; Why then are they» all at once, apdaltp- 
gether, tout a cm4p ett^m ^t^ftmki^, latroducfld now ? 
Mr. Burke brings forward big bifhops aQ4 hit la^t 
thorn like figures in a magic lanth<;kr{\, and raife^ 
his fcenes by contrail iaftead of (;onne£tio.n. But . 
it ferve! to (hew, with the reft of his book, what 
little credit ought to be given, where even - proba- 
bility is fet at defiance, for the purpofe of de- 
faming ; and with this refieftion,, inftead of a fp. 
liloquy in praife of chivalry, as Mr. Burke has 
done, I clofe the account of the expedition to 
Verfailles *. 

I have now to follow Mr. Burke through a path- 
lefswildernefs of rhapfodies, and a forl'of defcant 
upon governments, in which he afferts whatever 
he pleafes, on the prefumption of its being be- 
lieved, without offering eitlier evidence or reafons 
for fo doing. 

Before any thing can be reafoned upon to a 
ponclufion, certain fads, principles, or data^ td 
reafon from, inull be eftablifiied, admitted, or de- 

■ An account of the fxpedition to Vwfallles may be feen m No. 
jj. of the Rtvahttim i(e Farii, ^n^iuniiiS tlx tvtnU from the jd to 
the loth of OflotKi 1789. 

nied. 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



C t4 ] 

Bied. Mr. Burke, with his ufual outrage, abufes ■ 
the Declaration of the rights of Man, publiflied by 
the National Affembly of France as the bafis on 
■which the conftitution of France is built. This he 
calls ** paltry and blurred fheets of paper about the 
rights of man." — Does Mr. Burke mean to deny 
that man has any rights ? If he does, then he muft 
mean that there are no fuch things as rights any 
where, and that he has none himfelf ; for who is 
there in the world but man ? But if Mr.' Burke 
means to admit that man has rights, the queftion 
the5i will be, -What are thofe rights, and how came 
man by them originally ? 

The error of thofe who rcafon by precedents 
drawn from antiquity, refpefting the rights of man, 
is, that they do not go far enough into antiquity. 
They do not go the whole way. They (top in 
fome of the intermediate ftages of an hundred or 
a thoufand years, and produce what was then done 
as a rule for the prefent day. This is no authority 
at 3II. If we travel ftill farther Into antiquity, we 
fliall find a direQ: contrary opinion and pra^ice 
prevailing ; and if antiquity is to be authority, a 
thoufand fuch authorities may be produced, fuc- 
<;effively contradifting each other: But if we pro- 
ceed on, we fhall at lafl: come out right ; we Ihall 
come to the time whet^ man came from the hand 
of his Maker. What was he then f Man, Man 
was his high and only title, and a higher cannot 
be given him. But of titles I fhall fpeak here- 
after. , 

We are now got at the origin of man, and at 
the origin of his rights. As to the manner in 

which 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



E 45 3 

fchich the world has been governed from that day 
to this, it is DO farther any concern of ours than 
to make a proper ufe of the errors or the improve- 
ments which the hiftory of it prefents. Thofe who 
lived a hundred or a thoufand years ago, were theii 
moderns as we are now. They had their ancients,, 
and thofe ancients had others, and we alfo Ihall be 
imcients in our turn. If the mere name of ^nti> 
quity is to govern in the affairs of life, the people 
■who are to live an hundred or a thoufand years 
hence, may as well take us for a precedent, as we 
make a precedent of thof? who lived an hundred 
or a thoufand years ago. The fafl is, that por- 
tions of antiquity, by proving every thing, eftabliJh 
nothing. It is authority againft authority all the 
■way, til! we come to the divine origin of the rights 
of man at the creation. Here our enquiries find 
a refting-place, and our reafon finds a home. If 
a difpute about the rights of man had arofe at the 
diftance of an hundred years from the creation, it 
is to this fource of authority they muft have re- 
ferred, and it is to the fame fource of authority 
that we muft now refer. 

Though I mean not to touch upoft any feflarian 
principle of religion, yet it may -be worth obferv- 
ing, that the genealogy of Chrift is traced to Adam. 
Why then not trace the rights of man to the crea- 
tion of man? I will imfwer the queftion. -Be- 
caufe there have been an upllart of governments, 
thrufting themfelves between, and prefumptuoufly 
working to un-make man. 

If any generation of men ever pofleffed the light 

of dilating the mode by which the world ihould 

G "be 



be ^v«roed f«r ev«r, it vae the firll genera^n 
that exilled ; and if that generation did not do it, 
no fitcc«ifding generatitm can fliew aay authwitj 
for doing if, oor Set any i^ The iUunuBai&ng 
Mid divine principle of the e(]ual right» «f man^ 
(£or it has iu origin from the Maker of man) re^ 
btes, aot only to the living individuals,, but to ge- 
netatincs of men JiiccBeding «aeb other. Every 
generation is c^josi in rights te the g«nerati<»i» 
vhich preceded it, bf the fame rule that ev«ry in- 
^vidual is Wra equal in rights with hi*- cotempof 

£ver^ hi&oTf o£ the creatioB,. »id every tradi- 
fioivary account, -whether from the lettered or ua- 
ItHiefed World} however they may vary in &&w 
cpistion of befief of e^Eiia fwrt^oilars, sH 9gree ia 
efiablifUBg one poiat, the umly of vmn ; by whidb 
\ mean thatmaa is all of svtf d^M, and Cfu^e- 
q^ently that alt men are bctfnequfiJ, and with equal 
ttattn^i righUj in the femd isitnnO' ae if pofterity 
Md be^n continuid by cttatim inftead of geruro- 
t'un, the latter beiftg only die node by which the 
fomrer is carried forward \ afld conieqjliently, every 
chotd born into tbd w«X'ld bu^ be coafidered as 
<)eri^g its eulteaee frbn God. The world is as 
new to hiia as it Wifs to the iirft bms that eltiAedy 
and hid natural right ibit is of the tune kind. 

The Mofaic acc9vtnt of the creation, whether 
ta&en as divine autbority^ or merely hiitorical, is 
fully up to this point, the tmity or equality of man~ 
The expreffions admit of no cMitroverfy. ** And 
** God f^d. Let HS make man in our own image. 
" In the image of God ereated he hi» i male and 
« female 



w ft^iialip ^«mi he tbem." The diitiaSipn ot 

feves is {tCHQEed 9Vt, bttt hq other dUUndioii i» 
even in^ed- If this be WA divine authority, it 
ij at lead .luApriPttl a^ortty, ,a«d fhews that tb<F 
equality of man,' fo far from being.* roodcfB dpc j 
nine, is the oldeft upon record. 

It 16 alfo to be obferved, that all the rdigipn^ 
known in t^ wwld are founded, fofar at thef 
relate to man, on the unity i^man, as being all of 
one degree, Whetfi^ in heaven or in hell, or ia 
whatever Itate man may be foppafed to jezift %ce* 
afier, the good and the bad are the only distinc- 
tions. Kay, even the laws of governments axe 
<d]dig«d to fUde into this principle, by making de- 
gress to cotifift in x:rimes, and not in perfons. 

It is one of the greateft of all truths, aod of tlw 
higliefl: adv^tage to cultivate. By conOdmng 
raas in this light, and by infkuding him to coafi* 
dra- himfelf in this light, it places him in a cla£r 
coaae&ion with all his duties, whether to his Cre* 
ator, or to the creation,of which he is a part ; aod 
it is cMily when be forgets his origin, or, to uie ,a. 
mose ^xihionable phrafe, his birth and famly, tliaC 
he [becomes dliTolute. it is not .among the leaA of 
the eviU of the prdent ezifting governments ia 
all {jarts of Europe, that man, coofidered as roan, 
is thrown back to a vaft diftance from his Maker, 
and the artificial chaiin filled up by a Xucceflion of 
harrisra., or a fort of. turnpike gates, through which 
he has to pals.' I will quote Mr. Burke's catalogae 
of bwriers sAat he has fet up bf twoen jnan and his 
Maker. Putting hin^elf i^ the charafter of a h&- 
*al4, he iays?<r-*' We lear God'— we took wUhjeuf 
G a "to 



[ 4S ] 

** to , kings— with affcftion to parliaments— with 
**duty to magiftrates— with reverence to priefts, 
** and with refpeft to nobility." Mr. Burke has 
forgot to put in *' chivalry." He has aUb forgot 
to put in Peter. 

The duty of man is not a wildemefs of turnpike 
gates, through which he is to pafs by tickets from 
one to tht other. It is plain and fimple, and con- 
fifts but of two points. His duty to God, which 
every man muft feel ^ and with refpefl: to his 
neighbour, to do as he would be done by. If thofe 
to whom power is delegated do welt, they wilt be 
refpeSed } if not, they will be defpifed : . and with 
regard to thofe to whom no power is delegated, 
but who affume it, the rational world can know 
nothing of them. 

.Hitherto we have fpoken only (and that but in 
part) of the natural rights of man. We have now 
to confider the civil rights of man, and to fliew 
how the one originates out of the other. Man did 
not enter into fociety to become loorfe than he was 
before, nor to have lefs rights than he had before, 
but to have thofe rights better fecured. His natu- 
ral rights are the foundation of all his civil rights. 
But in order to purfue this diftinftion with more 
precifion, it will be neceffary to mark the different 
qualities of natural and civil rights. 

A few words wiil explain this. Natural rights are 
thofe which appertain to man in right of his exift.- 
ertce. Of this kind are all the imelleftuai rights, or 
rights of the mind, and alfo all thofe rights of aft- 
• ing as an individual for his own comfort and hap- 
Yiaefs, which are aot injurious to the natural right* 

of 



C 49 1 

of others. Civil rights are thofe which aj^Kr- 

twn to man in right of his being a member of So. 
ciety. Every civil right has for its foundation 
fome natural right pre-exifting in the individual, 
but to which his individual power is not, in aU 
cafes, fufEciently competent. Of this kind are ail 
ihofe which relate to fecurity and protefljoo. 

From this fliort review, it will be eafy- to diftin- 
gBifli between, that cl^s, of natural rights which 
man retains after entering into fociety,, and thofe 
vhich he throws into common ilock as a memb^ 
£}[ fociety. 

The natural .rights wUch he retains, are all thofe 
in which the power to execute is as perfeft in the 
individual as the right itfelf. Among this clafs, as 

before mentioned, are all the intelleftual rights, 
pr rights of the mind : confeq'uently, religion ix 
pne of thofe rights. The natural rights which ax* 
not retained, are all thofe in which, though the 
right is perfect; in the individual, the power to exe> 
-cute theni is defeftive. They anfwer not his pur- 
pofe. A man, by natural right, has a right to 
judge in his own caufe ; and fo fer as the right of 
ihe mind is concerned, he never furrenders it : But 
Jivhat availeth it him to judge, if he has not power 
io redrefs ? He therefore depofits this right in the 
-common ftock of fociety, and takes the arm of fo- 
ciety, of which he is a part, in preference' and in 
addition to his own. Society grants him nothing. 
Every man is a proprietor in fociety,. and draws on 
the capital as a matter of right. 
■ Fromthofe premife6,'-two or three cCTtan con- 
xlufions will follow. 

Firft, 

D;.l....lbyC,OOl^L 



C 5«» 1 

'^ PMt, Hiat every dvU right grom ant ef' a inu 
4!«nt right ; or, m oth«- wortis, is a natural right 

■ Secondly, That dvil power, properly conlidered 
as fuch, M made tip of the aggregate of thA daft 
of the aaturat rights of mui, whidi bectxnet <lcf«c> 
tive in the individual in point d power, and an* 
fwers not his purpofe ; bat when colIeAed to a 
fooUj beccsnes competent te the purple of rrery 
one. 

Thirdly, TTiat the power prodneed from the ajC 
gregate of natural rights, imperfefl in power in the 
Inditidiiat, cannot be applied to invade the natvral 
rights which are retained in the mdividtt^, and in 
■which the power to Kceonte h as perfed as the 
Hght itfalf. 

W^ have Aofr, «i a few wovdt, traced man from 
a natural individutd to a raembo' of fodety, and 
&ews, or endeavodred to (hew, the quaSty of dkc 
Rotiaral rights ret»ned, and o£ tiv^e wluch are ez- 
dianged for dvil rights. Let vs aow apply Ao(c 
prindpies to governments. 

In ciftktg our eyes over tbeworld, it u e xt re ro cly 
fzff to diftinguifh tbe governments which have 
arifeaoutof fociety, or out of the focial compa^ 
frtm thofe wHch have not : but to place this in a 
ciearer Jjght than what a fii^e glance may afiord^ 
it wU! be propw to t^e a review of the feveral 
fources lr«to which govi»nmeats have arifen, and 
en whMi they have been fouoded. 

They may be all coB^rehended under three 
lieads.- Firft, SuperlUtioa. Secondly, Power. 
1 Thirdly, . 

U5.t.s..lb,.C00ljlC .. 



t 5- 1 

Thirdly, the common intereft of fociety, and tiie 
common rights of man. 

'' The firit was a government of prieftcraft, the 
fecdnd of conquefors, and the third of reafon. 

When a fet of artful men pretended, through 
the medium of oracles, to hold intercourfe with the 
Deity, as familiarly as they now march up the back.' 
Hairs in European courts, the world was completely 
under the government of fuperftition. The oracles 
were confulted, and whatever they were made to 
fay, became the law j and this fort of government 
laited as long as this fort of fuperlUtion lafted. 

After thefe a race of conquerors arofe, whofe 
government, like that of William the Conquerorj 
was founded in power, and the fword affumed the 
name of a fcepter. Governments thus eftablilhed, 
lart: as long as the power to fupport them lafts j 
but that they might avail themfelves of every 
engine ia their favour, they united fraud to force, 
and fet up an idol which they called Divine Right, - 
and which, in imitation of the Pope, who affeds 
to be fpiritual and temporal, and in contradi£Hon 
to the Founder of the Chriftian religion, twilled 
itfelf afterwards into an idol of another fhape, 
called Church and State. The key of St. Peter, 
and the key of the Treafury, became quartered on 
' one another, and the wondering cheated multitude 
worlhipped the invention. 
. When I contemplate the natural dignity of man ; 
when I feel(for Nature has not been kind enough 
to me to blunt my feelings) for the honour and 
happinefs of its character, I become irritated at the 
attempt to govern mankind by force and fraud, as 



t 5= ] 

if they were all knaves and fools, and can Icarcely f 
avoid dilguft at thofe who are thus impofed upon. 

We have now to review the governments which 
arife out of fociety, in contradiftinftion to thofe 
which arofe out of fuperftltion and conqueft. 

It has been thought a conliderable advance to- 
wards eftablifliing the principles of Freedom, to fay, 
that government is a compaft between thofe who 
govern and thofe who are governed : hot this can- 
not be true, becaufe it is putting the e&:& before 
the caufe; for as man mull have exifted before 
governments exifted, there neceffarily was a time 
when governments did not exift, and confequently 
there could originally exift no governors to form 
fucha compact with. The feft therefore muft be, 
that the individuals ihemfelves, each in his own 
perfonal and fovereign right, entered into a eompa^ 
with each other to produce a government : and this 
is the only mode in which governments have a 
right to arife, and the only principle on which they 
have a right to exift. 

To poffefs ourfelves of a clear idea of what go- 
vernment is, or ought to be, we muft trace it to 
its origin. In doing this, we flail eafUy difcover 
that governments muft have arifen, either eui oi the 
people, or over the people. Mb. Burke has made 
no diftiadion. He inveftigates nothing to its 
fource, and therefore he confounds every thing : 
but he has fignified his intention of undertaking 
at fome future opportunity, a comparifon between 
the conftituiions of England and Frances As be 
thus renders it a fubjeft of cotttroverfy by throwti^ 
the gauntlet, I take Irim .up on his owa ground. 

It 



[ S3 ] 

It is in high challenges that high truths have the 
right of appearing ; and I accept it with the more 
readinefs, becaufe it affords me, at the fame time, 
an opjMFtunity of purfuing the fubjefl: with refpeft 
, to governments arifing out of fociety. 

But it will be firfl: neceffary to define what is 
meant by a canjiituiion. It is not fufficient that we 
adopt the word j we muft fix alfo a ftandard figni- 
fication to it. 

A conftitution is not a thing in name only, but 
in fai^. It has not an ideal, but a real exigence ; 
and wherever it cannot be produced in a vifible 
form, there is none. A conftitution is a thing an- 
teeedent to a governmfent, and a government is only 
the creature of a conftitution. The conftitution 
of a country is not the a£t of its government, but 
of the pec^Ie conftituting a government. It is the 
body of elements, to which you can refer, anj 
quote article, by article ^ and which contains the 
principles on which the government (hall be efta- 
bliflied, the manner in which it (hall be organized, 
the powers it (hall have, the mode of eleftions, the 
duration of parliaments, or by what other name 
fuch bodies may be called j the powers which the 
executive part of the government ftiall have ; and, in 
fine, every thing that relates to the compleat orga- 
nization of a civil government, and the principles 
on which it Ihall a£l, and by which it fliall be 
bound. A conlUtution, therefore, is to a gov«n- 
ment, what the laws made afterwards by that go- 
vernment are to a court of judicature. The court 
of judicature dpes not make the laws, neither can 
H it 

L);.l..=.JbvGOOgk- 



C 54 3 

It alter them j it only afls in conformity to the latva 
made ; and the government is in like manner go- 
verned by the cpnftitution. 

Can then Mr. Burke produce the Englifli Confti- 
tution ? If he cannot, we may fairly conclude, that 
though it has been fo much talked about, no 
fuch thing as a conftilution exilts, or ever did 
exift, and confequently that the people have yet 
a conftitution to form. 

Mr. Burke will not, I prefume, deny the pofition 
I have already advanced; namely, that govern- 
ments arife either out of the people, or over the 
people. The Englifli government is one of tbofe 
which arofe out of a conqueft, and not out of 
fociety, and confequently it arofe over the people; 
and though it has been much modified from the 
opportunity of circumftances fmce the time of 
William the Conqueror, the country has neyer yet 
regenerated itfelf, and is therefore without a 
conftitution. 

I readily perceive the reafon why Mr. Burke 
declined going into the comparifon between the 
Englifli and French conftltutions, becaufe he could 
not but perceive, when he fat down to the talk, that , 
no fuch thing as a conftitution exifted on his fide 
the queflion. His book is certainly bulky enough 
to havb contained all he could fay on this fubje^t, 
and it. would have been the befl: manner in which 
people could have judged of their feparate merits. 
Why then has he declined the only thing that was 
worth while to write upon ? It was the ftrongeft 
ground he could take, if the advantages were on 

his 



.1 ss 1 

his fide ; but the weakeft, if they were not ;- and 
his declining to take it, is either a fign that he 
could not poffefs it, or could not maintain it. 

Mr. Burke has faid in a fpeech lafl; winter in- 
parliament, that when the National Affembly 
firft met in three Orders, (the Tiers Etats, the 
Clergy, and the Noblefle), that France had then 
a good conftitution. This ftiews, among nume- 
rous other inftances, that Mr. Burke does not 
underftand what a conftitution is. The perfons fo 
met, were not a conjiitution, but a convention to 
make a conftitution. 

The prefent National Affembly of France is, 
ftriaiy fpeaking, the perfonal fecial compact. — 
The members of it are the delegates of the na- 
tion in its original charafter ; future affembiies 
will be the delegates of the nation in its organized 
charafter. The authority of the prefent Affembly 
is different to what the authority of future Affem- 
biies will be. The authority of the prefent one 
is to form a conftitution : the authority of future' 
Affembiies will be to legiflate according to the 
principles and forms prefcribed in that conftitu- 
tion ; and If experience ftiould hereafter ffiew that 
aherations, amendments, or additions are necef- 
fary, the conftitution will point out the mode by 
which fuch things Ihall be done, and not leave it 
to the difcretionary power of the future govern- 
ment. 

A government on the principles on which con- 
ftitutional governments arifing out of fociety are 
eftabUfhed, cannot have the right of altering itfelf. 
If it had, it would be arbitrary. It inight make 



C 56 ] 

itielf what it pleafed ; and wherever fuch a right 
is fet up, it Diews there is no conftitution. The 
adt by which the Englifh Parliament empowered 
itfelf to fit feven years, ihews there is no conftitu- 
tion in England. It might, by the fame felf-au- 
thority, have fit any greater number of years, or 
for life. The Bill which the prefent Mr. Pitt 
brought into parliament fome years ago, to reform 
parliament, was on the fame erroneous principle. 
The right of refcym is in the nation in its original 
charafter, and the conftitutional method wouM be 
by a general convention elefted for the purpofe. 
There is moreover a paradox in the idea of vitia- 
ted bodies reforming themfelves. 

, From thefe preliminaries t proceed to draw 
fome comparifons. I have already fpoken of the 
declaration of rights ; and as I- mean to be as con- 
cife as poffible, I fliall proceed to other parts of 
the French conftitution. 

The conftitution of France fays, that every maa 
who pays a tax of fixty fous per annwii, (2s. and 
6d. Englifli), is an elefl:or. — What article will 
Mr. Burke place againft this? Can any thing 
be more limited, and at the fame time more capri- 
cious, than what the qualifications of eleftors are 
in England ? Limited — becaufe not one man in an 
hundred (I fpeak much within compafs) is admit- ' 
ted to vote : Capricious — becaufe the loweft cha- 
rafter that can be fuppofed to exift, and who has 
not fo much a? the vifible means of an honeft Hve- 
lihood, is an eleftor in fome places ; while, in 
other places, the man who pays very large taxes, 

and 



[ 57 ] 
and with a fair known charaiSer, and the farmer 
who rents to the amount of three or four hundred 
pounds a year, and with a property on that farm 
to three or four times that amount, is not admit- 
ted to be an eleftor. Every thing is out of nature, 
as Mr. Burke fays on another occafion', in this 
ftrange chaos, and all forts of follies are blended 
with all forts of crimes. William the Conqueror 
and his defcendants parcelled out the country in 
this manner, and bribed one part of it by what they 
called Charters, to hold the other parts of it the 
better fubjeded totheirwill. Thisis the reafonwhy 
fo nlany of thofe Charters abound in Cornwall. 
The people were averfe to the government efta- 
bliflied at the conqueft, and the towns were garri- 
foned and bribed to enilave the country. AH the 
old Charters are the badges of this conqueft, and 
it is from this fource that the capricioufnefs of 
eleftions arife. . 

The French conftitution fays, that the number 
of reprefentatives for any place Ihall be in a ratio 
to the number of taxable inhabitants or eled:ors. 
What article will Mr. Burke place againft this ? 
The county of Yorkftiire, which contains near a 
million of fouls, fends two county members ; and 
fo does the county of Rutland, which contains not 
an hundredth part of that number. The town of 
old Sarum, which contains not three houfes, fendi^ 
two members; and the town of Manchefter, which. 
contains upwards of fixty thoufand fouls, is not ad- 
mitted to fend any. Is there any principle in thefo 
things? Is there any thing by which you caa 
trace 



[ 58 ] 

trace the marks of freedom, or difcover thofe of 
wifdom ? No wonder then Mr. Burke has decli- 
ned the comparifon, and endeavoured to lead 
his readers from the point by a wild unfyftemalical 
difplay of paradoxial rhapfodles. 

The French conftitution fays, that the National 
AiTembly fliall be eledcd every two years. — What 
article will Mr. Burke place againft this ? Why, 
that the nation has no right at all in the cafe : 
that the government is perfeftly arbitrary with 
refpefl. to this point ; and he can quote for his au- 
thority, the precedent of a former parliament. 

The French conftitution fays, there Ihall be no 
game laws ; that the farmer on whofe lands wild 
game fliall be found (for it is by the produce of 
thofe lands they are fed) fhall have a right to what 
he can take. That there (hall be no monopolies 
of any kind — that all trade fhall be free, and every 
man free to follow any occupation by which he can 
procure an honeft livelihood, and in any place, 
town or city throughout the nation. — What will 
Mr. Burke fay to this ? In England, game is made 
the property of thofe at whofe expence it is not 
fed i and with refped to monopolies, the country 
is cut up into moftopolies. Every chartered town 
is an arillocratical monopoly in itfelf, and the 
qualification ofeleftors proceeds out of thofe char- 
tered monopolies. Is this freedom ? Is this what 
Mr. Burke means by a conftitution ? 

'Inthefe chartered monopolies, a man coming 
from another part of the country, is hunted from 
them as if he were a foreign enemy. An Englifh- 

mm 

U;.t.z=dbv Google 



C 59 ] 

jilan is not free of his own country : every one of 
thofe places prefents a barrier in his way, and tells 
him he is not a freeman — that he has no rights. 
Within thefe monopolies, are other monop>olies. 
A city, fuch for inftance as Bath, which contains 
between twenty and thirty thoufa'nd inhabitants, 
the right of eleding reprefentatives to parliament 
is monopolifed into about thirty-one perfona. 
And within thefe monopolies are ftiU others. A 
man even of the fame town, whofe 'parents were 
not in circumAances to give him an occupation, is 
debarred, in many cafes, from the natural right of 
acquiring one, be his genius or induftry what it 
may. 

Are thefe things examples to hold out to a coun- 
try regenerating itfelf from (lavery, like France ? — 
Certainly theyare not j and certain am I, that when 
the people of England come to refleft upon, them, 
they will, like France, annihilate thofe badges of 
ancient oppreffion, thofe traces of a conquered na- 
tion. — Had Mr. Burke poffeffed talents fimilar to 
the author *' On the Wealth of Nations," he would 
have comprehended all the parts which enter into, 
and, by aflemblage, form a conftitution. He 
would have reafoned from minutiae to magnitude. 
It is not from his prejudices only, but from the 
diforderly call of his genius, that he is unfitted 
for the fubjeft he writes upon. Even his genius 
is without a conftitution. It is a genius at random, 
and not a genius conftituted. But he muft fay 
fomething — He has therefore mounted in the air 
like a balloon, to draw the eyes of the multitude 
from the ground they ftand upon. 

Muck 



C So 3 

Much is to be learned from the French conftl- 
tution. Conqueft and tyranny tranfplanted them- 
felves with William the Conqueror from Normandy 
into England, and the country is yet disfigured 
with the marks. May then the example of all 
France contribute to regenerate the freedom which 
a province of it deftroyed 1 

The French conftitution fays. That to preferve 
the national reprefentation from being corrupt, 
bo member of the National Affembly flialt he an 
officer of the government, a place-man, or a pen- 
fioner. — What will Mr. Burke place againft this ? 
I will whifper his anfwer : Loaves 2.ni\JiJhes. Ah! 
this government of loaves and fiflies has more mif- 
chief in it than people have yet reflefted on. ■ The 
National Affembly has made the difcovery, and it 
holds out the example to the world. Had govern- 
ments agreed to quarrel on purpofe to fleece their 
countries by taxes, they could not have fucceeded 
better than they have done. 

Every thing in the Englifli government appears 
to me the reverie of what it ought to be, and of 
what it is faid to be. The parUament, imperfeflly 
and capricioufly elefted as it is, is neverthelefs fup- 
■pofed to hold the national purfe in trujl for the 
nation : but in the manner in which an Englifh 
parliament is conftrufted, it is like a man being 
both mortgager and mortgagee ; and in the cafe 
of mifapplication of truft, it is the criminal fitting 
in judgment upon himfelf. if thofe who vote the 
fuppHes are the fame perfcns who receive the fup- 
plies when voted, and are to account for the expen- 
dilure of thofe fuppUes to thofe who voted them. 



C 6' 3 ■ , 

it IS thsmfehes aecouniable to ibemfshes, and the Co- 
medy of Errors concludes with the Pantomime of 
Hush. Neither the minifterial party, nor the op- 
pofitlon, will touch upon this cafe. The national-, 
purfe is the common hack which each mounts up- 
on: It is like what the country people call, '* Hide 
*' and tie — You ride a little way, and then I"." — 
They order thefe things better in France. 

The French conftitution fays, that the right of 
war and peace is in the nation. Where elfe ftiould: 
it relide, but in thofe who are to pay the expence ? 

In England, this right is faid to rfifide in a meta- 
phor, fcewn at the Tower for fixpence or a ftiilling 
a-piece:*fo are the lions ; and it would be a ftep 
nearer to reafon to fay it refided in them, for any 
inanimate metaphor is no more than a hat or a cap. 
We can all fee the abfurdity of worlhipping Aa- 
ron's molton. calf, or Nebuchadnezzar's golden 
image ; but why do men continue to praftife in 
themfelves, the abfurdities they defpife in others ? 

It may with reafon be faid, that in the manner 
the Englifti nation is reprefented, it fignifies ' 
not where this right refides, whether in the crown 
or in the parliament. War is the common harvelt 
of all thofe who participate in the divifion and ex- 
penditure of public money, in all countries. It 
is the art of conquering at borne : the obje£t of it is 

* It it a praflice in fome parts of the country, when two travellers 
e horfe, which like the national puife will not carry dou- 
- " oar three miles a-head, aod 

gn. When the fecond U'ave!- 
1, and pafTo his companion a 
—Ridf aitdtie. 

an 



ble, thai the one m 
then ties the horfe t 
Jer arrives, he taks 
mile or two, and ti 


ounu and rides tw 

agile, and walks 
the horfe, rides o 

1 again ; anil fo on- 




I 



[ 62 ] 

sn increafe of levenue j and as revenue cannot be 
increafed without taxes, a pretence mufl be made 
for expenditures. In reviewing the hiftory of the 
Eoglifli government, its wars and its taxes, a 
ftander-by, not blinded by prejudice, nor warped 
by intereft, would declare, that taxes were hot 
raifed to carry on wars, but that wars were railed 
to carry on taxes. 

Mr. Burke, as a Member of the Houfe of Com- 
mons, is a part of the Englifli Government ; and 
though he profefles hlmfelf an enemy to war, he 
abufes the French Conftitution, which feeks to ex- 
plode it. He holds up the Englilh Government as 
9 model in all its parts, to France ; but he fhould 
firft know the remarks which the French make 
upon it. They contend, in*favoUr of their own, 
that the portion of liberty enjoyed in England, is 
juft enough to enllave a country by, more produce 
lively than by defpotifm ; aud that as the real ob- 
jeft of all defpotifm is revenue, that a government 
fo formed obtEuns more than it could either by di- 
reft defpotifm, or in a full ftate of freedom, and is, 
therefore, on the ground of intereft, oppofed to 
both. . They account alfo for the readinefs which 
always appears in fuch governments for engaging 
in wars, by remarking on the different motives 
which produce them. In defpotic governments, 
wars are the effed of pride ; but in thofe govern- 
ments in which they become the means of taxation, 
they acquire thereby a more permanent prompti- 
tude. ■ 

The French Conftitution, therefore, to provide 
againft both thofe evils, have taken away the power 
, J of 



I H 1 

bf declaring war from kings and mln}fl:ers,'and 
placed the right where the expenCe muft fall. 

When the queftion on the right of war and 
peace was agitating in the National Affembly, the 
people of England appeared to be much interefted 
in the event, and. highly to applaud the decifion. — 
As a principle, it applies as much to one countty 
as to another. William the Conqueror, as a con- 
queror, held this power of war and peace in himfelf, 
and his defcendants have ever fince claimed it un- 
der him as a right. 

Although Mr- Burke has afferted the right of the 
parliament at the Revolution to bind and controul 
the nation and poftetity for ever, he denies, at the 
fame time, that the parliament or the nation had 
any right to alter what he calls the fuccellion of 
the crown, in any thing but in part, or by a fort of 
modification. By his taking this ground, he throws 
the cafe back to the Norman Conquefi ; and by thus 
running a line of fuccefBon fpringing from Wil- 
liam the Conqueror to the prefent day, he makes it 
neceffary to enquire who and what William the 
Conqueror was, and where he came from; and 
into the origin, hiilory, and nature of what are 
called prerogatives. Every thing mufl: have had 
a beginning, and the fog of time and antiquity 
ihould be penetrated to difcover it. Let then" Mr. 
Burke bring forward his William of Noritaandy, 
for it is to this origin that his argument goes. It 
alfo unfortunately happens, in running this line of 
fucceffion, that another line, parallel thereto, pre- 
fents itfelf, which is, that if the fucceifion runs in 
la the 



C 64 ] 

the iine of the conqueft, the nation funs in the lin* 
of being conquered, and it ought to refcue itfelf 
from this reproach. 

But it will perhaps be faid, that tho* the power 
of declaring war defcends in the heritage of the 
conqaefl, it is held in check by the right of thi 
parliament to with-hold the fupplies. It will al. 
ways happen, when a thing is originally wrongj 
that amendments do not make it right, and it of- 
ten happens that they do as much mifchief one way 
as good the other : and fuch is the cafe hete ; for if 
. the one raihly declares war as a matter of right, 
and the other peremptorily with-holds the fappHes- 
as a matter of right, the remedy becomes as bad or 
worfe than the difeafe. The one forces the nation 
to a combat, and the other ties its hands : But the 
more probable iflue is, that the contraft Will end iB 
a collufion between the parties, and be made a 
fcreen to- both. 

On this queftion of war, three things are to be 
confidered. Firft, the right of declaring it : Se- 
condly, the expence of fupporring it : Thirdly, the 
mode of condufting it after it is declared. The 
French conftitution places the Hgbt where the ex- 
fence muft fall, and this union can be only in the 
nation. The mode of condnfting it after it is de- 
clared, it configns to the executive department. — 
Were this the cafe in all countries, we ftiould hear 
but little more of wars. 

Before I proceed to confidtt- other parts of the 
French conftitution, and by way of refieving the fa- 
tigue of argument, I will introduce an anecdote 

which I had from Dr. Franklin. 

While 



[ «5 D 

While the Do£tor refided in France as minifter 
from America during the war, he had numerouj 
propofals made to him by projedors of every coun- 
try and of every kind, who wilhed to go to the land 
that floweth with milk and honey, America ; and 
among the reft, there was one who offered himfelf 
to be King. He introduced his propofal to thd 
Doftor by letter, which is now in the hands of M. 
Beaumarchais, of Paris — ftating, firft, that as the 
Americans had difmifled or fent away* their King, 
that they would want another. Secondly, that 
himfelf was a Norman. Thirdly, that he was of a 
more ancient family than the Dukes of Normandy^ 
and bf a more honourable defcent, his line having 
never been baftardized. Fourthly, that there was 
already a precedent in England, of Kings coming 
out of Normandy : and on thefe grounds he refted 
his offer, enjoining that the Doftor would forward 
it to America. But as the Doftor did not do this, 
nor yet fend him an anfwer, the projcQor wrote a 
fecond letter ; in which he did not, it is true, threa- 
ten to go over and conquer America, but only, 
with great dignity, propofed, that if his offer was 
not accepted, that an acknowledgment of about 
^ 30,000 might be made to him for his generofity ! 
— — Now, as all arguments refpefting fuccefTion 
muft neceffarily conne£t that fucceffion with foma 
beginning, Mr. Burke's arguments on this fubje£t 
go to (hew, that there is no EngUfli origin of kings, 
and that they are defcendants of the Norman line 
in right of the Conquefl. It may, therefore, be of 

* The word he ured wai rettvoye, diliniired or fcut awiy. 

fervlcc 



[ 66 ] 

fervicc to his doQrine to make this ftoiy knovif^ 
and to inform him, that in cafe of that natural ex- 
tindion to which all mortality is fubjed, that kings 
may again be had from Normandy, on more rea- 
' fonable terms than William the Conqueror ; and 
confequently that the good people of England, at 
the Revolution of i588, might have done much 
better, had fuch a generous Norman as this known 
iheir wants, and they' had known his. The chi- 
valry character which Mr. Burke fo mach admire^ 
is certainly much eafier to make a bargain with 

than a hard-dealing Dutchman. But, to return 

to the matters of the conftitution — > 

The French conftitution fays. There Jhall he ns 
titles ; and of confequence, all that clafs of equivo- 
cal generation, which in fo'me countries is called 
*^ ariftocracy" and in others ** nobility" is done 
away, and the peer is exalted into man. 

Titles are but nick-names, and every nick-name 
is a title. The thing is perfeftly harmlefs in itfelf, 
but it marks a fort of foppery in the human cha-' 
raftei; which degrades it. It renders man into the 
diminutive of man in things which are great, 
and the tounterfeit of woman in things which are 
little. It talks about its fine blue ribbon like a girl,, 
and Ihews its new garter like a child. A certain 
writer of fome antiquity, fays, ** When I was a 
** child, I thought as a child j but when I became 
** a man, I put away childiJh things." 

It is, properly, from the elevated mind of France, 
that the folly of titles have fallen. It has out- , 
grovft 

Dgitiz^d by Google 



C 67 ] 

grown the baby-cloaths of Count and Duke, and 
breeched ilfelf in manhood. France has not le- 
velied ; it has exalted. It has put down the dwarf, 
,to fet up the man. The punyifm of a fenfelefs 
word like Duke, or Count, or Earl, has ceafed to 
pieafe. Even thofe who pofleffed them have dif- 
owned the gibberifh, and, as they outgrew the 
rickets, have defpifed the rattle. The genuine 
mind of man, thirfting for its native home, fociely, 
contemns the gewgaws that feparate him from it. 
Titles are like circles drawn by the magician's 
wand, to contrad the fphere of man's felicity. He 
Jives immured within the Ballille of 3 word, and 
furveys at a diftance the envied life of man. 

Is it then any wonder that titles Ihould ^1 in 
France ? Is it not a greater wonder they fhould be 
kept up any where ? What are they ? What is 
their worth, and " what is their amount ?" When 
we think or fpeak of a fudge or a Genera/, we af- 
fociate with it the ideas of ofEce and character ; we 
think of gravity in the one, and bravery in the 
other : but when we ufe a word merely as a title^ 
no ideas affociatc with it. Through all the voca- 
bulary of Adam, there is not fuch an animal as a 
Duke or a Count; neither can we conned: any cer- 
tain idea to the words. Whether they mean ftreogth 
or weaknefs, wifdom or folly, a child or a man, or 
the rider or the horfe, is all equivocal. What rc- 
fped then can be paid to that which defcribes no- 
thing, apd which means nothing ? Imagination 
has ^vcn figure and charafter to centaurs, fatyrs, 
and down to all the fairy tribe ; but titles baffle 

even 



[68] 

even the powers of fancy, and are a chimerical 
Bon-dcfcript. 

But this is not all. — If a whole country is dlf- 
pofed to hold them in contempt, all their value is 
gone, and none will own them. It is common 
opinion only that makes them any thing, or no? 
thing, or worfe than nothing. There is no occa^ 
fion to take titles away, for they take themfelves 
away when fociety concurs to ridicule them. This 
fpecies of imaginary confequence has vifibly de- 
clined in every part of Europe, and it haftens to its 
exit as the world of reafon continues to rife. There ' 
\4'as a time when the loweft clafs of what are called 
nobility was more thought of than the higheft is 
now, and when a man in armour riding through- 
out Chrillendom in queft of adventures was mor? 
flared at than a modern Duke, The world has 
feen this foUyfall, and it has fallen by being laugh- 
ed at, and the farce of titles will follow its fate. — 
The patriots of France have difcovered in good 
time, that rank and dignity in fociety muft take a 
new ground. The old one has fallen through. — 
It mud now take the fubflantial ground of charac- 
ter, inftead of the chimerical ground of titles j and 
they have brought their titles to the altar, and made 
of them a biTrnt-offering to reafon. 

If no mifchief had annexed itfelf to the folly of 
titles, they would not have been worth a ferious 
and formal deftrudion, fuch as the 'National Affem- 
bly have decreed them: and this makes it necef- 
fary to enquire further into the uature and charac- 
t& of ariftocracy. 

That, 

Dgiw^dbv Google ' 



C 69 ] 

That, tlien, which is called arillocracy m fome 
tountries, and nobility in others, arofe out of the 
governments founded upon conqueft. It was origi- 
nally a military order for the purpofs of fupporting 
military government, (for fuch "were all govern- 
ments founded in, conqueft) ; and to keep up a 
fucceflion of this order for 'the purpofe for which 
it was eftablifhed, all the younger branches of thofe 
families weredifinherited,'"and the law of primoge- 
Tulurejhip fet up. 

The nature and charafter of arillocracy ffiews it- 
felf to us in this law. It is a law againft every law 
of nature, and Nature herlelf calls for its deftruc- 
tion. Eftablilh family juftice, and atiftocracy falls. 
By the ariftocratical law of primogeniturelhip, iti 
a family of fix children, five are expofed. Arifto- 
cracy has never but one child. The reft are ba^ 
gotten to be devoured. They are thrown to the 
canibal for prey, and the natural parent prepares 
the unnatural repaft. 

As every thing which is out of nature in man, 
■ afFefts, more or lefs, the intereft of fociety, fo does 
this. - All the children which the ariftocracy dif- 
owns (which are all, except the eideft) are, in ge- 
neral,, caft like orphans on a parifli, to be pro- 
vided f5r by the public, but at a greater charge.—- 
Unneceffary offices and places in governments and 
courts are created at the expence of the public, ta 
maintain them. 

With what kind of parental refleSions can the 

father or mother contemplate their younger off- 

fpring. By nature they are children, and by mar- 

K riage 



C 7o ] 

riage tEey ate heirsj but by ariftocraify they arc 
baftards and orphans. They are the flefh and 
blood of their' parents in one line, and nothing 
akin to them in the other. To reftore, therefore, 
parents to. their children, and children to their pa- 
rents — relations to each other, and man to fociety 
1 — -and toexterminate the monfterAriftocracy, root 
and branch — the French conftitution has deftroyed 
the law of Primogenitureship. Here then lies 
the monfter ; and Mr. Barke, if he pleafes, may 
■write its epitaph. 

Hitherto we have confidered ariftocracy chiefly 
in one point of view. We have now to confider it 
in another. But whether we view it before or be- 
hind, or fide-ways, or any way elfe, domeftically or 
publicly, it is ftill a monfter. 

In France, ariftocracy had one feature lefs in its 
countenance than what it has in fome other coun- 
tries. It did not compofe a body of hereditary le- 
giflators. It was not " a corporation of ariftocracy " 
for fuch I have heard M. de la Fayette defcribe an 
Englifli Houfe of Peers. Let us then examine the 
grounds upon which the French conftitution has 
refolved againft having fuch an Houfe in France. 

Becaufe, in the firft place,- as is already men- 
tioned, ariftocracy is kept up by iamity tyranny 
and injuftice. 

Secondly, Becaufe there is an unnatural unfit* 
ncfs in an ariftocracy to be legiflators for a nation. 
Their ideas of dijlributi've jtiftice are corrupted at 
the very fource. They begin life by trampling on 
all their younger brothers and fifters, and relations 
of every kind, and are taught and educated fo to 

do. 



[ 71 ] 

do. ' With what ideas of juftice or honour can 
that man enter an houfe of legiflation, who ab- 
forbs in his own perfon the inheritance of a whole 
family of children, or doles out to them fome piti- 
ful portion with the infolence of a gift ? 

Thirdly, Becaufe the idea of heredita,ry legifla- 
tors is as inconfiftent as that of hereditary judges, 
or hereditary juries ; and as abfurd as an hereditary 
mathematician,'or an hereditary wife man ; and as 
ridiculous as an hereditary poet-Iaureat. 

Fourthly, Becaufe a body of men holding them- 
felves accountable to nobody, ought not to be 
trufted by any body. 

Fifthly, Becaufe it is continuing the uncivilized 
principle of governments founded in conqueft, and 
the bafe idea of man having property in man, and 
governing him by perfonal right. 

Sixthly, Becaufe ariftocracy has a tendency to 
degenerate the human fpecies. — By the univerfal 
oeconomy of nature it is known, and by the in- 
ftance of the Jews it is proved, that the human fpe- 
cies has a tendency to degenerate, in any fmall 
number of perfons, \vhen feparated from the gene- 
ral ftock of fociety, and intermarrying conftantly 
with each other. It defeats even its pretended end* 
and becomes in time the oppofite of what is noble 
in man. Mr. Burke talks of nobility ; let 'him ihew 
what it is. The gieateft charafters the. world have 
known, have rofe on the democratic floor. Arifto- 
cracy has not been able to keep a proportionate 
pace with democracy. The artificial Noble flirinkp 
into a dwarf before the Noble of Nature; and in 
the few inllances (for there are fome in all coun- 
K a tries) 



I 7=J 

tries) in whom nature, as by a miracle, has fiur- 
vived in ariftocracy, those men despise it. --- - 
But it is time to proceed to a new fubjed. 

The French conftitution has reformed the condi-. 
tion of the clergy. It has raifed the income of the 
lower and middle claffes, and taken from the 
higher. None are now lefs than twelve hundred 
Uvrfes (fifty pounds fterling) not any higher than 
about two or three thourand pounds. What will 
Mr. Burke place againfl; this ? Hear what he fays. 
He fays, " that the people of England can fee 
" without pain or grudging, an archbifhop precede 
" a duke ; they can fee a biihop of Durham, or a 
*' biihop of Winchefter, in poffeilion of Z^. 10,000 
" a-year ; and cannot fee why it is in worfe' hands 
** than eftates to the like amount in the hands of 
** this earl or that Tquire." And Mr. Burke offers 
this as an example to France, 

As to the fir ft part, whether the archbifliop pre-, 
cedes the duke, or the duke the bifhop, it is, I be^ 
lieve, to the people In general, fomewhat like Slern- 
hold zuA. Hopkins, or Hopkim and Sternhold ; you 
may put which you pleafe firft : and as I confefs 
that I do notunderftand the merits of this cafe, \ 
will not contend it with Mr. Burke. 

'But with refpecl: to the latter, 1 have fomethihg 
to fay. — -Mr. Burke has not put the cafe right. — ■, 
The comparifori is out of order by being put be- 
tween the bifhop and the ear] or the 'fquire. It 
ought to be put between the biftiop and the curate, 
and then it will ftand thus : — The people of -England 
can fee ivlthoui pain or grudging, a bijhop of Durham^ 
or a bifljop ofWincheJlcr, in poffejfxon often ihoufand 



C 73 3 
.pounds a^year, and a curate on thirty or forty poundt 
a-year, or lefs. — No, Sir, they certainly do not fee 
thofe things without great pain or grudging. It 
is a cafe that applies itfelf to every man's fenfe of 
juftice, and is one among many that calls aloud for 
a conftitution. 

In France, the cry of " the church ! the church!" 
was repeated as often as in Mr. Burke's book, and 
as loudly as when the diflenters* bill was before die 
Unglifii parliament ; but the generality of the 
French clergy were not to be deceived by this cry 
any longer. They knew, that whatever the pre- 
tence might be, it was thenifelves who were one of 
the principal objefts of it. It was the cry of the 
high- beneficed clergy, to prevent any regulation 
of income taking place between thofe of ten thou- 
limd pounds a-year and the parifti prieft. They, 
therefore, joined their cafe to thofe of every other 
opprefled clafs of men, and by this union obtained 
redrefs. 

Thfe French conftitution has abolished tythes, 
that fource of perpetual difconlent between the 
tythe-holder and the parifliioner. When land is 
held on tythe, it is in the condition of an eftate 
held between two parties ; the one receiving one- 
tenth, and the other nine-tenths of "the produce: 
and, confequently, on principles of equity, if the 
eftate can be improved, and made to produce by 
that improvement double or treble what it did be- 
fore, or in any other ratio, the expence of fuch im- 
provement 'ought to be borne in like proportion 
between the parties who are to fliare the produce. 
Put this is not the cafe in tythes ; the farmer bears 

the. 



C 74 j 

the whole cxpence, and the tythe-holder takes a 
tenth of the improvement, in addition to the origi- 
nal tenth, and fay this means gets the value of 
two-tenths inflead of one. This is another cafe 
thafcalls for a cpnfUtution. 

The French conftitution hath aboliflied or re- 
nounced Tohration, and Inioleration alfo, and hatlj 
' eftablilhed Universal Right of Conscience. 

Toleration is not the oppofite of Intoleration, but 
is the counterfeit of it. Both are defpotifms. The 
one affumes to itfelf the right of with-holding Li- 
berty of Corifcience, and the other, of granting it. 
' The one is the pope, armed with fire and faggot, 
and the other is the pope felling or granting in- 
dulgences. The former is church and ftate, and 
the latter is church and traffic. 

But Toleration may be viewed in a much ftronger 
light. Man worftiips not himfelf, but his Maker ; 
and the liberty of confcience which he claims, is 
not for the fervice of himfelf, but of his God. In 
this cafe, therefore, we muft neceffarily have the 
aiTociated idea of two beings 3 the mortal who ren- 
ders the worfliip, and the Immortal Being who 
is worfhipped. Toleration, therefore, places itfelf, 
not between man and man, nor between churchand 
church, nor between one denomination of religion 
andanother, but bstweenGodand man; betweenthe 
'being who worfliips, and the Being who is wor- 
fhipped ; and by the fame afl: of affumed authority 
by which it tolerates man to pay his worlhip, it 
prefumptuoufly and blafphemoufly fets itfelf up to 
tolerate the Almighty to receive it. 

Were 

L);.l....l by Google, 



C >s 3 

: Were'a Bill brought into any parliament, entitled 
" An act to tolerate or, grant liberty to the Al- 
^* mighty to receive the. worfhip of a Jew or a 
" Turk," or " to prohibit the Almighty from 
*' receiving it, " all men would ftartle, and call 
it blafphemy. There would be an uproar. The 
prefumptionof toleration in religious matters would 
then prefent itfelf unmaflted: but the prefump- , 
tion is not the lefs faecaufe the name of *' Man" 
only appears to thofe laws, for the aflbciated idea of 
the worjhipper and the worjhipped cannot be fepa- 
rated. — Who, then, art thou, vain duft and 
affies! by whatever name thou art called, whether a 
King, a Bilhop, a Church or a State, a Parliament, 
or any thing elfe, that obtruded thine infignificance 
between the foul of man and its Maker ? Mind 
thine own concerns. If he believes not as thou 
believeft, it is a proof that thou believeft not as 
he believeth, and there is no earthly power can 
, determine between you. ' 

With refpe8: to what are called denominations 
of religion, if every one is left to judge of its own 
religion^ there is no fuch thing as a religion that 
is wrong ; but if they are to judge of each others 
religion, there is no fuch thing as a religion that 
is right ; and therefore, all the world are righfj 
or all the world are wrong. But with refpeft to 
religion itfelf, without regard to names, and as 
direfting itfelf from the univerfal family of man- 
kind to the Divine object of all adoration, // is 
man brtngingto his Maker the fruits of his heartland 
though thofe fruits may differ from each other 

Ukc 

L);.I....J by Google 



[ 76 ] 

like the fruits of the earth, the grateful tnbu'^ 
of every one is accepted. 

A Bilhop of Durham, or a Bifliop of Wtnchef^ 
ter, or the Archbifbop who heads the Dukes, will 
not refufe a tythe-ftieaf of wheat, becaufe it is not 
a cock .of hay; nor a cock of hay, becaufe it is not 
1 fheaf of wheat ; nor a pig, becaufe it is neitheV 
the one nor the. other : but thefe fame perfons, 
under the figure of an eftablilhed church, will 
not permit their Maker to receive the varied tythea 
of man's devotion. 

One of the continual chorufes of Mr. Burke's; 
book is, '* Church and State :" he does not mean 
fome one particular church, or fome one parti- 
c^ilar ftate, but any church and (late ; and he ufes 
•the term as a general figure to hold forth the po- 
litical doftrine of always uniting the church with 
the ftate in every country, and he cenfures the 
National Affembly for not having done this in 
France. — Let us beftow a few thoughts on this 
fubjea. 

All religions are in their nature mild and benign, 
and united with principles of morality. They 
could not have made profelites at firft, by profef- 
fing any thing that was vicious, cruel, perfecuting, 
or immoral. Like every thing elfe, they had 
their beginnings and they proceeded by perfua- 
fion, exhortation, and example. How then is it 
that they lofe their native mildnefs, and become, 
morofe and intolerent ? 

It proceeds from the connection which Mr. 

Burke recommends. By engendering the church 

with the ftate, a fort of mule animal^ capable 

4 , only 

Dgiw^dbv Google . 



C 77 ] • 
only of deftroying, and not of breeding up, Is pro- 
duced, called 57>e Church eJiabUjhed ,by La'ja. It 
■is a ftranger, even from its birth, to any parent 
mother on which it is begotten, and whom in 
time it kicks out and deftroys. 

The inquifition in Spain does not proceed from 
the religion originally profeffed, but from this 
mule-animal, engendered between the church and 
the ftate. The burnings in Smithfidd proceeded 
from the fame heterogeneous produilion j and it 
was the regeneration of this ftrange animal iii 
England afterwards, that renewed rancour and ir- 
Teligion among the inhabitants, and that drove the 
people called Quakers and Diffenters to America. 
Perfecution is not an original feature in any reli- 
gion J but it is always the ftrongly-marked feature 
of all law-religions, or religions eftablilhed by 
law. Take away the law-eftabllfliment, and every 
religion reaflunies its original benignity. In Ame- 
rica, a Catholic Prieft is a good citizen, a good 
chara£ler, and a good neighbour j an Epifcopa- 
lian Minifter is of the fame defcription ; and this 
proceeds, independent of the men, from there 
being no law eftablilhment in America. 

If alfo we view this matter in a temporal fenfe, 
we ihall fee the ill effeds it has had on the profpe- 
rity of nations. The union of church and ftate 
has impoveriihed Spain. The revoking the edift 
of Nantz drove the filk manufacture from that - 
country into England ; and church and ftate are 
now driving the cotton manufafture from Eng* 
land to America and I'Vance. Let then Mr. 
Burke continue to preach his anti-political doc- 
L tripe 



■ C 78 1 

trine of Church and State. It vill do fomegood. 
The National Affembly wiU not follow his advice, 
. but will benefit by his folly. It was by obferving 
the ill eifefts of it in England, that America ha» 
been warned againft it; and it is by expetiencing 
them in Trance, that the National Affembly have 
aboliOied it, and, like America, has ellabtifhed 

UNIVERSAL RIGHT OF CONSCIENCE, AND UNI- 
VERSAL RIGHT OF CITIZENSHIP*. 

I will here ceafe the comparifon with refpeS 
to the principles of the French conftitution, and 
conclude this part of the fubjed with a few 
obfervations on the organization of the formal 
parts of the French and Engtiih governments. 

The 

• Whtn in any country we Tee extraordinary tircumftancet taking 
jilacci they naturally lead any rAan who hai a talent for obrervaiiaB 
and inveftigatiun, lo enquire into the ciafes. The manufaflurea <if 
Manchefter, Birminghann, and £lieffii:ld, are the muft principal ma* ■ 
nufa£)ure« in England. From whence did this arife i A little ob- 
Tervatian will explain the cafe. The principal, and the gencralitf 
of the inhabitant* of tliofe places, arenoiof what is called in Eng- 
land, tbt cburcb efiahlijbedhy lain; and they, or their father*, (fof 
it it wiihin but a few years), withdrew from the ptrlecution of tbe 
chartered towns, where Teft-ljws tnore particularly operate, 
■ and eftabliftied a fort of afylum for themfelvei in thofe placei. It 
was the only afylum that then offered, for the reft of Europe 
was worre.~Btft the cafe it now changing. France and America 
bid all comers wekomi;, and initiate them into all the rights tA 
eitizenfhip, Policy and intereft, therefore, will, but perhapi too 
late, diaate in England, what reafon and juftice sould not. Thofe 
fnanufa£kutes are withdrawing, and are arifing in other places. 
There is now erefting at PafTey, three miles from Paris, a large cot- 
ton mill, and feveral are already erefled in Amciica. Soon after 
the rejeaing the Bill for repealing the Teft-law, one of the richeft 
(nanufaflurers in England faid in my bearing, " England, Sir, is not 
a comitry for a difftnier to live in — we mult go to France." Theie 
are truthi, and it is doittg }uflice to both parties to tell them. It it 
•hitSy the difleaters that have carried Englifli tnanufiAurM to tbe 

hoght 



1 79 ] 

The executive power in each c6imtry is in'lhc 
hands of a perfon ftiled, the King ; but the French 
conftitution ■ diftinguiflies between the King and 
the Sovereign : It confiders the ftation of King 
as official, and places Sovereignty in the nation. 

The reprefentatives of the nation, which com- 
pofe the National Affembly, and who are the 
legiflative power, originate in aqd from the people 
by eleflion, as an inherent right in the people. — - 
In England it is otherwife ; and this arifes from 
the original eftabiilhment of whatsis called its 
monarchy j for, as by the conqueft all the rights 
of the people or the nation were abforbed into 
the hands of the Conqueror, and who added the 
title of King to that of Conqueror, thofe fame 
matters which in France are now held -as rights 
in the people, or in the nation, are held in En- 
gland as grants from what is called the Crown. 
The Parliament in England, in both its branches, 
were ere£ted by patents from the defcendanis of 
the Conqueror. The Houfe of Commons did not 
originate as a matter of right in the people to de- 
legate or eleft, but as a grant or boon. 

height rhty are now at, and the fame men have it in their power to 
carry them away ; and though thofe maniif azures will afterward* 
continue to be madeid'tliofe place*, the fnreign maikec wlirhe loft. 
Xhere aie frtquenllyappearlng In iha London Gazette, exlmfts fiom 
certain aAs to prevent machines, and as far at it can extend to per- 
' Ions, frmn gping out of the cauntry. Il appears fTom ihefe, that the 
ill efieas of ihe teft-tawc and church-eflabMlhmeni begin to be much . 
ruTpefted j but the remedy of force can never fiipply the fcmedy 
ofreafjii In the progrefs of lefa than a cenlury, all the unrepte- 
fented pir of England, of all denominations, which ia at leaft a 
hundred limes the moftmimercjis, may begin to feel the neceflityof 
a conftitution, and ihen alt thofe matten vfiil tome regularly befort 
tbein, 

h a By, 



[ 8o 2 

■ By'the French conftitiition, the Nation is always 
named before the King. The third article of the 
Declaration of rights fays, " The nation is ejfcnilal- 
ly thefource (or fountain) of all fovere'ipity." Mr. 
Burke argues, that, in England, a King ii the foun- 
tain — that he is the fountain of ail honour. But 
as this idea is evidently defcended from the con- 
queft, I Ihall make no other remark upon it than 

■ that it is the nature of conqueft to turn every thing 
upfide down ; and as Mr. Burke will not be refu- 
fed the privilege of fpeaking twice, and as there 
are hut two parts in the figure, ^e fountain dnd 
the fpout, he will be right the fecond time. 

The French conftitution puts the legiflative be- 
fore the executive ; the Law before the King j 
La Loi^ Le Rot. This alfo is in the natural order , 
of things; becaufe laws ipufl have exiftence, be- 
fore they can have execution. 

A King in France does not, in addrelling him- 
felf to the National Affembly, fay, " My aflem- 
bly," fimilar to the phrafe ufed in EngUnd of 
*' my Parliament J neither can he ufe it confident 
■with the COTiftitution, nor could ij: be admitted. 
There may be propriety in the ufe of it in England, 
hecaufe, as is before mentioned, both Houfes of Par- 
liament originated out of what is called the Crown, 
by patent. or boon — and not out of the inherent 
rights of the people, as the National Affembly dui^s 
in France, and whofe name deiignates its origin. 

■ The Prefident of the National Affembly does 
not afli the King to grant io the Affembly liberty of 
fpeech, as is the cafe with the Engliih Houfe of 

Commons. The conftiturional dignity of the Na- 
tional 



C 8- ] 
tional Aflembly cannot debafe itfelf. Speech is, in 
the firft place, one of the natural rights of man 
always retained ; and with refpeft to the National 
Aflembly, the ufe of it is their duty, and the najion 
is their authority. They were clefted by the great- 
eft body of men exercifing the right of ele£lion the 
European world ever faw. They fprung not from 
the filth of rotten boroughs, nor are they the vaffid 
reprefentatives of ariftccratical ones. Feeling the 
proper dignity of their charader, they fupport^ij;*' ,■ 
Their parliamentary language, whejhcr.for or 
againft a queftion, is free, bold, and manly, and 
extend to all the parts and circumftances of the 
cale. If any matter or fubjeS refpefting the exe- 
cutive department, or the perfon who prefides in it, 
(the King), comes before them, it is debated on 
with the fpirit of men, and the language of gentle- 
men ; and their anfwer, or their addrefs, is re- 
turned in the fame ftile. ' They ftand not aloof 
■with the gaping vacuity of vulgar ignorance, nor 
bend with the cringe of fycophantic infignificance. 
The graceful pride of truth knows no extremes, 
and preferves, in every latitude of life, the right- 
angled charafter of man. 

Let us now look to the other fide of the queftion, 
— In the addreffes of the Engliih Parliaments to 
their Kings, we fee neither theintrepid fpirit of the 
old Parliaments of France, nor the ferene dignity of 
the prefent National Aflembly j neither do w6 fee 
in them any thing' of the ftile of Englifli manners, 
which borders fomewhat on bluntnefs. Since then 
they are neither of foreign extraflion, nor naturally 

of 



C 82, ] 

of Engltfli produ6ion, their origin maft be fought 
for elfewhere, and that origin is the Norman Con- 
queft. They are evidently of the valfalage clafs of 
manners, and emphatically mark the proftrate dif- 
tance that exifts in no other condition of men than 
between the conqueror and the conquered. That 
this vaffalage idea and ftile of fpeaking was not got 
rid of even -at the Revolution of 1688, is evident 
from the declaration of Parliament to William and 
Mary, in thefe words : '* We do moft humbly and 
" {nithfuWy fubmit ourfelves, our hdrs andpofteri. 
" ties, for ever." Submilfion is wholly a vaflalage 
term, repugnant to the dignity of Freedom, and an 
echo of the language ufed at the Conqueft. , 

As the eftimation of all things is by comparifon, 
the Revolution of i688, however from clrcum- 
ftances it may have been exalted beyond its value, 
will find its level. It is already on the wane, 
cclipfed by t^e enlarging orb of reafon, and the 
luminous revolutions of America and France. In 
lefs than another century, it will go, as well as Mr. 
Burke's labours, *' to iht family vault of all the Ca- 
pulets." Mankind will then fcarcely believe that 
a country calling itftlf free, would fend to Holland 
for a man, and clothe' him with power on purpofe 
to put themfelves in ftar of him, and give him al. 
mofl a millibn flerling a-year for leave to ftibmil 
theojfelves and their poftcrity, like bond-men and 
bond-women, for ever. 

But there is a truth that ought to be made 
known : I have had the opportunity of feeing it; 
vhich is, that, notiviihjiandlr.g apfcaranceSi there U 

not 



[ 83 ] 

■ ,iUt any defcription of men that defpife monarchy fo muck 
as courtien. But they w?Il know, that if it were feen 
by others, as it is feen by them, the juggle could 
'not be kept up. They are in the conJicion of men. 
who get their living by a {how, and to whom the 
folly of that fiiow is fo familiar that they ridicule 
it ; but were the audience to be made as wife, in this 
refpefl:, as themfelves, there would be an end to 
the fliow and the profits with it. The difference 
between a republican and a courtier with refped 
to monarchy is, that the one oppofes monarchy 
believing it to be fomething, and the other laughs 
at it knowing it to be nothing. 

As I ufed fometimes to correfpond with Mt. 
Burke, believing him then to be a man of founder 
principles than his book fliews him to be, I wrote 
to him laft winter from Paris, and gave him an 
account how profperoufly matters were going on. 
Among other fubjefts in that letter, I referred to 
the happy (ituation the National Aflembly were 
placed in ; that they had taken a ground on which 
their moral duty and their political intereft were 
united. They have not to hold out a language 
which they do not believe, for the fraudulent 
purpofe of making others believe it. Their ftation 
requires no artifice to fupport it, and can only 
be mwntaihed by enlightening mankind. It is 
not their intereft: to cherifli ignorance, but to dif- 
pel it. They are not in the cafe of a minifterial 
or an bppofition party in England, who, though 
they areoppofed, are ftill united to keep up the com- 
mon myftery. The National Affembly mull throw 
2 ■ open 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



C 84 3 

open a magazine of light. It mufl fhew man the 
proper charafter of man ; and the nearer it can 
bring him to that ftandard, the llrbnger the Na- 
tional Aifembly becomes. 

In contemplating the French confUtution, we 
fee in it a rational order of things. The princi- 
ples harmonife with the forms, and both with 
their origin; It may perhaps be faid as an excufe 
for bad forms, that they are nothing more than 
formE ; but this is a miftake. Forms grow out 
of principles, and operate to continue the princi^ 
pies they grow from. It is impoflible to praftife 
a bad form on any thing but a bad principle. It 
cannot be ingrafted on a good one ; and wherever 
the forms in any government are bad, it is a cer- 
tain indication thai! the principles are bad alfo. 

I will here finally clofe thisfubjeft. I began it 
by remarking that Mr. Burke had voluntarily de- 
clined going into a comparifon of the Englifh and 
French conftitutions. He apologifes \ in page 
241) for not doing it, by faying that he had not 
time., Mr. Burke's book was upwards of eight 
months in hand, and is extended to a volume of 
three hundred and 'fifty.fix pages. As his omif- 
fion does injury to his caufe, his apology makes 
it worfe ; and men on the Englifh fide the water 
will begin to confider, whether there is not fome 
radical defect in what is called the Knglifli conftitu- 
tlon, that made it necefTary in Mr. Burke to fupprefs 
the coniparifon, to avoid bringing it into view. 

As Mr. Burke has not written on conftitutions, 
fo neither has }ie written on the French revolution. 

He, 

U;.t.z=dbv Google 



t 85 3 

He gives no accouat of its commencement 
or its progrefs. He only exprelfes his wonder; 
** It looks," fays he, " to me, as if I were in a 
*' great crifis, not of the affairs of France alone, 
*' but of all Europe, perhaps of more than Europe. 
"All circumftances taken together, the French 
*' revolutioB is the moft aftoniflung that has 
" hitherto happened in the world." 

As wife men are aftonifhed at fooliih things, 
a|id other people at wife ones, I know not on 
which ground to account for Mr. Burke's aAo' 
nifhment; but certain it is, that he-does not under- 
ftand the French revolution. It has apparently 
burft: forth like a creation from a chaos, but it is 
no more than the confequence of a mental revolu- 
tion priority exifting' in France. The mind of 
the nation had changed before hand, and the new 
order of things has naturally followed the new 
order of thoughts.' — I will here, as concifely as 
I can, trace out the growth of the French revolu- 
tion, and mark the circumftances that have con- 
tributed to produce it. 

The defpotifm of Louis 5IV. united with the 
gaiety of his Court, and the gaudy oftentation of 
his character, had fo humbled, and at the fame time 
fo fafcinated the mind nf France, that the people 
appear to have loH: all fenfe of their own dignity 
in contemplating that of their grand Monarch : 
and the whole reign of Louis XV, remarkable 
only for weaknefs and effeminacy, made no other 
alteration than that of fpreading a fort of lethargy 
over the nation, from which it flKwed no difpofi- 
tion to rife. 

M -Of, 



The only figns which appdtted ofttefpinf of 
liberty during (hofe peziods, are to be found in the 
writings of the French philofophers. Montef- 
quieu, prefid^nt of the Parliament of Bourdeaux, 
went as for as a writer under a defpotic govern- 
ment could weB proceed ; and being obliged to 
divide himfclf between principle and prudence, 
his mind oft^ appears under a veil^ and we 
ought to give lum credit for more than he ha» 
eKpreffed. 

Voltaire, who was both the flatterer and the 
fatyrtft of defpotifm».took another line. His forte 
lay in crpoIiHg and ridiculing the fuperftition* - 
which priell-craft united with ftate-craft had inter* 
woven with governments. It was not from the 
purity of his principles^ or his love of mankind^ 
(^r fatire and philanthropy are not naturally con- 
cordant), but from his ftrtmg. capacity of feeing folly 
in its true fhape, and his irrefiltible. propenfity ro 
CEpote it, that be made thofe attacks. They 
were however as formidable as if the motives had 
been virtuous ; and he merits the thanks rather 
than the elleem of mankind. 

On the contrary, we find in the writings of 
Roufleau, and the Abb6 Raynal, a lovelinefs of 
fentimentinftivour of Liberty, that excites relpeft, 
and elevates the human Acuities; but having 
r^fed this animation, they do not dired its opera- 
tions and leave the mind in love with an objeft, 
without defcribing thd means of poffeffing it. 

ITie writings of Quifne, Turgot, and the friends 
of .thofe authors, are oi the ierious kind; but 

they 



i: 87 J 

Utej laboured o&der the fame diiadvantige vtith 
Montefquieu : thdr writings abound with moral 
maxims of government, but are rather dire^ed 
to cE(;anoinife and reform the admhiiftration of the 
government, than the governjnesit itfelf.. 

But all tfaofe writing^ ^id many others had 
their weight j and by the di&rent manner in 
which they tr^ted tbe fubjeA of governnunt, 
Montefquieu ' by his judgment and knowledge 
of laws, Voltaire by his wit, Roufleau and Ray- 
nal by thor animation, sad Quibe attd TuTgot 
by their moral maxims and lyfteiOs of ceconomy, 
readers of every clafs met li^th fometfaing to theff 
<afte, and a fpirit of political enquiry began to di& 
fufe itfelf through the nation at the dole the dif- 
pate between England and the then cokmies of 
America broke out. 

In the war which France afterwards engtaged in, 
tt is very well known that the nation appeared 
to be before hand with the French miniftry. Eactt 
of them had its view: but thofe views were direded 
to different obje£Ui the one fought liberty, andthe 
other retaliation on England. The French officers 
and foldiers who after, this went to' America, were 
eventually placed in the fchoo! of Freedom, and 
learned the pradice as well as the principles of it 
by heart. 

As it waft Itnpoffible to feparate the mHitaTy 
events which took place in America from the prin- 
ciples of the American revolution, the publication 
of thofe events in France neceffarily conneQed 
tbemfelvea with the principles that produced them. 
M z Many 



' [ 88 ] 

Many of the'fafts were in thefnfelvcs principles'; 
fuch as the declaratioii of American independence^' 
and the treaty of alliance between France and 
America, which recognifed the natural right of 
man, andjuftihed refiflance to opprellion. 

The then Minifter pf France, Count Vergennes, 
was not the friend of America*i and it is both 
juftice and gratitude to fay, that it Was the Qaetn 
of France who gave the caufe.of America a 
fefhion at the French Court. Count Vergennes 
was th6 perfonal and focial friend of Dr. Franklin ; 
and the Do^orhad obtained, by hisfenfibte grace- 
fulnefs, . a fort of influence over him ; but with re- 
fyeik to principles, Count Vergennes was a defpot. 
The fituauon of Dr. Franklin as Minifter from 
. America to France, ibould be taken into the 
chain of circumftances. The deplomatic cha- 
raSer is of itfelf the narroweft fphere of fociety 
that man can ad in. It forbids intercoyrfe 
by a reciprocity of fufpicion ; and a Deplomatic 
is a fort of unconnefled atom, continually repelling 
and repelled. But this was not the cafe with Dr. 
Franklin. He was not the deplomatic of a Court, 
but of MAN. ■ His charafter as aphilofopher had 
been long eftabliftied, and his circle 6S fociety in 
France was univerfal. 

Count Vergennes refifted for a confiderable 
time the publication of the Americaft conftitutions 
in France, tra'nflated into the French language ; 
but even in this he was obliged to give way to pub- 
lic opinion, and a fort of propriety in admitting 
■ to appear what he had undertaken to defend. . 

The 

L);.I....J by Google 



, [ 89 ] 

The American conftltutions were to liberty, 
■what a grammar is to language : they define its 
■parts of fpeech, and praftically conftru£l them 
into fyntax. 

The peculiar fituation of the then Marquis 
, de la Fayette is another link in the- great chain. 
He ferved in America as an American officer un- 
der a commiffion of Congrefs, and by the univer- 
&lity of his acquaintance, was in clofe friehdfhip 
with the civil government of America, as well as' 
with the military line. He fpoke the language of 
the country, entered Into the difculfions on the 
principles of government, and was always a wd- 
come friend at any etefrion. 

When the war clofed, a vaft reinforcement to 
the caufe of Liberty fpread iifelf over France, by - 
the return of the French officers and foldiers. A 
knowledge of the practice was then joined to the 
theory ; and all that was wanting to give it real 
exiftence, was oppiortunity. Man cannot, properly 
fpeaking, make circumflances for his purpofe, but 
he always has it in his power to improve them when 
they occur ; and this was the cafe in France. 

M. Neckar was displaced in May 1781 j and 
by the iir management of the fiimnces aftervrards, 
and particularly during the extravagant admini-" 
ftration of M. Calorme, the revenue of France, 
which was nearly twenty-four millions fterling 
fer year, was become unequal to the expenditures,, 
not becaufe the revenue had decreafed, but becaufe 
the expences had increafed ; and this was the cir- 
cumflance which the nation laid hold of to bring 
forward a revolution. The Englifh Minifter, 



i: 90 J 

Mr. Ktt, has frequently alluded to the ftate of 
the French finances in his budgets, without un- 
4erftaading the fubje£t. Had the French Parlia- . 
ments been as ready to regifter edi£U for ne^ 
^xtSy as an Englifli Parliament is to grant thehi, 
there had been lio derangement in the finances^ 
DOT yet any revolution j but this will better ex- 
plain itfetf as I proceed. 

■ It will be neceffary here to fliew how taxes 
were formerly raifed in France. The King, or . 
rather the Court or Miniflry a^ing under the uf6 
of that name, framed the edi3^ for taxes at thnr 
own difcretion, and fent them to the Parliaments 
to be regiftered j for until they were regiftered 
by the Parliaments, ,they were not operative. Dif- 
putes had ipng exifted between the Court and the 
Parliament with refpeS: to the extent of the Par- 
liameat's authority on this head. - The Court 
infifted that the authority of Parliament went no 
^ther than to remonftrate or Ihew reafpn^ againft 
the tax, referving to itfelf the right of dttermiiUng 
-vhelher the reafons were well or ill-founded j 
and in confequence thereof, either to withdraw' 
the ed«3: as a matter of choice, or to order it to be 
^regiftered as a matter of authority. The Par- 
liament^ on their part infifted, that they had not 
only a right to remonftrate, but to rejeft; and on 
this ground they were always fupported by the 
nation. 

But, to return to the order of my narrative — ■ 

M. Calonne wanted money ; and as be knew the 

fturdy difpofition of the Parliamenij irith refped 

to new taxes, he ingenioufly fought either to 

approach 



[ 9> ] 

approach them by a more gentle means than that _ 
pf direft authority, or to get over their heads by 

; a manoeuvre : and, for this purpofe, he revived the 
projeft of affembling a body of men from the feve- 
ral provinces, under the ftile of ah " Affembly of 
the Notables," or Men of Note, who met in 1787, 

. and who were either to recommend taxes to the 
Parliaments, or to aft as a Parliament themfelves. 
An A0embly under this name had been called 
in 1617. 

As we are to view this as the firft pra6ical ftep 
towards the revolution, it will be proper to enter 
into fome particulars refpefliing it. The Affembly of . 
the Notables has in fome places been miftaken for 
the States-General, but was wholly a different 
body; the States- General being always by eleftion. 
The perfons who compofed the Affembly of tha 
Notables were all nominated by the King, and 
confiited of one hundred and forty members. But 
as M. Calorine could not depend upon a majority 
of this Affembly in his favour, he very ingenioufiv 
arranged them in fuch a manner as to make forty- 
four a majority of one hundred and forty : to. 
effefl: this, he difpofed of them into feven feparatie 
committees, of twenty members each. Every 
gencKil queftion was to be decided, not by a mai 
jority of perfons, but by a majority of commit- 
tees ; and as eleven votes would 'make a majority 
in a committee, and four committees a majority 
of feven, M. Calonne had good reafon to conclude^ 
that as forty-four would determine any genera! 
queftion," he could not be out-voted. But all hii 
^ans deceived hitn, and in the event became his 
overthrow, 

Th' 



, . . t 9' ] 

The then Marquis de la Fayette was placed In 
the fecond Committee, of which Count D'Anois 
' was prelident : and as money-matters was the 
objeft, it naturally brought intb view every 'cir- 
cumftance Conneded with it. M. de )a Fayette made ' 
a verbal charge agaiofl: Calonne, for Telling crown 
lands to the amount of two millions of livres, in a 
manner that appeared to be unknown to the King. 
The Count D'Artois (as if to intimidate, for the 
Baftille was then in being) afked the Marquis, if 
he would render the charge in writing ? He re- 
plied, that he would. — The Count D'Artois did 
not demand it, but brought a meffage frpm the 
King to that purport. M. de la Fayette then 
delivered in his charge in writing, to be given to 
the King, undertaking to fupport it. No farther 
proceedings were had upon this affair ; but M. 
Calonne was foon after difmiiffed by the King, and 
fet off to England. 

As M. de la Fayette, from the experience he had 
feen in America, was better acquainted with the 
fcience of civil government than the generality of' 
the members who compofed the Aflembly of the 
Notables could then be, the brunt of the bufinefs 
fell confiderably to bis (hare. The plan of thoie 
who had a conftitution in view, was to contend 
■with the Court on the ground of taxes, and fome 
of them openly profelTed their objeft. Difputes 
frequently arofe between Count D'Artois and M. 
de la Fayette, upon various fubjefts. With refpeft 
to the arrears already incurred, the latter propofed 
to remedy them, by accommpdating the expences 
4 to 

U;.t.z=dbv Google 



, [ 93 3 
to the revenue, inftead of the revenue to the ex- 
pences ; and as objeQis of reform, he propofed to 
abolilh th6 Baftilte, and all the State-prirons 
throughout the nation, (the keeping of which 
were attended with great expence), and to fupprefs 
Lettres de Cachet .- But thofe matters were not 
then much attended to; and with refpeft to 
Lettres de Cachet, a majority of the Nobles appeared- 
to be in favour of them. 

On the fubjeii of fupplying the Treafury by new 
taxes, the Affembly declined taking the matter oh 
themfelves, concurring in the opinion that they 
had not authority. In a debate on this fubjeft, 
M. de la Fayette faid, that raifmg money by taxes 
could only be done by a National Affembly, free- 
ly elefled by the people, and a£l:ing as their repre- 
fentatives. Do you mean, faid the Count D'Artois^ 
the States General ? M. de la Fayette replied, that 
he did. Will you, faid the Count D'Ajtois, fign 
what you fay, to be given to the King ? The other 
replied, that he not only would do this, but that 
he would go farther, and fay, that the effedual 
mode would be, for the King to agree to the 
eftabliftiment of a Conftitution. 

As one of the plans had thus failed, that of get- 
ting the Affembly to aft as a Parliament, the other 
came into view, that of recommending. On this 
fubjeS, the Affembly agreed to recommend two new 
taxes to be enregiftered by the Parliament : the 
one a ftamp-tax, and the other a territorial tax, or, 
fort of land-tax. The two have been eftimated at - 
about five millions Sterl. per ann. We have now to 
N turn 

U;.t.z=dbv Google 



C 94 1 

turn our attention to the Parliaments, en whom tFiff 
bufmefs wiis again devolving. 

The Archbifhop of Thouloufe ffince Arch- 
bifliop of Sens, and now a Cardinal) was -ap- 
pointed to the adminiftration of the finances, foon 
after the difmillion of Calonne. He was alfo made 
Prime Minifter, an office that did not always exift 
In France. When this office did not exift', the 
Chief of each of the principal departments traafad- 
ed bufmefs immediately with the King ; but when 
a Prime Minifter was appointed, they did bufinefa 
onlv with him. The Archbiftiop arrived to more 
State-amhority than any Miaifter fince the Dulte 
de Choifeuil, and the Nation was ftrongly difpofed 
m his favour ; but by a line of conduS fcarcely to 
be accounted for, he perverted every opportunity, 
turned out a. dcfpor, and funk into difgrace, and 
a Cardinal'. 

The AiTembly of the Notables haviog broke uji, 
the new Minifter fent the edifts for the two new- 
taxes recommended by the Aflembly to the Par- 
liaments, to be enregiftered. They of couffe 
came firft before the Parliament of Pans, who- 
returned for anfwer. That with fuch a revenue as 
the Nation then fupporfed, the name ef taxes eught 
not to be mentioned, but for the ptirpofe o/" reducing 
them ; and threw both the edifts out •. 

On this refufal, the Parliament was ordered ttt 
VerfaiUes, where, in the ufual form, the King, 

■ When the Englifli Minifter, Mr. Pitt, mentions ihe Frmch 

finance; a£;ain in tbt Engliih Parliaincnt, Ii would be well that h» 
noliccd this as an example. 

held, 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



t 95 ] 

■held, wliat under the old government was callei,- 
a Bed of Juftice ; and the two cdidls were enregif-- 
tered in preJence of the Parliament, by an order of 
State, in the maimer mentioned in page 90. Oq 
this, ih^ Parliament immediately returned ta 
Paris, reiiewed their' feflron in form, and ordered 
the enregiftering to be ftruck out, declaring that 
«very thing done at Verfaiiles was illegal. All 
the members of the Parliament were then ferved 
with Lettres de Cachet, and exiled to Trois ; but 
as they continued as inflexible in exile as before^ 
and as vengeance did not fupply the place of taxes, 
they were after a fliort time recalled to Paris. 

The edi6:s were again tendered to them, and 
tbe Count D'Artois undertook to aft as reprefen" 
tative for the Kiftg. For thid purpofe, he came from 
Verfaiiles to Paris, in a train of jwoceflion j and 
the Parfiaraent were afTembled to receive him. 
But ihow and parade had loft their influence im 
J*' ranee; and whatever ideas of importance he 
might fet off with, he had to return with thofe of 
mortification and difappointment. On alighting 
from his carriage to afcend the fteps of the Par- 
liament Houfe, the crowd (which was numerouflv 
<oUefted) threw out trite expreflions, faying, 
*' This is Monfieur D'Artois, who wants more of 
*' our money to fpend." The marked difiippro- 
bation which he law, impreffed him with appre- 
henfions; and the word Jux amies (To arms) 
was given out by the officer of the guard who 
attended him. It was fo loudly vociferated, that 
it echoed through the avenues of the Houfe, and 
' N 2 produced 

L);...=.J by Google 



c 96 : 

produced" a temporary confufion: I was ihen 
ftanding in one of the apartments through which 
he had to pafs, and could not avoid refiefling 
how wretched was the condition of a difrefpefted 
man. 

He endeavoured to imprefs the Parliament by 
great words, and opened his authority by faying, 
" The King, our Lord and,Mafter." The Par- 
liament received him very coollv, and with their 
ufual determination not to re^ilier the taxes: and 
in this manner the interview ended. 

After this a new fubjed took place : In the 
various debates and contefts that arofe between 
the Court and the Parliaments on the fubjedt of 
taxes, the Parliament of Paris at laft declared, 
that although it had been cuftomary for Parlia* 
ments to enregifter edifts for taxes as a matter of 
convenience, the right belonged onlv to the. Staiei' 
General; and that, therefore, the Parliament could 
no longer with propriety continue to debate on 
what it had not authority to aft. The King after 
this came to Paris, and held a meeting with the 
Parliament, in which' he continued from ten ia 
the morning till about fix in the evening ; and, in 
a manner that appeared to proceed from him, as if 
unconfulted upon with the cabinet or, the miniftry, 
gave his word to the Parliament, that the States- 
General fhould be convened. 

But after this another fcene arofe, on a ground 

different from all the former. Theminifter and the 

cabinet were averfe to calling the States-General ; 

They well knew, that if the States-General were 

aflembled. 



I 97 3 

affembled, that themfelves muft fall ; and as the 
King had not mentioned any time^ they hit, on a" 
projeft calculated to elude, without appearing to 
oppofe. 

For this purpofe, the Court fct about making a 
fan of Conftitution itfelf: It was principally the 
work of M. Lamoignon, Keeper of the Seals, 
who afterwards fliot himfelf. This new arrange- 
ment confifted in eftablilhing a body under the- 
name of a Cour pUniere, or full Court, in which 
were invefted all the powers that the government 
might have occafion to make ufe of The perfons' 
compofing this Court were to be nominated by 
the King ; the contended right of taxation was 
given up on the part of the King, and a new 
criminal code of laws, and law proceedings, was 
fubftituted in room of the former. The thing, in 
many points, contained better principles than 
thofe upon which the government had hitherto 
been adminiftered : but with refpeft to the Cour 
fUniere^ it was no other than a medium through 
which defpotifm was to pafe, without appearing 
to ad dlreftly from itfelf. 

The, Cabinet had high expeftatlons from their 
new contrivance. The perfons who were to com- 
pofe the Caur pleniere, were already nominated ; 
and as it was neceffary to carry a fair appearance, 
many of the bell characters in the nation were 
appointed among the number. It was to com- 
mence on the 8th of May 1788 : But an oppofi- 
tion arofe to it, on two grounds— the one as to 
Principle, the other as to Form. 

Oq 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



i: 98 ] 

On the ground crfPrmcipIe it was ccmteAded, 

That government had not a right to alter itfelf ; and 
that if the practice was once admitted, it would 
grow into a principle, ^nd be made a precedent for 
any future alterations the government might wifh 

■ to eftablifii : That the right of altering the govern- 
ment was a national right, and not a right of 
government. — And on the ground of Form, it was 
contended. That the Cour pleriiere was nothing, 
more than a larger Cabinet. 

The then Duke de la Rochefoucault, Luxem- 
bourg, De Noaiiles, and many others, refufed 

, to accept the Bomination, and ftrenuoufly 
oppofed the whole plan. When the edid for 
eflablifliing this new Court was fent to the Parlia- 
ments to be enregiftered, and put into execution, 
they' refifted alfo. The Parliament of Paris not 
only reiufed, but denied the authority ; and the 
tonteft: renewed itfelf between the Patliatnent and 
the Cabinet more ftrongly than ever. Whjie the 
Parliament were Htting in debate on this fubjed, 
the Miniltry ordered a re^ment of foldiers to fur- 
round the Houfe, and form a blockade. The 
Members fent out for beds and provifion, and 
Uved ^s in a befieged citadel ;. and as this had no 
elfeit, the commanding officer was _ ordered to 
enter the Parliament Houfe and feize theni, which 
he did, and fome of the principal members were 
&ut up in different prifons. About the fame time 
a deputation of perfons arrived from the province 
of BrittMiy, to remonftrate againft the eftablifti- 
ment of the Cour plemere ; and thofe the Arch- 
bifliop fent to the Baftille. But the fpirit of the 
Nation 



Cm] 

-Nation was not to be orercome ; and it was fo fallj 
fenfible of' the ftrong ground it tiad taken, that of 
withholding taxes, that it contented itfelf with 
keeping up a fort of quiet refiflance, which 
cffe3;ual!y overthrew al! the plans at that time 
formed againft it. ITie proje£t of the Courplhiiert 
was at laft obliged to be given up, and the Prime 
Mtniller not long afterwards followed its fate; 
and M. Neckar was recalled into office. 

The attempt to eftabUft theCuar plhtiere ha4 
an effed; upon the Nation, which itfelf did not per- 
ceive. It was a fort of new form of government, 
that infenfibly ferved to put the old one out of fight, 
and to unhinge it from the fuperftitious authority 
of antiquity. It was government dethroning 
government ; and the old one, by attempting to 
make a new one, made a chafm. 

The failure of this fcheme renewed the fubje^ 
of convening the States-General ; and this gave 
rife to a new feries of politics. There was no 
fettled form for convening the States-General : alt 
that it pofitively meant, was a deputation from 
what was then called the Clergy, the Noblefle, 
and the Commons ; but their numbers, or their 
proportions, had not been always the fame. They 
had been convened only on extraordinai'y occa- 
fionS, the laft of which was in 1614; their 
numbers were then in equal proportions, and they 
voted by orders. 

It could not well efcape the fagacity of M. 
Neckar, that the mode of 1614 would anfwer nei- 
ther the purpofe of the then goveTiunent, nor of 
2 the 



the nuionl As matters were at that timQ circnn^ 
Aanced, it would have been too contentious ta 
agree upon any thing. 'ITie debates would have 
been endlefs upon privileges and exen^tions, in 
which neither the wants of the government, nor 
the wifties of the nation for a conftitution, would 
have been attended to. But as he did not chufe 
lo take the decifion upMi himfelf, he fummoned 
again the Affenibly of the Notables, and referred 
it to them. This body was in general interefted 
in the decifion, being chiefly of the ariltocracy and 
the high paid clergy ; and they decided in favour 
of the mode of 1614. This decifion was againft 
the fenfe of the Nation, and alfo againft: the wiflies 
of the Court; for the arifl:ocracy oppofed itfelf 
to both, snd contended for privileges indepen- 
dent of either. The fubjeft was then taken up 
by the Parliament, who recommended that the 
number of the Commons fliould be equal to the 
other two ; and that they Should all fit in one 
houfe, and vote in one body. The number finally 
determined on was twelve hundred : fix hundred 
to be chofen by the Commons, (and this was lef» 
than their proportion ought to have been when 
their worth and confequence -is confidered on a 
national fcale), three hundred by the clergy, and 
three hundred by the ariftocracy ; but with re- 
fpe£l to the mode of aflembling themfelves, whe- 
ther together or apart, or the manner in which 
they fliould vote, thofe matters were referred*. 

The 

" Mr. Burkt (and I mull take the liberty of telling him lie it 
Tuy unacquiinied with Ficncti ufiaiis), Ipeaking upon this fubirfl. 



The eledlon that followed, was not a contefted 
ele^on, but an animated one. The candidates 
were not men, but principles. Societies were 
formed in Paris, and committees of correfpon- 
dence and communication eftablilhed throughout 
the nation, for the purpofe of enlightening the 
people, and explaining to them the principles of 
civil government ; and fo orderly was the ele£Uoa 
conduced, that' it did not give rife even to the 
rumour of tumult. 

The States-General were to meet at Verfailles 
in April 1789, but did not aflemble till May. 
They fituated themfelves in three feparate cham- 

fays, ".Th« Brft ihing itiat ftruckmein the calling the Statis-Gcne- 
" tal, wa* a great depirture frDinihe ancient courreg'* — and helbon 
^terfayl, '< FroQi llie moment I.read tlic lilt, I Taw .lillinaty, and 
" rery nearly M it has hajipened, all that waa lo fallow." — Mr. 
Burke cettainly did not fee all tiiat wai to follow. I have endra- 
Touied to impref* hiin, ai well befora ti afier the StatM-General 
■pet, that there would be a rivolutam i but wa) not able to make 
him Tee it, neither would he believe it. How then he could itif- 
tinAly fee at! the pans, when the whole was out of fight, ii beyond 
tny Goni|irehenlion. And with rcfpeft to the " departure from the 
ancient courre," befidei the natural weaknef* of the rematk, it (bewt 
that he i» unacquainted with circumftances. The departure wat 
neeeffaryi from ihe exptrience bad upon it, that the ancient cou rfe 
was a bad one. The Statei- General of 1G14 were called at the 
comrnenceinent of Ibc civil war in the mingrity of Louis XIII j but 
by the clalh of arranging them by orders, they increafed the confu- ■ 
fion they were called to eoitipofe. The author of L'lnlrigiu du 
Cabinll (Intrigue of the Cabinet], who wrote beforeanyrevolution 
wu thought of in FrdDce, Tpcaking of the States- General of i£i4, 
fay», " They held the public in fufpcnfe five moothij and by the , 
' « queftiont agitated therein, and the heat with which they wej« 
" put, it appears that the Great (^Us graadt) thought more to faiisfy 
tf t\ieit particuhr pafEons, than to procure the good of ihe nation] 
'• and the whole time paffcd away in altercations, ceremonies, and 
••pande," L'lntrigue du Cabinet, vol, J. p. 1*9. 

O bfers^ 

L);.l....lbyCiOO'^lc 



bers, or rather the clergy anj -the ariftocracy 
■withdrew each into a feparate chamber. The 
majority of the ariftocracy claimed what they 
called the privilege of voting as a feparate body, 
and of giving their confent or their negative in 
that manner ; and many of the bifliops and the 
high-beneficed clergy claimed the fame privilege 
On the part of their Order. 

The Tiers Etat (as they were then called) 
difowned any knowledge of artificial Orders and 
artificial privileges ; and they were not only refo- 
lute on this point, but fomewhat difdainful. . Thty 
begart to confider ariftocracy as a kind of fungus 
growing out of the corruption of fociety, that 
could not be admitted even as a branch of it ; 
and frOm the difpofition the ariftocracy had fliewn 
by upholding Lettres de Cachet, and in fundry 
other inftances, it was manifeft that no conftitu- 
tion could be formed by admitting men in any 
other chara^r than as National Men. 

After various altercations on this head, the 
Tiers Etat or Commons (as they were then called) 
declared ihemfelves (on a molion made for that 
purpofe by the Abbe Sieyes) " the represen- 
** TATiVEs ofVhe nation; and that the two 
*' Orders could be confidcred but as deputies of cor- . 
*' poratiom, and could only have a Jeliberalhe voice . 
'* but -when they ajfembled in a national charader 
*' lAiith the national rcprefentatives." This pro- 
ceeding extinguilhed.'flie ftile of Etats G^nerau* 
or States-General, and erefied it, into the ftile 
it now bears, that of L'Affemble Nationale, . or, 
National Afiembly. 

This 

L);.l..=.JbvGOOgk 



C »'3 J 
■ This motion-was not made in a precipitate man- 
ner : It was the refult of cool deliberation, and 
concerted between the national reprefentatives 
and the patriotic members of the two chambers, 
who faw into the folly, mifchief, and injuftice of 
artificial privileged diftinftions. It was become 
evident, that no conftitution, worthy of being 
called by that name, could be eftabliihed on any 
thing lefs than a national ground. The ariftocracy ■ 
had hitherto oppofed the defpotifm of the Court, 
and affe^ed the language of patriotifm ; but it 
oppofed it as its riv^l, (as the Englifli Barons 
oppofed King John) ; and it now cf5)ofed the na- 
tion from the fame motives. 

On carrying this motion, the national reprefen- 
tttives, as had been concerted, fent an invitation 
to the two chambers, to unite with them iu a 
nationat character, and proceed to bufinefs. A 
majority of the energy, chiefly of the parift priefts, 
withdrew from the clerical chamber, and iuin';d 
the nation ; and forty-five from the other chamber 
joined in like manner- There is a ibrt of iecret 
hiitory belonging -to this laft circumftijice, wliich 
is neceflary to its explanation : It was not judged 
prudent that all the patriotic members of the , 
chamber, ftiling itfelf the Nobles, fhould quit it 
M once ; and in confequence of this arrangement, 
■ihey drew off by degrees, always leaving lome, as 
well to reafon the cafe, as to watch the fufpec'ced, ' , 
In a little time, the numbers increafed from forty- 
*ve to eighty, and foon after to a greater num- 
ber ; which, with a majority' of the clergy, and 
O 2 the 



C I04 J 

the whole of the national reprefentatives, put the 
mal-contents in a very diminutive condition. 

The King, who, very different to the general 
clafs called by that name, is a man of a good heart, 
fhewed himfelf difpofed to recommend a union of 
the three chambers, (m the ground the National 
AtTembly had taken ; but the mal-coments exerted 
themfelves to prevent it, and began now to have 
another prdjefl! in view. Their numbers confifled 
of a majority of the ariftocratical chamber, and a 
minority of the clerical chamber, chiefly of biOiops 
end high-benificed clergy; and thefe men were 
determine:) to put every thing to ilTue, as well by 
ftfength as by ftratagem. They had no objeftioa 
to a conftitution ; but il^ muft be fuch an one as 
themfelves ftiould diftate, and fuited to their own 
Views and particular fitua'lions. On the other hand^ 
the Nation difowned knowing any thing of them 
but as citizens^ and .was determined to fliut out 
all fuch up-ftart pretenfions. The more ariftocracy 
appeared, the more it was defpifed ; there vras a 
vifible inibecillity and .want of intelleds in the 
■tnajority, a fort of je ne fais quoi^ that while it 
affefted to be more than citizen, was lefs than 
man. It IcJft ground from contempt more than 
from hatred ; and was rather jeered at as an afs, 
than dreaded as a Hon. ITiis is the general cha- 
■ Tafler of ariftocracy, or what are called Nobles 
or Nobility, or rather Np-ability, in all coun- 
tries- 

The plan of the liial-contents cotififted now of two 
things J either to deliberate and vote by chambers, 

(or 



' [ -OS ] 
(oT orders), more efpecially on al! queftiona 
refpeQing a conftitution, (by which the ariftocrati- 
cal chamb^ would have had a negative on any - 
article of the conftitution) ; or, in cafe they could 
not actomplifh thjs objefl, to overthrow the Na- 
tional Affembly entirely. 

To effeft one or other of, thefe objeds, they 
began now to cultivate a friendlhip with the 
defpocifm they had hitherto attempted to rival, 
and the Count D'Artois became their chirf. The 
King (who has fince declared himfelf deceived 
into their meafures) held, according to the old 
form, a Bed of jfu/lice, in which he accorded to 
the deliberation and vote far iete (by. head) upoa 
feveral objects ; but referved the deliberation and 
vote upon all queftions refpeding a conftitution 
to the three chambers feparate!y. This declaration 
of the King was made againft the advice of 
M. Neckar, who now began to perceive that he 
was growing out of fafhion at Court, and that 
another minifter was in contemplation. 

As the form of fitting in feparate chambers was 
yet apparently Itept up, though eflentiallydeilroyed, 
the national reprefentatives, immediately after this 
declaration of the King, reforted to their own 
chambers, to confult on a proteft againft it ; and 
the minority of . the chamber (calling itfelf the 
Nobles), who had joined the national caufe, 
retired to a private hotife, to confult in like man- 
ner. The mal-contenrs- had by this time con- 
certed their meafures with the Court, which Count 
D'Artois undertook to conduct j and as^hey faw, 
from 

" L);.I..=.J by Google 



[ .06 3 

from the difcontent which the declaration excited, 
and the oppolition making againCl it, .that they 
could not obtwn a controul over the intended con- 
ftitution by a feparate vote, they pr^ared them- 
felves for their final objed — that of confpiring 
againfl: theNational Aflembly, and overthrowing it. 
The next morning, the door of the chamber of 
the National Aflembly was fliut againft them, and 
guarded by troops ; and the Members were refufed 
admittance. On this, they withdrew to a tenis- ' 
ground in the neighbourhood of Verfailles, a« the 
moft convenient place they could find, and. after 
renewing their feffion, took an oath never to fepa- 
rate from each other, under any circumftance 
whatever, death excepted, until they had efta- 
blifhed a conflifution. As the experiment of 
Shutting up the houfe had no other effeO: than 
that of producing a clofer connexion in the 
Members, it was o[>ened again the next day, 
and the publk bufinefs recommenced in the ufual 
place. 

We now are to have in view the forming of 
the new Miniftry, which was to accompliJh the 
overthrow of the National Aflembly. But as force 
would be neceffery, orders were iffued to affemble 
thirty thoiifand troops, the command of which was 
given to Broglio, one of the new-intended Mi- 
niftry, ft ho was recalled from the country for this 
purpofe. But as fome management was neceffary 
to keep this plan concealed till ^he moment it 
ftiould be ready for execution, it is to this policy 
that a declaration made by Count D'Artois mull 
2 hfi 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



[ >°7 ] ■ > 

be attributed, and which is here proper to bc' 
introduced. 

It could not but occur, that while the mal-con- 
tents continued to refoxt to their chambers fepar- 
rAte from the National AflTembly, that more jea- 
ioufy would be excited than if they were mixed 
with it, and that the plot might be fufpefted. But 
as they had taken thdr ground, and now wanted a 
pretence for ■ quitting it, it was neceiTary that one 
Ihould be devifed. This was effe^ually accom- 
plifhed by a declaration made by Count D'Artois, 
. *' That if they took mt a part ht the National Affem^ 
" bly, the life of the King would be endangered f" 
on which they quitted their chambers, and, mixed 
with the Aflembly in one body. 

At the time this declaratio^i was made, it 
was generally treated as a piece of abfurdity in 
Count D'Artois, and calculated merely to r&- 
iieve the outftanding Members . of the two cham- 
bers from the diminutive (ituation they were 
put in j and if nothing more had followed, this 
conclufion would have been good. But as thing* 
beft explain themfelves by their events, this appa- 
rent union i^as only' a cover to the machinations 
that were fecretly going on ; and the declaration 
accommodated itfelf to anfwer that purpofe. In 
a tittle time the National Aflembly found itfelf 
furrounded by troops, and thoufands daily arriving. 
On this a very ftrong declaration was made by the 
National Aflembly to the King, remonftrating on 
the impropriety of the meafure, and demanding 
the reafon. The King, who was not in the fecret 

ojf 

L);.l.^=.J by Google 



[ io8 n 

of thtsbuf)ners,as himfelf afterwards declared, gave 
fubftantially for anfwer, that he had up other ob- 
^ in view than to preferve the public tranquillity, 
which appeared to be much dillurbed. 

But in a few days from this tim9, the plot un- 
ravelled itfelf. M. Neckar and the Minifby were 
difplaced, and a new one formed, of the eoemies 
of the Revolution ; and Broglio, with between 
twenty-five and thirty thoufand foreign troops, 
was arrive'd to fupport them. The malk was now 
thrown off, and matters were come to a crilis. - 
The event was, that in the fpace of three days, the 
' new Ministry and their abettors found it prudent 
to fly the nation ; the Baftille was taken, and 
Broglio and his foreign troops difperfed; as is 
already related in the former part of this work. 

There are fome curious circumftances in the 
hiftory of this fhort-lived miniftry, and this fhort- 
lived attempt at a counter-revolution. The pa- 
lace of VerfaiUes, where the Court was fitting, wai 
not morethan four hundred yards diflant'frorn the 
hall where the National AlTembly was fitting. The 
two places were at this moment like the feparata 
head^quarters of two combatant armies ; yet the 
Court was as perfectly ignorant of the information 
which had arrived from Paris to the National 
AlTembly, as if it had refided, at an hundred 
miles dilfance. The then Marquis de la Fayette, 
who (as has been already mentioned) was chofen 
to prefide in the National Aflfembly on this parti- 
cular occsJion, named, by order of the AlTembly, 
th{«e fucceHive dotations to the i^ng,. on the 

Cookie 



[ log 3 

diiy, atut up to the eveiung on which the Baftille 
was taken, and to inform and confer with him 
on the ftat? of affairs : but the miniftry, who knew 
not fo much as that it was attacked, precluded 
all communication, and were folacing themfelves 
how dexteroufly they had fucceeded ; but in % 
few hours the accounts arrived (o thick and h&y 
that they had to ilart from their ddks and run. 
Some fet off in one difguife, andfome in another, 
and none in their own chara£ler. Their anxiety 
now was to outride the news lell they fhould be 
ftopt, which, though it flew fell, flew not fo 
fall as themfelves. 

It is worth remarking, that the National Aflim- 
b!y neither purfued thofe fugitive confpirators, 
nor took any notice of them, nor fought to reta.- 
liate in any fliape whatever. Occupied with efta- 
blilhing a constitution founded on the Rights of 
Man and the Authority of the People, the only 
authority on which government has a right to 
exift in any country, the National _Affembly felt 
none of thofe mean paflions which mark the cha- 
rafter of impertinent governments, founding them- 
felves on their own authority, or on the abfurdity 
of hereditary fucceflSon. It is the faculty of the 
human mind to become what it contemplates, and 
to a^ in unifon with its ohjed. 

The confpiracy being thus dilperfed, one of 

die &rR. works of the National Aflembly, inftead 

of vindi^ive proclamations, as has been the ca& 

with other governments, publiflied a Declaration 

• P of 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



of the Rights' of Man, as the bafis' on which the 
.new confHtution was to be built, and which i$ 
here fubjoined. 

PECLARATION OF THE RIGHTS OF MAN 
AND OF CITIZENS, ' 

By the National. Assembly of FRANCE. 

** The Reprefentatives of the people of France 
fiarmed into a National Affepibly, confidering 
that ignorance, negleft, or contempt of human 
rights, are the fole caufes of public misfortunes 
and corruptions of government, have refolved to 
fet forth, in a folemn declaration, thefe natural, 
imprefcriptible, and unafienable rights : that this 
declavaiion being conftantly prelent to the minds 
of the members of the body focial, they may be 
ever kept attentive to their rights and their duties: 
that the a£ts of the legifiative and executive pow- 
ers of government, being capable of being every 
moqient compared with the end of political infti- 
tutions, may be more refpeded : and alfo, that 
the future claims of the citizens, being direded 
by fimple and incontellible principles, may always 
tend to the maintenance of the conftitution, and 
the general happinefs. 

" For thefe reafons, the National Assbmbl^ 
doth , recognize and declare, in the prefence of 
the Supreme Being, and with the hope of his 
blefling and favour, the iolloytm^ /acred rights 
of men and of citizens : 



t ■■■ : 

' I. Men are born and al'ways contimie free, and 

* equal in refpeB of their rights. Civil dijlin^ionsi 

* therefore, can be founded only on public utility. 

* 11. The end of all political affociations is the pre- 

* fervation of the natural and imprefcrtptible rights 
' of man ; and thefe rights are liberty, property, 

* fecurity, and refifiance of opprejfion. 

* ■in. The nation is effentially the fource of all fo^ 

* vereignty ; nor can any individual, or any 

* BODY OF MEN, be entitled to any authority which 
' is not exprefsly derived from it. ■ 

* IV. Political Liberty confifts in the power of 

* doing whatever does not injure another. The 

* exercife of the natural rights of every man, has 

* no other limits than thofe which are neceffary 
' to fecure to every other man the free exercife of 
< the fame rights; and thefe limits are determinable 

* only by the law. 

* V. The law ought to prohibit only a£tions 
' hurtful to fociety. What is not prohibited by 

* the law, fliould hot be hindered ; nor ihould any 

* one be compelled to that which the law does 

* not require. 

' VI. The law is an expreflion of the will of 

* the community. All citizens have a right to 

* concur, either perfonally, or by their reprefenta- 

* tives, in its formation. It Ihould be the fame to 
' all, whether it proteSs or puniflics j and all 
' being equal in its fight, are equally eligible to all 

* honours, places, and employments, according to 

* their different abilities, without any other dijiinc' 

* tion than that created by their virtues and talents^ 

. - P 2 * VII, No 

L);.l..=.JbvGOOgk' 



* VII; No man Aould be accu&d, arrefted, 

* or held in confinement, except in cafcs determi- 

* ned by the kw, and according to the forms which 
*■ it hae prefcribed. AU who promote, foHcit, eice- 
' cute, or caufc to be executed, arWtrary orders, 
' ought to be puniihed ; and every cicizen called 
' upon or apprehended by virtue of the law, ought 

* immediately to-obey, and raiders himfelf culpa- 

* hie by refinance. 

* VIII. The law ought to impofe no other 

* penalties than fuch as are abfolutely and evi- 
> dently- necefljey: and no one -ought to be pu- 
' iuflied, but in vittue of a law promulgated before 

* the offence, and legally applied. 

' IX. . Every man being prefumed innocent till 

* he has been convifted, whenever his detention 

* becomes mdifpenfible, all rigour to him, more 

* than is neceffary to fecure his perfoQ« ought to 

* be provided ^ainlt by the law. 

* X. No man ought to be molefted on account 

* of his opinions, not even on account of his re//- 
' gious opinions, provided his avowal, of them 
' does not difturb the public order eftablifhed by 
' the law. 

' XI. The unreftraiiied communication of 

* thoughts and opimons being one of the moft 

* precious rights of man, every citizen may fpeak, 
' write, and puliHlh freely, provided he is refpon- 
' fible for the abufe of this liberty in cafes deter- 

* mined by the law. 

* Xil. A public force being neceflary to give 
' fecurity To the rights of men and of citizens, 

* that force is infUtuted. for the benefit irf the 

* community. 



C "3 3 

* community* and. nfX for t^ partkulv benefit 

* of the f>er£3»s with v/hem It is entnilled. 

* XUI. A coauDon contiibutioB bang.iieceffiuy 

* £oT the fufiftoTt of tlie ,p«blic £3rce, and for de- 

* fraying the other expeuces of goveriuncnt, it 

* ought to be divided equally araong the laaabett 

* of the ccmuRuni^, according to their abHities. 

* XIV. Every citizea hafi a rights either 1^ 

* himfelf or his reprefmt^ve, to a. iree voice 

* in idetermining the necefiiCy of pabiic cdatri* 
' butions, the appropiiaitson of them, ^ui thdr 

* amount, mode of afiTdTmenr, and duratioiL. 

* XV. Every conuTumity has a right to idemantl 

* of all its agents, an account 'Of their coadu3:. 

* XVI. Every comBiuiuty in whidi a fepara- 

* tion of powers and a fecurity of lig^ it aot 

* provided far, wants a conftitittioB. 

* XVIL TTie right to property being iimolaldB 
'. and facred, no one ought to be deprived of it, 

* except in cafes of evident public necdlity legally 

* afcertatned, aad on condition of a previous juQ: 

* indemnity." 

OBSERVATIONS on thb DECLARATION 
OF RIGHTS. 

The three firft articles comprehend in general 
terms, the whole of a DeclaraticMi of Rights : AB 
the fucceeding articles either originate out of 
them, or follow as elucidations. The 4th, 5th, 
and 6th, define more particularly what is only 
generally e:q>reSed in the ift, sd, and 3d. 

The 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



C "4 ] 

The 7th, 8th, 9th, loth, and nth articles.' 
are declaratory o( principles upon which laws 
fliaU be conftruded conformable to rights already- 
declared. But it is queftioned by forae very good 
people in France, as well as in other countries,' 
whether the loth article fufEciently guarantees' 
the right it is intended to accord with : befides" 
which, it takes crfFfrom the divine dignity of reli- 
gion, and weakens its operative force upon the 
mind. to make it a fubjeft of human laws. Ir 
thea prefents itfelf to Man, like light intercepted 
by a cloudy medium, in which the fource of it 
IS obfcuFcd from his fight, and he fees nothing 
to reverence in the dulky ray *. 

The remiuning articles, beginning with (he 
twelfth, are fubftantially contained in the princi- 
ples of the preceding articles; bat, in the particu- 
lar fituation which France then was, having to 

"There iii Tingle idfa, which, if it flrikes rightly upon the mind 
cither in a legal or a rellgluui fcnfc, will prevent any man, cr any 
boJy of men, or aoy goiernmcDi, from going wrong on ibe fub)^ 
<if Religion ; which is, that before any human inftituiions of govern- 
ment were knc*n in the world, there exiited, if I may fo exprefg 
it, a compift between God and Man, from the beginning of time; 
snd that at the rdtiion »nd condition which man in hia individual 
ftrpm ftands in towaids his Maker cannoibe changed, ci any way* 
altered by any human lawa or human authority, that religious devo- 
tbn, which it a part of this compaft, cannot ia much as be made 
arub)e3 ofhnman laws) and that all lawi mull conforn\ them- 
fetves to this prior exiRing compafl, and not alTuine to make the 
com pa A conform to the laws, which, heCdes being hnmari, are Aibfe- 
quent thereto. The fitft aA of man, when he looked around and 
faw himfelf a creature which be did not make, and a world fumilh- 
ed for hit reception, mult have been devotion ; and devotion mult 
erer continue facied to every individual man, as it appears right U 
AuT| and govenunenudo mifcbief by inteiftpng* 

undo 

L);,l,.i.lb,.C,OOl^l 



[ 115 ] 

undo what was wrong, as well as to fet up what 
was right, it was proper to be more particular 
than what in another condition of things would 
be neceOary. 

While the Declaration of Rights was before ihfi 
National Affembly, fome of its members remarked^ 
that if a Declaration of Rights was publiihed, it 
fiiould be accompanied by a Declaration of Duties; 
The obfervation difcovered a mind that reflefted, 
and it only erred by not refle^ng far enough. 
A Declaiarion of Rights is, . by reciprocity, a 
Declaration of Duties alfo. Whatever is my right as 
a man, is alfo the right of another ; and it be- 
comes my duty to guarantee, as well as to poflefc. 

The- three firft articles are the bafis of Liberty, 
as Well individual as national ; nor can any coun- 
try be called free, wbofegoveritment does not take 
its begitining from the principles they contain, and 
continue to preferve them pure; and the whole of 
the Declaration of Rights is of more value to . the 
world, and will do more good, than all the law* 
and ftatutes that have yet been promulgated. 

In the declaratory exordium which prefaces the 
Declaration of Rights, we fee the folemn and ma- 
jeflic fpeflacle of a Nation opening its commillion, 
under the aufpices of its Creator, to eftabliih a 
Government; a fcene fo new, and fo tranfcendently 
unequalled by any thing in the European world, 
that the name of a Revolution is diminutive of its 
charader, and it rifes into a Regeneration of man. 
What are the prefent Governments of Europe, 
but a fcene of iniquity and oppreffion ? What is 
4 that 

Google 



C «>« 3 . 

^at df England ? Docs not its own inhabitants 
bj. It is a maiket where every man has. his pricey . 
aod where corn^ion is common tialfic, at the ex- 
pence of a deluded people ? No wonder, then, that 
the French RcToIution is traduced. Had it con- 
fined itfelf merely to the deftruftion of ilagiant deC- 
potifin, perhaps Mr. ^rke and fome others had 
bccnfilent. Their cry now is, '* It has gone too 
•* far :** that is, it has gt»ie too far for tliem. It 
ftares corruption in the fece, and the venal tribe 
arc all alarmed. Their fear difcovers itfelf in theif 
outrage, and they are but puWifliing the groans of 
a wounded vice. But Arom fuch oppofuion, the 
French Revolution, inftead of fuffering, receives as 
itoma^. The more it is ftrudc, the more fparks 
it will emit J and the fear is, it will not be 
ftruck enough. It has nothing to dread from 
stacks : Truth has given it an eftabltfliment ; and 
Time wiU record it with a name as lafting as his 
own* 

Having now traced the progrefs of the French. 
Revolution through moft: of its principal ftages, 
■ from its commencement to the taking of the 
Baftille, and its eftablifliment by the Declaration 
of Rights, I will cbfe the fubjeft with the 
energetic apoftrophe of M, de la Fayette — May 
this great monument ratfedto Liberty, ferve as alejhn 
to the opprejfory and an example to the opprejfed! * 

' Ser page iS of thU work.— N. B. Since the taking the Bafiillr, 
Ae occmrencis havebetnpublifliec}: but the matter-, retarded in ihi» 
mrcative, are prior to that period \ and fome of tbem, at n»y ea&lf be 
ftcn, can be but very little known. 

MIS- 



i: "7 ] 

MISCELLANEOUS CHAPTER. 

To prevent interrupting the argument in the 
preceding part of this work, or the narrative that 
follows it, I referved fome obfervations to be 
thrown together into a Mifcellaneous Chapter j 
by which variety might not be cenfured for confu- 
fion. Mr. Burke's Book is all Mifcellany. Hia 
intention was to make an attack on the French 
Revolution.j but inftead of proceeding with an 
prderly arrangement, he has ftormed it with a 
Mob of ideas, tumbling over and deftroying one 
another. 

But this conhifion and contradiflion in Mr. 
Burke's Book, is eafily accounted for. — When a 
man in a long caufe attempts to fteer his courfe by 
;my thing elfe than fome polar truth or principle, 
he is fure to be loft. It is beyond the compafs of 
his capacity, to keep all the parts of an argument 
together, and make them unite in one iffue, by 
,any other means than having this guide always in 
view. Neither memory nor invention will fupply 
the want of it. The former fails him, and the 
latter betrays him. 

Notwithftanding the nonfenfe, for it deferves 
no better name, that Mr. Burke has afferted about 
hereditary rights, and hereditary fucceflion, and 
that a Nation has not a right to form a Govern- 
jnent for itfelf ; it happened to fail in his ^'ay to 
give fome account of what Government is. 
*' Government, fays he, is a contrivance of human 
" viifdm" 

<^ Admitting 



t "8 1 

Admitting that Government is 2. contrfvance 
of human •wlfdom, it muft neceffarily follow, that 
hereditary fucceffion, and hereditary rights, (a* 
they are called), can make no part of it, becaufe- 
it is impolTible to make wifdom hereditary ; and 
on the other hand, that cannot be a wife con- 
trivance, \<hich in its opM-ation may commie 
the government of a nafion to -the wifdom of an 
ideot. The ground which Mr. Barke now take» • 
is fatat to every part of his caufe. The argument 
changes from hereditary rights to hereditary wif. 
dom J and th^ queftion is, Who is the wifeft' 
man ? He muft now fhew that every one in the 
Une of hereditary fucceffion was a Solomon, or hi* 
litteis not good to be a king. — "What a ftroke has 
Mr. Burke now made ! To ufe a failor's phrafe^ 
he has fwabbed the deck^ and fcarcely left a name 
legible in the lift of kings ; and he has mowed 
down and thinned the Houfe of Peers, with a 
fcythe as formidable as Death and Time. 

But, Mr. Burke appears to have been aware of 
this retort, and he has taken care to guard againft 
it, by making government to be hot only a con- 
trivance of human wifdom, but a mottopoly of wif- 
dom. He puts the nation as fools on one fide, 
and places his government of wifdom, all wife-mejt 
of Gotham, on the other fide ; and he then pro- 
cl^ms, and fays, that *' Men have a RIGHT 
" that their waKts Jhould be provided for by this 
" wifdom." Having ' thus made proclamation, 
he next proceeds to explain to them what 
theb 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



C -l'9 ] 

aheir wants arcj and alfo what their rights are 
In this he has fucceeded dextroufly, for he makes 
■their wants to be a want of wifdom ; but as this 
is but cold comfort, he tlien informs them, that 
they have a riglit (not to any of the wifdom) 
but to be governed by it : and in Quder to imprefs 
them with a folemn reverence for this monopoly- 
government of wifdom, and of its vaft capacity foi* 
,-all purpofes, poflible or irapoQible, right or wrong, 
lieproceedswith aftrologiqal myfterious importance, 
.to tell to them its powers, in thefe words — '* The 
*• Rights of men in government are their advari- 
-** tages ; and thefe are often in balances between 
*' differences of good j and iu compromifes fome- 
■** times between gcod and ei;//, and fometimes bcr 
** twecn £vil and evil. Political reafon is a com- 
~** puting principle ; adding — fubtrafting — multi- 
" plying — and dividing, morally, and not meta- 
■*' phyfically or mathematically, true moral de- 
•** monftratioBS." 

As the wondering audience whom Mr. Burke 
juppofes hlmfelf talking to, may not imderlland 
.all this learned jargon, I will undertake to be its 
interpreter. The meaning then, good people, of 
all this is. That government is governed by no prin- 
■ciple whatever ; that' it can make evil good, or good 
£vily jujl as it plea/a* Jn Jhort, that governnxnt 
MS arbitrary power. 

But there u-e feme things which Mr. Burke has 

forgotten. Ftrjl^ He has not fliewn where the 

-wifdom originally came from: smd /econdly, he 

bai not fliewn by what authority it ftrft began to 

Qji a£t, 

L);.I....J by Google 



[ 120 3 

a^. In the manner he introduces the matter, it 
is either government {lealing wifdom, or wifdom 
ftealing government. It is without an origin, 
and its powers without authority. In ihort, it is 
ufurpation. 

Whether it be from a fenfe of ihamc, or from 
a conTcioufnefs of fome radical defed in a govern- 
ment neceflary to be kept out of fight, or from 
both, or from any other caufe, I undertake not 
to determine j but fo it is, that a monarchical 
reafoner never traces government to its fource, or 
from its fource. It is one of the Jhibboleihs by which 
he may be known. A thoufand years hence, thofc 
who ftiall live in America or in France, will look 
back with contemplative pride on the origin of 
their governments, and fay. This was the work of 
our glorious anccjiors .' But what can a monarchi- 
cal talker fay ? What has he to eixult in ? Alas! 
he has nothing. A certain fomething forbids him 
to look back to a beginning, left fome robber or 
fome Robin Hood fhould rife from the long ob- 
fcurity of time, and fay, / am the origin. Hard 
as Mr. Burke laboured the Regency Bill and he- 
reditary fucceflion two years ago, and much a$ 
he dived for precedents, he ftiil had not boldnefs 
enough to bring up, William of Normandy, and 
fay, There is the head of the liji, there is the foun- 
tain of honoury the fon of a proftitute, and the 
plunderer of the Englifli nation. 

The opinions of men with refpeft to govern- 

meni, are changing fall in all countries. The 

revolutions 

.,„„,C;,K,gle 



revolutions of America anil Franca have tlirowii 
a beam of light oter the world, whjch reachei 
into man. The enormous expence" of gw^ern- 
ments have provoked people to thinkj'byjnating 
them feel : and when: once the veil begins to rend, 
it admits pot of repair. • Ignorance xif. a jiecuUar . 
nature : once dlfpelled, and it is impoflible to re- 
eftablifti it. It is not originally a thing: of iifelf, 
but is only the abfence of kuowlege ; and though 
man may be kept ignorant, he cannot be made ig- 
norant. The mind, In difcoVering trvlh,, afls in 
the fame manner as it a^s through the eye in dis- 
covering objefts ; when once any objefl; has beea 
feen, it is impoIBble to put the mind back to the 
fame condition it was in before it faw it. Thofe 
who talk of a counter revolution in France, fliew 
how little they underftand of man. There does 
not exift in the compafs of language, an .arrange- 
ment of words to exprefs fo much ■ as the means 
of affeSing a counter revolution. The means 
muft be an obliteration of knowlege ; and it 
has never yet been difcovered, how to make man 
ttnknow his knowlege, or unthink his thoughts. 

Mr. Burke is labouring in vain to ftop the pro- 
grefs of knowlege; and it comes with the worfe 
grace from him, as there is a certain tranfa£tion 
known in the city, which renders him fufpeded of 
being a penfioner in a fiftitious name. This may 
account for forae 'ftrange doSrine he has advanced 
in his book, which, though he points it at the Re- 
volution Society, is effeftually direfted againft the 
whole Nation. 

«Thc 

II, , .: ^COOljIC 



, " The Kiiig of England," lays he, " holds hit 
"Crowa (for k does not belong to the nation, 
-■' accordieg to Mr. Bwrke) in contempt of the 
•*cbc»ce:of the Revolution Society, who have 
.'* not a-£itglc vote for a King among them 
■** eithCT individmtiy ov'toUedwely ; and his Mar 
" jefty's heirs, each in their time and order, will 
,•' come to.:theOoom kvki the favie contempt of 
<** their choice, with which, his. Majefty has fuc- 
■** ceeded to that' which he now wears." 

As to who is king in England or elfewhere, 
«r whether there is any king at all, or whether 
^he people chufe a Cherokee Chief, or a Heffian 
' 'Hufiar for- a King, is not a matter that I trouble 
< myfelf about, be that Co theinfelves ; but with 
tefpcfit to the doSrine, fo far as it relates to the 
'Rights of. Men and Nations, it is as aboniinable 
as aoy thiag, ever uttered in the moft enflaved 
country under Jieaven. Whether it founds worfe 
to my ear, by not being accuHomed to hear fuch 
defpotifm, than what it does to the ear of another 
|>erlbn, I am not fq well a judge of; hut. of its 
abominable . principle, I am at no lofs to judge. 

It is not the Revolution. Society that Mr. .Burke 
means; it ,is the Nation, as well in its original^ 
as in its rsprefentattve charafter ; and he has taken 
care to make himfelf underftood, by faying that 
they have not a vote either colledively or indi- 
vidually. The Revolution Society is compofed 
of citizens of all denominations, and of members 
of both the Houfes of Parliament; and confe- 
quently, if there is not a right to a vote in any , 
;. 3 of ' 

U;.t.z*dbv Google 



It "3 J 
cf the (Jharaders, thane can be no rigfit to any ■ 
wther in the nation or in its parliament. Thi» 
ought to be a caution to every country, how it 
imports foreign families to be Kings. It is Jome- 
what curious to obferve, that although' the people 
of England have been in the habit of talking about 
• Kings, it is always a foreign houfe of Kings j 
hating foreigners, yet governed by theni. It i» 
now the Houfe of ^runfwick, one of the p^tty 
tribes of Germany. 

It has hitherto been the pra£Uce of the Engliflk 
Parliaments, to regulate Wh4t was called the fuc- 
cefTKKi, (taking it for granted, that the nadoik 
then continued to accord to the fcKr&i of antie±'- 
ing a monarchical branch to its goverflment ; fot 
without this, the parliament could not' have hiA 
authority to have fent either to Hollaad or t« 
Hanover, or to ittipofe 'a King npon the tiafio* 
agiunit its will.) And this taait be the utnk^ 
Umh m which ^rliament can go upon the cafe( 
but the right of liie nation goes to the' whole cafe^ 
becaufe it has the right df changing its v;hole form 
of government. The right of a Parliament is 
only a right in truft, a right by delegation, and 
that but frc«n a very fmall part of the nation^ 
and one of its Houfes has not even this. But the 
right of the nation is an original right, as uni- 
verfai as taxation. The nation is the paymaller 
«f every thing, and every thing mu(t conform m 
its general will. 

I remember taking notice of a.fpeech in what 
'U Cj^led the Englith Houfe di Peers, by the 

then 



C "4 J 

■ A«i Eart of Shelburne, and I think it w^ at the 
dme he was Minifter, which is' applicable to this 
cafe. I d6 not dire&ly charge my memory with 
every particular ; but the words and the purport, 
as nearly as I t'emember, were thefe i That the form 
of a Government was a matter wholly at the will of a 
ffation at all times : that if it cbofe a monarchical 
form, it had a right to have it fo ; and if it after- 
wards chofe to be a Republic, it had a right to be a 
ftepublic, and to fay to a King, we have no longer any 
tccqfionfor you. 

When Mr. Burke fays that " His Majefty'i 
■'* hdra and fucceffors, eachin their time and order, 
*« will come to the crown with the fame contempt 
** of their choice with which His Majelly has fuc* 
*• ceeded to that he wears," it is faying too much 
tven to the humbleft individual in the country j 
part of wbofe daily labour goes towards making up 
the million fterling a year, which the country gives 
the perfon it ftiles a King. Government with 
infolence, is defpotifm; but when contempt is 
added, it becomes worfe ; and to pay for con- 
tempt, is the excefs of flavery. This fpecies of 
Government comes from Germany ; and reminds 
me of what one of the Bnmfwick foldiers told me, 
who was taken prifoner by the Americans in the 
late war : ** Ah !" faid he, '* America is a fine 
** free country, it is worth the people's fighting 
■'* for ; I know the difference by knowing my 
** own; in my country, if the prince fay. Eat 
*' ftraw, we eat ftraw." — -God help that country, 
thought I, be it England or elfewhere, whofe 
liberties 



liberties are to be proteded by German principles 
of government and princes of Brunfwicfc. 

As Mr. Burke fometimes fpeaks of England, 
fometimes of France, and fometimes of the world, 
and of government in general, it is difficult to 
anfwer Ws book wthout apparently meeting him 
on the fame ground. Although principles of Go- 
Temment are general fubjefts, it is next to im« 
poUible in many cafes to feparate them from the 
idea of place and circumftance ; and the more fo 
vhen circumftances are put for arguments, which 
is frequently the cafe with R^r. Burke. 

In the former part of his Book, addreiEng him- 
felf to the people of France, he fays, " No experi- 
" ence has taught us, (meaning the Englifh), that , 
*' in any other courfe or method than that of an 
" hereditary crown, can our liberties be regularly 
** perpetuated and preferved facred as pur here- 
*• d/tary right." I a(k Mr. Burke who is to take 
them away f M. de la Fayette, in fpeaking to 
France,: lays," For a Nation to be free, it is'fuffi- 
•* cienttbatjbe wills it" But Mr. Biirke reprefents 
England as wanting capacity to take care of itfelf j 
and that its liberties muft be taken care of by a 
King, holding it in " contempt." If England Is 
funk to this, it is preparing itfelf to eat ftraw, as 
in Hanover or in Brunfwick. But belides the 
folly of the declaration, it happens that the fa£b 
are all againft Mr. Burke. It was by the Govem- 
roent being hereditary, that the liberties of the peo- 
ple were endangered. Charles the firft, and James 
the fecond, are inftances of this truth ; yet neither 
R of 



of them went fo far 34 to hold the Nati^a in 
contempt. 

As it is fontetimes of ^vant^ge t© thg people of 
one country, to hear what thofe of other countries 
have to lay refpe£ting it, it is poflible that the peo* 
pie of France may learn fomcthing from Mr. 
Burke's Book, and that the people of England may 
alTo learn fbmething from the anfwers it will occV- 
fion. When Nations hil oxii. about fneedom, 3 
wide field of debate Is opened. The argument 
commences with the rights of war, witho« its 
evils } and as knowledge is the obje^ contended 
for, the party that fullains the defeat obtains the 
prize. 

Mr. Burke talks about what he caRs an here- 
ditary crown, as if it were fome pr6dn£tion of 
nature; or as if, like time, it had a power to 
operate not only independent, but in fpite of man; 
©r as if it were a thing or a fubjeft univerlaHy con- 
fehted to. Alas I it t)as none of thofe .prt^erties, 
but is the reyerfe of them all. Iti^aU^gin 
' unagination, the propfiely of which ia more than 
doubted, and the lega^ty of which in aftw years 
will be denied. 

But, to arrange this matter in a clearer view 
than what general e^praiHrais can convey, it will 
he neceSaty to ftate the diftin^ headt under which 
(what is_ called) an hereditary crown, or, more pro- 
perly f(»aking, an hereditary fucceffian to the Go . 
vernmen't of a Natioiif can be confidered; which 
ftre, 

Firft, Xh? right of a particular (xoailj. to eftab* 
liih itfelf. ■ 



■ t 127 3 

Secondly, The right of a Nation to elbblifh a 
particular family. 

With r£fpe£t to thcjirji of thefe heads, that of a 
lamily eftabliftiing itfelf with hereditary powers on 
Its own authority, and independait of the confent 
of a Nation, all mwi will concur in calling it def- 
jMJtifm ; and it would be trefpafling on. their under- 
ftanding to attempt to prove it. 

But the /econd had, that of a Nation eflablifh- 
ing a particular family with hereditary pciuers, it 
^oes not prefent itfelf as defpotifm on the firft; re- 
fleftion J but if men will permit a fecond reflefidon 
40 take place, and carry that refleftion forward but 
■one remove out of their own perfons to that of their 
offspring, they will then fee that hereditary fuccef. 
iion becomes in its confequences the fame -def- 
jjotifm to others, which they reprobated for them- 
felves. It operates to preclude (the confent of the 
lucceeding generation, and the precUifion of con- 
feiit is defpotifm. When the perfon who at any 
lime (hall be in poffeffion of a Government, or . 
thofe who ftand in fucceffionto him, fhall fay to a 
Nation, J hold this power in " contempt " of you, 
it fignifies not on what authority he pretends, to 
iay it. It is no relief, but an aggravation to a 
perfon in flavery, to reflect that he was fold by his. 
parent j and as that which heightens the ciimi- 
Mality' of an acl cannot be produced to prove the 
legality of it, hereditary Incceffion jcannot be 
cftablifhed as a legal thing. 

In order to arrive at a more perfeft decifion on 

«his head, it will be proper to confidef the gene- 

R a latioa 



C 128, ] 

ration which undertakes to eftablifli a feraily -mth 
hereditary powers, a-part and feparate from the 
generations which are to follow j and alfo to con- 
fider the charafter in which the ^r/? generation, 
afts with refped to fucceeding generations. 

The generation which firft felefts a perfon, and 
puts him at the head of its Government, either with 
the title of King, or any other diftindion, ads its 
cwn choice, be it wife or foolifli, as a free agent for 
itfelf. The perfon fo fet up is not hereditary, but 
fele£ted and appointed ; and the generation who 
fets him up, does not live under an hereditary go- 
vernment, but under a government of its own 
choice and eftablilhment: Were the generation 
who fets him up, and the perfon fo fet up, to live 
for ever, it never could become hereditary fuccef- 
iion ; and of confequence, hereditary fucceflion can 
only follow on the death of the firft parties. 

As therefore hereditary fucceflion is out of the 
queftion with refpeft to the ^r^ generation, we 
have now to confider the charafter in which tbat 
generation afls with refped to the commencing 
generation, and to all fucceeding ones. 

It affumes a charafter, to which it has neither 
right nor title. It changes itfelf from a Lcgijlaior 
to a Tejiator, and affefts to make its Will, which is 
to have operation after the demife of the makers, 
to bequeath the Government j and it not only 
attempts to bequeath, but to eftabliJh on the fuc- 
ceeding generation, a new and di£ferent form of 
goverfimeiit under which itfelf lived. Itfelf, as is 
already obferved, lived not under an hereditary 
Government, 



[ "9 3 
Government, but under a Government of its own 
choice and eflablifiiment ; and it now attempts, by 
virtue of a will and teftament, (and which it has 
not authority to make), to take from the com- 
mencing generation, and all future ones, the rights 
and free agency by which itfelf afted. 

But, exclufive of the right which any generation 
has to aSt colledively as a teftator, the obje£ls to 
which it applies itfelf in this cafe, are not within 
the compafs of any law, or of any will or 
teltament. 

The rights of men in fociety, are neither de- 
vifeable, nor transferable, nor annihilable, but are 
defcendable only ; and it is not in the power of 
any generation to intercept finally, and cut off the 
defcent. If the prefent generation, or any other, 
are difpofed to be Haves, it does not leffen the right 
of the fucceeding generation to be free : wrongs 
cannot have a legal defcent. When Mr. Burke 
attempts to maintain, that the Englijb Nation di4 
at the Re-volution of 1688, mojlfokmnly renounce and 
abdicate their rights for themfel-ues^ and for ail their 
pojlerity for emer ; he fpeaks a language that merits 
not reply, and which can only excite contempt for 
his proftitute principles, or pity for his igno- 
rance. 

In whatever light hereditary fucceflion, as grow- 
ing out of the will and telbment of fome formei* 
generation, prefents itfelf, it is an abfurdity. A 
cannot make a will to take from B the property of 
B, and give it to C ; yet this is the manner in 
vhich (what is called) hereditary fucceiEon by law 
operatet. 



operates. A certain former generation made a 
will to take away the rights of. the commencing - 
generation and all future ones, and convey tht^e 
• rights to » third perfon, who afterwards comes 
forward, and tells them in Mr Burke's language, 
that they have no rights,' thzt their rights are 
^eady bequeathed to him, and that he will 
govern in coaterttpt of them. From fuch principles, 
and fuch ignorance. Good Lord deliver the world ! 

But,, after all, what is this metaphor called a 
crown, or rather what is monarchy? Is it a 
thing, or is it a name, or is it a fraud ? Is it 
" a contrivance of human wifdom," or of hanian 
craft to obtain money from a nation under fpe- 
ciouB pretences ? la it a thing neceflary to a 
nation? If it is, in what does that neceiHty 
- confitl, what fervices does it perform, what is its 
bufmefs, and what are its merits? Doth the vir- 
tue confift in the metaphor, or in the man ? Doth 
the goldfmith that makes the crown, make the vir- 
tue alfo ? Doth it operate like Fortunatus's wifli- 
ing-cap, or Harlequin's wooden fword? Doth 
it make a man a conjuror ? In fine, what is it ? 
It appears to be a fomething going much out of 
fafliton, falling into ridicule, and reje£led in fome 
countries both as unneceffary and expenfive. In 
America it is confiderei as an abfurdity, and in 
France ' it has fo far declined, that the goodnefs 
of the man,, and the refpeft for his perfonal 
charaSer, are the only things that preferve the 
appearance of its exiflence. ^ 

If Government be what Mr. Burke defcribea 

it, " a contrivance of human wifdom,*' I might 

2 aik 



[ >3r 1 

«fk him, if wi^m was at Tuch a low ebb in Engi 
land, that it was become necefliary to import it • 
from Holland and from Hanover ? But I will da 
the country the }u(tice to lay, that was not the cafe; * 
and even if it was, jt miftook the cargo. The 
wifdc«n. of every coontry, when properly exerted, 
is fufficient for all its purpofes j. and there could 
exift no more real occaJion in England to have 
fentfbcaDutchStadthoIder, or a German Elector, 
than there was in America to have done a fimSliw 
ttung. if a country does not underftand its own 
affairs, how is a foreigner to underftand them, 
wha knows neither its laws, its inaoners, nor its 
language I If there exiited a man lb 'trah£:'ei»> 
dendy wife above all others, that his wifdom was 
oeceflary to inftrua a iMtion, fome re^iwi might 
t[e offiejed for monarchy j bat when we caft 
cur eyes about a country, and obferte he* everj* 
part underftands its own- affurs ; and when we 
look around the world, - and fee that of alt men ia 
it, the race of ^ngs are the moft infignificam in 
c^aciiy, our rea&n cannot hal to a& ps— ^^hat 
ace thofe men kq)t for ? 

If there is any thing ia monarchy which we 
|)eo{^e.o£: America -do !not underfbild, Iwifli Mr: 
BuriEewmild-befo kind as to inform us. I fee 
in America,.! govcrjiment extending over a coun^ 
' try ten time* as large as England, and conduSed 
with regularity for a fortieth part of the expence 
which government cofl in England. If I aik it 
maa. in America, ifhewantsa King? he retorts; 
aad a&8 me if I t^e him for an ideot i How is 

it 

U;.t.z=dbv Google 



It that this difierence happens ? are we more or 
lefs wife than others ? I fee ia America, the gene- 
rality of people living in a ftiie of plenty unknown 
in monarchical countries ; and I fee that the prin- 
ciple of its government, which is that of the equai 
Rights of Man, is making a rapid progrds in the 
world. 

If monarchy is a ufelefs thing, why is it kept 
up any where? and if a necellary thing, how can 
it be difpenfed with ? That civil government is 
' nece0ary, all civilized nations will agree in 4 but 
civil government is republican government. All 
that part of the government of England which 
begins with the office of conftable, and proceeds 
through the department of magiftrate, . quarter- 
feffion, and general affize, including" trial by jury, 
is republican government. Nothing of monarchy 
appears in any part of it, except the name which 
William th$. Conqueror impofed upon tbe.'£ngHfli, 
that of obliging them to .call him *' Theuri Sove- 
reign Lord the King." 

It is eafy to concdye, that a band .of intei-elled 
men, fuch as placemen,' penfioners. Lords of 
of -the bed-chamber, Lords of the kitchen. Lords 
of the necefiary-houfe, and the Lord knows what 
befides,. ca? find as many reafons for monarchy 
as their falaries, paid at the expence of the coun- 
try, amount to } but if I aik the farmer, . the 
manu^durer, the merchant, the trade&nan, and 
down through all the occupations of life to the 
common labourer, what fervice . monarchy is to 
him ? he can give me no anfw^r. If I aik him 
what 

U;.t.z=dbvGpOglc 



C ^53 3 
•what monarchy Is, he believes it is fomething like 
a. finecure. 

Notwithftanding the taxes of England amount 
to almoft: feventeeu milUoiw a-year, faid to be 
ibr the expences of Govemm«if^ it -is ftill evident 
that the fenfe of the Nation is left to govern itfelf, 
and does govern itfelf by magiftrates and juries, 
almoft at its own charge, on republican principles, 
excluftve of the expence of taxes. The falaries 
«f the judges are almoft the only charge that ia 
paid out of the revenue. Confidering that all 
the internal government is executed by the people, 
the taxes of England ooght to be lighteft of any 
nation in Europe; inflead of which, they are the 
Contrary. As this cuinot l>e accounted for on 
tlie fcore of pivil govanment, the fubjeft neceffa- 
rily extends itfelf to the monarchical part. 

When the people of England fent for George 
the Firft, (an^ it would puzzle a wifer man than 
Mf. .Burke to difcover for what- he could be 
wanted, or what fervice he could render), they 
ought at leaft to have conditioned for the aban- 
donment of Hanover. Belides the endlefs Ger- 
man intrigues that muft follow from a German 
Eleftor being King of England, there is a 
Natural impodibility of uniting in the fame perfon 
the principles' of Freedom and the principles of 
E)efpbtifm, or, as it is ufually called in England, 
Arbitrary Power. A German Elector is in his 
eleftorate a defpot : How then could it be ex- 
pefted that he fiiould be attached to principles 
of liberty in one country, while his intereft in 
S anoth^ 

U;.t.z=dbv Google 



C >34 ] 
another' ^nt to be fupported by defpotlfio F The 
union cannot exift } and it might eafily.have been. 
ibrefeen, that Gennan Eleftdrs would make Gsr- 
aun Kings, er, in Sir. Bnrke'g words, wouUl 
afiiimegQvenunent with * c(»itempt.* The Englifii 
have been in the h^it of confidsing a King of 
fj^^and (Hily in the c^anri^er in which he apjxsrs 
to them: wherew rfie fame peifon, wWlc the 
^nnedioa iafts, has a home-fe^t ip pother coua. 
, try* the incerdl of w^ch is djcSkna^ to Adr v^, 
4nd the princip^ of the gov«iiraeqf« in oppc^ition 
(o each other — To &ich a periim England will 
appear as a towntrefideace, and the Ele^^or^te 
w the eftate. llie EngEflt may vifli* as I beUev* 
they do, fuocefs tit the pitnciples of Ubeity in 
Friuicei or in Germany; but a GcUman EleiOor 
trembles .for the fate of defpotifmin his ek^orate : 
sad Ae Duchy of Meckleidiurgb, where the 
prefenc Qjieeo's family governs, is under the) 
&[ne wretched ftate of arbitr^ power, and tha 
people in Savifh vadilage. 

Thes-e iwver was a time when it became t^ 
£9g^iAi to watch contiaental intrigues more att 
cufn^je^ly thaft at the prdent mcuD^t, and tQ 
^iltjn^lh th^ p<}Vtics of the Ete^rat? fi^m thv 
politics' of the Nation. The revolution of Fraae* 
has entir^ely changed the ground with refpeft 09 
K^gland and France, as na^ons : bujt the Giertn^ii 
defppts, with Pjuffia at their hca4« are coqU^s^ 
ing agaiplt Liberty; a^d the fondles of Mr. Pitt 
for' office, and the iatereit which ait his fiunily^ 
connexions have obtained, do aot .gvve fuffiaent 
f«curity againft this intrigue. 

r" i'*' 



As ercTf thing whicit paffia In the world htk 
tomo maxter for h^lory, I witl Myt qini thts fbU- 
j«a( and lake A concUe f e*iew of the ftste of par- 
ties aftd ^kks id England, as Mr. 3u^lt» hai 
flon*^ in Ftwicc. 

Whether the |>refent reigh commenced with 
coriteitnpt,- I IfcavetoMr. Bnrfce : certairi ho*evc* 
it hi Chit H^ad ftrenglj fh»t 8(^(feirarice. Thft 
urimbfity 0f the tngWt Nattoh, it i« veiy well 
nnternbersd^ ran M^^ and; had flie k-st p^inctpiei 
of lAbtsttf b«ett fi9 ^reiranderftodd then As^if 
fi^ ^^e to h«» k is probable the Vbtion would 
titH have pattently fiibmiiiedM lb mdch. . Georg^ 
Ififr 1^ and Sefcoiid #ere ftrifilJld Af a rival in thi* 
teniaiAsof AeStUarfsj and !t« they Could not bxit 
6(^der theihli^^es as fianding eii their go6d beha'^ 
vitnir, thi^ h^d prudence to Iceep their Germ^ 
fHincipks of Goierntfaent io theMiielyes; but a,'^ 
i^ Sfeart FaftnUy wore iway^ the ftfldente btf- 
cartt'liferieceftut- ■ ■ ' ' 

' Tie coirteft betwetii rJglits, *td *bjrt were 't:^- 
tedjMpero^ttives, toiitinued to heat the Sfation rM 
feme time after the conclufton oT the AtaerihsH 
W*ff, when aff at oncfe ^ fell a cafm-^Eiecration 
fatasiiged itfctf for ap^Iaufe, ahj Court popula- 
rity li>raf^ npiace a fauftiroom fij a night 

To account fi» this fudden trahfifion, it" is pro^ 
per to obferve, that there »e t*o difti'n^ fpecic& ot_ 
pftpidarftyj the offle exciftJ by merit, the other 
8y tefimtment. As" the' Nation had formed itfeff 
into two parties, and each was extolliiig the merits' 
^ hs (JarRaroCntary champLpns for and againft 
.-■'•■ !^ 4; ■ ' jifetogafirej 



t .3« 3 

prerogattve* nothui|t!jooutd operate to give a ntore 
general fliock than' an imdudiate coatitioB of 
the champions then^tves. Hie -partifans of ettcb 

bejng thus fuddenly left in the lurch, and mutually 
heated with difguft at the meafurcj felt :no' other 
relief than uniting in a common execration againll 
both* A higher .l^mulus of refeiitiqfi^ b^l^lhus 
excited, thui what the conteit pnpc^ogatif>ie« had 
occaftoned, the Nation quitted 41:fotDier,Qbi«fit» 
of rights and wrongs, and ftiM^t: o'nly that of 
gtatiBcation. :Tijf indignatigi^^t the Coalitidi^ fo 
e%dually fuperfedad the indication s^aifiA ths 
Cofirt, astoextinguilhitj ;^pd,wjthout.apy cfiange 
pf principles -on -the part of th^ Cpurt, the feme 
people who had reprobated .its .dflfpotifin, united 
with it, to revejDge theiolel,ves,.c|n; the; Coa^tijon 
Parliament.. - "The cafe ^^ not,^ which th^ 4ik^ 
beft^ — but, ' ■ly^ch .^ey l^ate^ njoft; , ^^-^ 
jeaft hated-pag*^ £97 ,lov&, ^T^, diflblnoon .^tf 
the Coalition Ririiaihent, as it a^ifdetjL.theini^aqs 
ojF .grati^ing {he^eotn:^^ of the; l|fadan, ^loould 
mot ^l to be pi^ular iafidj.ftoni, brace arpie die 
jKl^ulaii^y of the Coifft,, ^ ,-;;; , , ; ,-,r:i 
,. TCranf^tiojis of this kind G(|Hb|t a. Nation i^i^ 
tVe go):ernmept'pif temper, inft^.of a;fixed eiid 
fteady principle ; ,^d having oocp cppunitted itfelf, 
however. raffily,. it feels itfelf urjffid alon^.tp ji^fti- 
fj^by: ccHitinjiaiice its firft proce^^g. IjJeafuret 
wMph at other "times it would c^nfure, it now ap- 
pjfbvess and acts perfuafion upon itfelf .to. fuffocate 
its "judgme.nt. . - ., ■ ,,.;,, .-■■[. 

' On_th? return of .a new Parli^cnt, the new 
.JMimfter, Mr. Pitt, foiiad hunfelf m a fecure ma- 
jority: 



i: w 3 

jority: and the Nation gaye hUn credit, -not. pat 
of TQg^ Xq hup(elf,,,but bet^aiii): it had refolyed ta 
doit-oittqfrefeQtmentto.fsothpr. He iotrodttced 
himfelf to public notice by a propofed, re£or«i^ 
Parliament,,, vrhich in itS; oper^tiqn wopi^) M^v9 
amounted to a public juiljification of cotruption. 
TheNatJonwas to be at't^o^nc* of buying up 
the rotten l)pj;pyghs, whsffa? it,^aght to punjih 
the perfons w^o deal in the ^affic. , - . ;;,^r 
, Paffingpyer.the two bi}bpJes,,of the Dutch biifi- 
iiefs, and the milUon a-year.io Tink the naiignai 
Idebt," the raah^" which mofl prejent? itfetf,,,!? ^(k 
^air of the' Regency. Never^Jiu the coiirfe of 
■ my'obfervatidn,''"waS delufton more luccefsfully 
a^ed, nor a jiation mpre. completely deceived^^ 
But,' to'make ihisappear, it will be neceflary to 
goover theciifciimftancea. 
. Mr. Frfx had ftated in.'the'Houfe of Cominons^ 
that the^i-Iiice of Wales, "as heir in fuccefllon,' had 
aright &i.Hiftii^ift(i aflame thegovehiment.'Tl{is. 
was opp^red by Mr. Fitt j and, fo far as theoppofi-) 
tion Was bpiifined to die doftrine, it was jiift. But 
(he priliciples' which Mr. Pitt maintained on the 
contrary iidej" were as badj or worfe in their ex\ 
tent,'''than thofe of Mr. Fox; becaufe-theywenf; 
to eftablifli' an' ariftocracy oyer the Nation,*' and 
over'iherfmall reprefentatiQn it has in the'Houfe 
of Commons. , '''.',' 

"Whether the.Engliih form of Goveramept'be. 
good or bad, is notinthis cafe the queftlon^ but, 
taking it as it Hands, mthout regard to its merits 
or demerits, Mr. ' Pitt was farther from the point, 
than Mr. Fox. 

■ ' ■ .It 



It is f»ppofed to cbiifift of three parts :*— rth3e, 
ifttfreforr, the Natfen t« dif^fcd to rtrtitinae thift 
fo«nj ^tepattsiivc a tiMioitalJaTtJUigi' iadepav- 
deM of each <rtK«r,' ^[ftd' are liot the fci^tuTes of 
ach <«her. Had Mr. F<!rs palM throngh ParSa- 
ittent, md faW,- tharthe peribn aUuded to clamed 
on the- ground of the Kfation, Mr. Pitt muft then 
have totitended (iffhat he calltd) die right of the 
Parliament, agalhft th? right of tft^ Nafion. 
' ' By the apjisartnee which the cOAtell trade, Mr. 
^OX .took the heredifiry ground, and Mr. Pitt 
tlte patKaiiiehfarjr ground ; but the faft is,'th^ 
both toot Jiereaitary ground, and Mr. Ktt took 
Ae wOrft of the two. ' . - ' 

"Whaf is called the Parliament,"is'ma3e iip of 
two Hoiifes"; oneof wTirch is mor? Jiereditary, and 
more beyond the controuTc^theKation, than whaf 
flie.Cro'ssip (jiA it. Is- called^ i« fuppofed tj>,l)e. , It ie 
aa hereditary ariftocracy, afluima^.and alferting 
indefe((mle, irrevbpabje rights- ai^d ajjthority, whol- 
ly utd^~endent of the Nation, ^^h^e then, was 
the merited- popularity of axaltiog^ ih^s hereditarj| 
power over another hereditary power lels inde- 
pendent of the Nation than what kfeft a^umed to 
fee,' antfof abforbing the ri^s of the- Nation 
ii^to a.'ttoufe- over which it has neither ekftion nor 
controul? 

The general tmpuUe of the Natitm was right ; 
but it afted without refIed:ion. It approved the' 
oppofitlort made to the right fet up &y iVlr. Fox, 
withoiQt perceiving ttat Mr. Pitt was fuppOrung 
another indefeaAbte right, more remote fi:oin the 
Nadon, ia oppofiiion to it. 

4 . With. 



' C '39 3 ■ 
■WiA TcfyeQ. to the Houfe oF Commons, it u 
pleded but by. a. fmall p^ oF the Nation ; but 
were the ele^Hon as univerfa) as taxation, which it 
ought. to be. It would fliU be qt^ly the organ of 
the Nation, and cannot poQels inherent rights. 
•—When the National ASembly of France refolvet 
a matter, the relblve is made in right of the Na* 
tion ; but Mr. Pitt, on all national queilions, fo 
hr as they refer to the ^ouie of Commonit, abforbc 
the rights of the Nation into the organ, and maket 
the organ inta a Natjonj and the Nation kfdf 
into a cypher. 
' In a few words, the quelUon on the Regency wa* 
41 queftion on a inilUon a-year, which is appropri- 
^ed CQ the executive department- : and Mr. Pitt 
could not polTefs himself of any management of 
this fum, without fetting uptfaefi^emacy of Par- 
Uanient ; and when ttus was aceompliihed, it was 
uutifierent who Jhould be Regent, as he mvA be 
Regent at his own coft. Among the curiofitiea 
which ihis contentious debate afforded, was that 
of making the Oreat Seal into a King ; the i^x-> 
ing of winch to an ad, was to be royal authority. 
Xf, thecefore. Royal Authority is a Great Seal, it 
eogfequently is in itfelf nothing ; and a good Gon- 
^tution Would be of infimtely more value to the 
Nation, than what the three Nominal Powers, as 
thiey now ftand, are worth. 

The continual ufe of the wotd Confiitution in the 
Ei^lifh Parliament, &ews there is none ; and that 
the whole is merely a.form of Government with- 
out a Coi^tution, and conftituting itfelfwith what 
powcra 



powers it plcafes. If there were a Conftitution» 
it certdnly could be referred to ; and the debate 
on any conftitutional point, woald terminate by 
producing- the Conftitution. One member fays, 
This' IS Conftitutionj another fays, That is Confti- 
imion — To-day it is one thing j and to-morrow, it 
is fomething elfe — while the maintaining the debate 
prcFves there is none. Conftitution is now* the 
cant word of Parliament, tuning itfelf to the ear 
of the Nation. Formerly it was the univerfal 
jitprtmaxy ef ParUament — the- sniHip'ofence of Parlia- 
ment : But, fince the progrefs of Liberty in France^ 
Ihofe phrafes have a defpotic harflinefs in their 
note ; and the Englilh Parliament h^ve catched 
Jheiaffuon from the Nati(Mial.Aflembly,- but With- 

. »at the fubftance, of fpeaking of C^nJiitutUn, > 
As the prefent generation of people in England 
did not make the Government, they are not ac> 
countable for any of its defe^s^ but that fooner 
or later it muft come into tlieir hands ta undergo 
a contiitutional reformation, is as certain as that 
the feme thing has happened in France. If France, 
with a revenue of nearly twenty-four millions 
fterling, with an extent of rich and fertile country 
above four times larger than England, with a 
popalation of twenty-four millions of inhabitants 
to fupport taxation, with upwards of ninety mil- 
lions fterling of gold and filver circulating in thd 
nation, and with a debt lefs than the prefent debt 
of England— ftill found it neceffary, from what* 

, ever caufe, to come to a fettlement of its affairs, it 
iblves the problem pf funding forboth countries. " 



[ >4. ] 

It is out of the queftjon to fay how long, what 
is called, the EngUfh conftitution has lafted, and 
to argue from thence how long it is to lad ; the ~ 
queftion is, how long can the funding fyftem Ink ? 
It h'Z thing but of modem invention, and has not 
yet continued beyond the life of a man; yet in that 
fliort fpace it has fo far accumulated, that, together 
with the current expences, it requires an amount of 
taxes at leaft equai to the whole landed rental of 
the nation in acres to defray the annual expendi- 
tures. That a Government could not always have 
_gone on by the fame fyftem which has been fol- 
lowed for the laft feventy years, mull be evident to 
every man ; and for the fame reafon it cannot 
always go on. 

. The funding fyftem is not money ; neither is it, 
properly fpeaking, credit. It in effeft, creates upon 
paper the fum which it appears to borrow, and 
lays on a tax to keep the imaginary capital alive 
by the payment of intereft, and fends the annuity 
to market, to be fold for paper already in circula- 
tion. If any credit is given, it is to the difpofition 
of the people to pay the tax, and -not to the Go- 
vernment which lays it on. Whenthirdi^ofition 
expires, what is fuppofed to be the credit of Go- 
vernment expires with it. The inftance of France 
under the former Government, Ihewg that it is im- 
polHble to compel the payment of taxes by force, 
when a whole nation is determined to take its 
ftand upon that ground. 

Mr. Burke, in his review of the finances of 

Franc^, ftatesthe quantity of gold and filver in 

T France^ 

U;.t.z=dbv Google 



Fruice, at about eighty-«ight millions fterEng. Ta 
doing this, he has, I prdume, divided by the di& 
^ence of exchange, inftead of the ftandard of 
twenty-four Uvres to a pound Ilerling; for M. 
Neckar's ftatement, from which Mr. Burke's is 
taken, is iw9 thoi^and two hundred mllions of Uvres, 
vhich is upwards, of ninety-one millions and an 
half fterling. 

M. Nieckar in Frsnce, and Mr. George Chalmera 
of the Office of Trade and Plantation in England* 
of which Lord Hawkefbury is prefident, publifhed 
nearly about the feme time C1.7&6) an account of 
the quantity <^ money in each nation, &om the 
returns of the B£nt of each nation. Mr. Chalmers, 
fions the returns of the Englifh Mint at the Towec 
of London, fti^es the quantity of money in £ng* 
land, including Scotland aad Ireland, to 'be- 
twenty millions fterling *. 

M. Neckar f fays, that the amouht of money in. 
France, lecoined from the old com which- wa» 
called in, was two thouland five hundred niillioD^ 
of iivres, (upwards of one huraJred and four milp 
liens fterEng) ; and, after 'd«lu6ii^ for wafte, and 
what may be in the Weft Indies; and other poffibl& 
circumftances, ftstes -the circulating quantity at 
home, to be ninety-one millions and an half fter- 
Hng ; butj taking it as Mr. Burke has put it, it ifr 
fixty-eight millions more than the national quan-r 
tity in England. 

• See Efiimaie eftbt CtmfaratiiM Strei^th vf Great BriUiiii, by G. 
Chalmen. " ' ■ 

f See Adminiftratioii of the Financci ef Fnuim, Vol. HI. by 
M. Neckar. 

Tbaz 



[ >43 3 

*niat the quantity of inoney ia Prance caonot 
i)e under this fum, may at once be feen irom the 
ftate of the French Revenue, without referring to 
the records of the French Mint for proc^. The 
revenue of France prior to the Revolutionj was 
nearly twenty-four millions fterling ; and as paper 
had then no exiftence in France, the, whole revenue 
was cotleded upon gold and filv^ ; and it would 
have been impoflible to have collected fuch, a quan- 
tity of revenue upon a lefs national quantity than 
M. Neckar has ftated. Before the eftablifliment 
of paper in England, the revenue was about; a 
fourth part of the national amount of gold and fil- 
ver, as may be known by referring to the revenue 
prior to King William, arid the quantity of money 
ftated to be in the nation at that time, which wat 
nearly as much as it is now. 

It can be of no real fervice to a Nation, to impof* 
Upon itfelf, or to permit itfelf to be impofed upon ; 
but the prejudices of fome, and the impofidon of 
others, have always reprefented France as a nation 
poffefiing but little money — whereas the quantity 
is not only more thiui four times what the quantity 
is in England, but is confiderably greater on a 
proportioD ^f Dombers. To account for this deficiT 
ency on the part of EngUnd, fome reference fliould 
be had to the £nglifh fyitem of funding. It ope- 
rates to multiply paper, and to fubflitute it in the 
room of money, in various Jhapes; and the moT« 
paper is muhiptied, the more opportunities Ore 
afforded to export ;the fpecie ; and it admits of a 
T 3 * poffibility 

- * D5.t.z=dbv Google 



C >44 ] 

poffibilit)' (by extending it to fmall notes) of 
increafmg paper, till there is no money left. 

I know this is not a pleafant fubjefl: to Engliih 
readers ; but the matters I am going to njention, 
are fo important in themfelves, as .to require the 
attention of men interefted in money-tranfaftions 
ofapublic nature. — There is a cir.cumftance ftated 
by M. Neckar, in his treatife on the adminiftration 
of the finances, which has never been attended to 
in England, but which forms the only bafis where- 
on to eftimate the quantity of money (gold add 
filver) which ought to be in every nation in 
Europe, to preferve a relative proportion with 
other nations. 

Lilbon and Cadiz are the two ports into which 
(money) gold and filver from South America are 
imported, and which afterwards divides and 
fpreads itfelf over E«rope by means of commercCj 
and increafes the quantity of money in „all parts 
of Europe. If, therefore, the amount of the 
annual importation into Europe can be known, 
and the relative proportion of the foreign com- 
merce of the feveral nations by which it is diftri- 
buted can be arcertained, they give a rule, fuffi- 
ciently true, to afcertain the quantity of money 
which ought to be found in any nation at any 
given time. 

M. Neckar (hews from the regifters of Lifbon 

and Cadiz, that the importation of gold and filver 

into Europe, is five millions fterling annually. 

He has" not taken it on a fingle year, but on an 

average 

u;.t.z=dbv Google 



r MS ] 

average of fifteen fucceeding years, from 1763 to 
1777, both inclufive ; in which time, the amount 
was one thoufand eight hundred millioD livres> 
which is feventy-five millions fterling*. 

From the commencement of the Hanover fuc- 
cefllon in 1714, to the time Mr. Chalmers -pub- 
iifhed, is feventy-twb years ; and the quantity 
imported into Europe, in that time, would be 
three hundred and fixty millions fterling. 
■ If the foreign commerce of Great Britain be 
ftated at a fixth part of what the whole foreign 
commerce of Europe amounts to, (which is proba- 
bly an inferior eftimation to what the gentlemen at 
the Exchange would allow , the proportion which 
Britain fliould draw by commerce of this fum, 
to keep herfelf on a proportion with the Teft of 
Europe, would be alfo a fixth part, which is 
■ fixty millions fterling ; and if the fame allowance 
for wafte and accident be made for England 
which M. Neckar makes for France, the quantity 
■remaining after thefe deduftions would be fifty- 
two millions j and this fum ought to have been 
in the nation (at the time Mr. Chalmers pub- 
lifhed) in addition to the fum which was in the 
nation at the commencement of the Hanover fuc- 
ceffion, and to have made in the whole at leaft 
fixty-fix millions fterling ; inftead of which, there 
were but twenty millions, which is forty-fix mil- 
lions below its proportionate quantity. 

' As the quantity of gold and filver imported 
into Ijftion and Cadiz is more exaflly afcetiaincd 

* Atlminidiation of ihc Fioancet of France, Vol, iii. 

than 



t '46 J 

Aan that of any commodity imported into Eng- 
land ; and as the quantity of money coined at the 
Tower of London is fltU more pofitively known, 
the leading h&s do not admit of controverfy, 
£ither, therefore, the commerce of England is 
unprodudive of profit, or the gold and iilver 
which it brings in leak continually away by un- 
feen means, at the average rate of about three 
quarters of a million a-year, which, in the courfe 
of fcventy-fwo years, accounts for the deficiency ; 
and its abfence is fupptied by paper *• 

The 



* Whetber the £nglilh commerce docs not bring !n money, «r 
whether the Government fcndt it out after it ii bronght in, ii a 
Btaticr which th; parties concerned can bcft explain i but that the 
4eftcieDcy cxitlsi it not in thepowerof eithertodifprove. While Dr. 
Price, Mr. Eden (novr Auckland), Mr. Cbalmen, snd'oihers, were 
debating whether the quantity of money in England wit greater or 
kf* than at the.Revoluiion, the circumftancc wa) not adverted to, 
that finee the Revolution, there cannot have bun UCt than 
four hundred millions fterling imported into Europe j and there- 
fore, the quantity in Englanit ought at Icaft to have been four timet 
greater than it nas at the Kevoluiion, to be on a proportion with 
Ekuope. What Englind i« now doing by paper, is wharfhe would 
have been able to have .done by Tolid money, if gold and lilver had 
come into ihe naiii<n in the proportion it ought, or bad not been ient 
ant^ and fhe i> cndeavouiing to reltore by paper, the balance fhe ha* 
loft by money. It is cenain, that the gold and ftivei which arrive 
annually in the regifter-lhips to Spain and Portugal, do not remain 
in thofe cotinlries. Taking the value half in gold and half in Glvei', 
it i* about Fonr hundred tons annually } and from the number of 
AiipB and galloons employed in the trade of bringing thofe metal* 
from South America to Portugal and Spain, the quantity fuffici- 
enily proves ilfclf, without referring to the regiftera. 
. In the lituation England now is, it is impoflible the can increafe 
in money. High taxes not only leiTen the property of the individuals^ 
but they I< Ren alio the money-capital of a nation, by inducing fmug- 
gling, which can only be cairled on by gold and Giver. By thcpoli- 
tics which the Britilb Government have cariied oa with the Inland 

Fower* i , 



C ■47 ] 

The Revolution of France is attended with 
many novel circumflances, not only in the politi- 
cal fphere, but in the circle of money traniadions. 
Among others, it fhews that a Government maj 
be in a ftate of infolvency, and a Nation rich. S& 
£ir as the fad is confined to the late Government 
of France, it was infolvent^ becaufe the Nation 
would no longer fupport its extravagance, and 
therefore it could no longer fupport itfelf — but - 
with refpeft to the Nation, all the means exifted. 
A Government may be faid to be infolvent, every 
time it applies to a Nation to difcharge its arrears. 
The infolvency of the late Government of France, 

Povert of Germany and the Continent, it hai made an enemy of all 
ibe. Maritime Power*, and Is therefore obiiged to keep up a large 
nan ; but though the navy is built in England, tbe naval Aores muft 
be purchared from abroad, and that from eountrle* where the greateft 
part muft be paid for in gold and filver. Some fallaciou* mmoura 
have been fet afloat in England to induce a belief of money, and, 
among oiheri, that of the French refugees bringing great quant iiiet. 
The idea i« ridiculou*. The general part of the money in Franoe 
U Hlvtr i and it would lake upwards of twenty of the largeQ bioad 
wheel waggoni, with ten horfts each, to remove one million flerling of 
filiw. I) it then to be fuppofed, that a few people fleeing on horfe- 
back, orinpollchaifci, in a fecret manner, and having the French 
Cultom-Hoiife to pafi, and the fca to crof), could bring even afudtci- 
eney for their own ex pence* i 

, When million* of money are fpoken of, it Ihautd be recolIeAed, 
that fuch fun>* can only accumulate in a country by flow degree*, 
and a long procelTian of time. The molt frugat ryllem that England 
could now adopt, would not recover in a century the balance fhe liai 
loft in money fince the commencement of the Hanovsr fucceffion. 
She. it feveniy milliont behind France, and fhe mult be in Ibme con- 
fiderabie proportion behind every country in Europe, becaufe the 
mums o[ [he Englifh Mint do not Ibew an increafe of moneji, while 
the regifleri of Lilben and Cadia Ihew a European inciuTe of be- 
twe«B tluM and four hundred millions fterting. 

ami 



[ U8, ] 

uld the prefent Government of 'England, differed 
in no other refpeft than as the difpofition of the 
people differ. The people of France refufed their 
^d . to the old Government ; and the people of 
England fubmit to taxation without enquiry. 
What is called the Crown in England, has been 
infolvent feveral times ; the laft of which, publicly 
known, was in May 1777, when it applied to the 
Nation to difcharge upwards of J^ 600,000, private 
debts, which otherwife it could not pay. 

It was the error of Mr. Pitt, Mr. Burke, and 
all thofe who were unacquainted with the affairs 
of France, to confound the French Nation with 
the French Government. The French Nation, in 
effeft, endeavoured to render the late Government 
infolvent, nir the purpofe of taking government 
into its own hands ; and it referved its means for 
the fupport' of the new Government. In a country 
of fuch vafl: extent and population as France, the 
natural means cannot be wanting ; and the poli- 
tical means appear the inftant the Nation is dif- 
pofed to permit them. When Mr. Burke, in a 
fpeech laft Winter in the Britifh Parliament, ca^ 
bis eyes over the map of Europe, and faw a cbafm 
that once was Trance, he' talked like a dreamer of 
dreams. The fame natural France exifted as be- 
fore, and all the natural means exifted with it. 
The only chafm was that which the extinction of 
defpotifm had left, and which was to be filled up 
with a conftitution more formidable in refources 
than the power which had expired. 

4 Though 

L);.I....J by Google 



C U9 T 

AUhougli the French 'Nation rendered tHe latfe 
Govemmeut iniblvent, it did not perpiit the infol- 
vency to aft towards the creditors ; and the credi- 
tors confidering the Nation as the real paymaller, 
and the Government only 4s the agent, refted theni'- 
felves on the Nation, in preference to the Govern- 
ment. This appears greatly to difturb Mr. Burke^ 
as the precedent is fatal to the policy by which Go- 
vernments have fuppofed themfelves fecure. They 
have contrafied debts, with a view of attaching what 
is called the monied interelt of a Nation to their 
fupport ; - but the example in France (hews, that the 
permanent fecurity of the creditor is in the Nation, 
andnot in the Government; and that in all poffi- 
ble revolu^oDS that may happen in Gi9venHnentS| 
the means . are always with the Nation, and the 
Nation always inexiftence. Mr. Burke argues, 
that the creditors ought to have abided the 
fate of the Government which they truftedj 
but the National Affembly confidered them as the 
creditors of the Nation, and not of the Govern- 
ment—of the mafter, and not of the fieward. 

Notwithftanding the late Government could 
not difcharge the current expences, the prefent 
Government has paid off a great part of the capital. 
This has been accompliihed by two means i the 
one by le&ning the espences of Government, and 
the other by the fale of the monaftic and ecdeiiaiU- 
cal landed eltates. The devotees and penitenbd^ 
bauchees, extortioners and mifers-of former days, 
to enfure themfelves a better world than that wfaicl^ 
they were about to leave, had bequeathed im> 
U menfc 



i: '50 3 . . 

mmfe property in trud to the priefthood, iot piou» 
u/es ; and the pnefthood kept it for themfelves. 
The National Aflembly has ordered it to be fold 
for the good of the whole Nation, and the prieft- 
hood to be decently provided for. 

In confequence of the R-evolution, the annual 
intereft of the debt of France will be reduced at 
leaft fix millions fterling, by paying off upwards 
of one hundred millions of the capital ; which, with 
leflJaiing the former exj)ences of Covemment at 
leaft three millions, will place France in a Htuatlon 
worthy the imitation of Europe. 

Upon a whole review of the fubjeft, how -vaft 
is the contraft ! "While Mr. Burke has been talk- 
ing of a general bankruptcy in France, the Na- 
tional Affembly has been paying off the capital of 
its debt; and while taxes have incfeafed near 
a million a-yeat in Ehgland, they have lowered' 
feveral millions a-year in France. Not a word has 
cither Mr. Burke or Mr. Pitt Gud about French 
affairs, or the ftate of the French finances, in the' 
■prefent Seflion of Parliament. The fubje£t begins' 
to be too well underftood, and impofition ferves' 
no longer. 

ITiere is a general enigma running through the 
whole of Mr. Burke's Book. He writes in a rage 
againft the National AtTembly ; but what is he 
enraged about ? If his affertions were as true as 
they are groundlefs, and that France by her Revo- 
littion had annihilated her power, and become 
what he calls a cbafm, it might excite the grief of 
a Frenchman, (conf^dering himfelf as a national 
man) 



[ '5- 1 

man), and provoke, his -rage agaii^ the National 
Aflembly ; but why Ihould it excite the rage of 
Mr. Burke ? — Alas ! it is not the Nation of France 
that Mr. Burke meaps, but the COURT; and 
every Court in Europe, dreading the fame fate, is 
in mourning. He writes neither in the charaGw 
of a Frenchman no|--an Engliifam^, but in the 
fawning character bf that <;reature known in all 
countries^ .and a friei\d to none, a Cojcjrtier. 
Whether, it be the Court of Ver&illes, or the 
Court of St. James or of Carlton-Houfe, or the 
Court in expe£latian, Signifies not ;. for the caterpil* 
larpritviiplp of all Courts and Courtiers are alike. 
They fonh a common policy throughout Europe, 
detached and f^arate from the intereft of Nations : 
and while they appear to quarrel, they agree to 
pl,under. ^Not^ing can be more terrible to a Court 
or a Courtier^ than the Revolution of France, 
That which is a bleffing to Nations, is bitteraefs 
to them.; and as t-Keir exigence depends on the 
duplicity of a countiy, they tremble at the ap- 
proach of' principles, and dread the precedent that 
threatens their overthrow. 



U* CON* 

u?.t.z=dbv Google 



CONCLUSION. 

■ REASON andlgnbrance, the oppbfites of each 
other, infiiience the great bulk of mankind. If 
either of thefe can be refldeted fuBicientty extea* 
five in a' cdnntry, the m^cluiiery of - Government 
gofcs t^lj on; Roafon obeys itfelf; and Ignorance 
fubmits to wbaterer is di£b.ted to it. 

■ The two «iod»4fG6veF&tneiit which ^Krail in 
thie world, are, jtr/ly Oovtmment by sileaion aiid 
teprefentttioa : Seeondijri- Coverfiiaoit' by here- 
ditary fttCCBfflati. Th«:lbl%^er '!fr'^enei^1}y:known 
by the'"bame of rqiiiblicj the' latter liy that of 
monafehfitej'anftocracy.. ' -■'■ '-'''■ 

Thofe twtj * diftinft and oppofite formsi' 'ereft 
ftemfelves ott' thetwodiftinft and oppofite bifis 
of ' Reafoii and ^;norance. — As. the fexetcife of 
ObTermnerit 'requires talents and abiHties^'and as 
taleiits and {ibilhies caniio^TiaTeheTeditSfydefcenr, 
it Is" evident that hereditar^'fiicceflioii requires^ 
"belief from ihan, to which hiSieafon cannot fob- 
fcribe, and which can only btffeftablilhed Upon his 
ignorance ; and the more igffOrant any Country is, 
the better it is fitted for this fpecies of Govern- 
ment. 

On the con,trary. Government in a well confli- 
tuted republic, requires no belief from man be- 
yond what his reafon can give. He fees the ratio- 
nale of the whole fyftem, its origin and its opera- 
tion ; and as it is beft fupported when beft under- 
ftood, the human faculties ad with boldnefs, and 
acquire, 

L);.i....i by Google 



i \i3 ] 
acquire, under this fonq-of Govanment, aglgandc 
manlinefs. 

As, ^erefgpj^e, each of thpfe forms a£ts on a dif- 
ferent bafe, tHe one moving freely ky the aid of 
reafon, the other by ignorance ; we have next to 
confider, what itis that^ives motion to that fpecies 
of Govermnent which is called mixed Govern* 
ment, or, as it is fbmetimes ludtcroufly fUled, a 
Government of /i6m, that, ai^ t'other. _ ;-; 

The moviag power ie this fpecies of Govern- 
ment, is of neceffity. Corruption. However ^mpo-- 
fe£t ele£lion-and reprefemation may be in mixed 
Governm£ntSp, they ftillgivp exercife to a greater 
portioo of reafon than is convenient to the here- 
ditary Part j; and therefor,e «.becomes neceflaiy to 
buy the reafon un. A mixed Government is an, 
imperfefl: evety-thmg, cementing and foldtringrthe 
difqoJtdaJU-.Barts together by corruption, to aia ?s a 
whole.,/^r. Burke appears highly, difgufted, that 
France,' (Tnce ?he had refolved pn a revolution, did 
not adopt what he calls " [A Britijh Con^itutien;" 
and the regretful manner in which he expreffes 
himfelf on . this occafion, implies a fufpicion, that 
the Britifli Conftitution needed fomething to keep 
its defeats in countenance. 

In mixed Governments there is no refponfibility: 
the parts cover each other till refponfibiUty is loltj 
and the corruption which moves the machine, con- 
trives at the fame time its own efcape. When it 
is laid down as a maxim, that a King can do no 
wrong, it places him in a ftate "of fimilar fecurity 
with that of ideots and perfons infane, and refpon- 
fibility;! 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



fibility is out of the queftion with refped td him- 
felf. It then defceijds. upon the Miniller, who 
flielters himfeif under a majority in Parliament, 
wlirclr, by places, penfions, and corruption, he can 
always command ; and that majority jirftifies itfetf 
by the fame authority with which it protefts the 
Minifter. In this rotatory motion, refponfibility is 
thrown off from the parts, and from the whole. 

When there is a Part in a Govei'nment which 
can do no wrong, it implies that it dofcs nothing ; 
and is oftly the machine of another power, by 
whofe advice and dtredicn it acts. What is fup- 
pofed to be-the King in mixed Governments, is the 
Cabinet ; and- as the Cabinet is always a part of 
the ParKam^ht, and the members jufUfyirig in one 
charaQicr what they advife and ail in another, 
a mixed Government becomes a continual enigma j 
6itailing upon a country, by the quantity of cor- 
ruption neceffary to folder the parts, the expence 
of fupporting all the forms of Government at once, 
and finally refolving itfelf into a Government by 
Committee ; in which the advifers, the aftors, the 
approvers, the juftifiers, the perfons refponfible, 
and the perfons not refponfible, are the fame per- 
fons. 

By this pantomimical contrivance, and change 
of fcene and character, the parts help each other 
out in matters, which, neither of them fingly would 
affume to aft. When money is to be obtained, the 
mafs of variety apparently diiToIves, and a profu-^ 
fion of parliamentary "praifes paffes between (he 
parts. Each admires with aftoaifliment the wif- 
dom, 



C -55 ] 

dom, the liberality, the difintereftedneft of the 
other ; and all of them breathe a pitying figh at 
the burthens of the Nation. 

But in a well-conftituted republic, nothing of 
thisfoldering, praifing, and pitying, can take place; 
the reprefentation being equal thtoughout the 
country, and compleat in itfelf, however it may 
be arranged into legiflative and executive, they 
have all one and the fame natural fource. The 
parts are not foreigners to each other, like demo- 
cracy, arillocracy, and monarchy. As there are no 
difcordant diftindtions, there is nothing to corrupt 
by compromife, nor confound by contrivance. 
Public meafures appeal of themfelves to the under- 
Aanding of the Nation, and, reding on their own 
ijierits, difown any flattering application to vanity. 
The continual whine of lamenting the burden of 
taxes, however fuccefsfully it may be praSifed in 
mixed Governments, is inconfiftent with the fenfc 
and fpirit of a republic. If taxes are neceffary, 
they are of courfe advantageous ; but if they 
require an apology, the apology ilfelf implies an 
impeachment. Why then is man thus impofed 
upon, or why does he impofe upon himfeif ? 

When men are fpcken of as kings and fubjefts, 
or when Government is mentioned imder the^dif- 
tin£t or combined heads of monarchy, ariftocracy, 
and democracy, what is it that reafoning man is 
to underftand by the terms ? If there really exifl:ed 
in the world two or more.diflind and feparate 
elements of human power, we ihould then fee the 
£sveral origins to which thofe terms would de- 
fcriptively 



fcriprively apply: but as there is but one fpecies of 
man» there Qin he but one clement of human 
power ; and that element is man himfelf. Monar- 
chy, ariftocracy, and democracy, are but qreaturea 
of imagination ; and a thpufand fuch may be con- 
triTed, as well as three. 



From the Revolutions of America and France, 
and the fymptoms that have appeared in other-coun- 
tries, it is evident that the opinion of the world is . 
chan^g with refpeft to fyftems of Government, 
and that ^e^'oIution8 are not within the compafs of 
political calculations. The progrefs of time and 
circuniftances, which men affign to the accompUfii- 
ment of great changes, is too mechanicaj to mea-i: 
furethe force of the mind, and the rapidity of . 
reflexion, by which revolutions are generated : 
AH the old governments have received a fliock from 
thofe that already appear,, and which were once- 
more improbable, and are a greater fubje^ of 
, wonder, than a general revolution in Europe would 
be now. 

When we furvey the wretched condition of man 
tinder . the monarchical and hereditary Jfyftems of 
Government, dragged from his home by one 
power, or driven by another, and impoveriflied 
by t^es more than by enemies, it becomes evident 
that thofe fyftems are bad, and that a general revo- 
lution in the principle and conil.ruftion of Govern- 
ments is neceOary. 

' ^ What' 

I) ;vi by Google 



t '57 ] 
What U government more than the management 
of th^ aff^rs of a ^Tation? It is not» and from its 
nature cannot be, the property of .any partictdar 
man oT family, but of the whole community, at 
whofe expenceit is fupportedj and though bji 
(otce or contrivance it has beien uAirped into att 
inheritance, the ufurpation cannot sJtet the right 
of things. Sovereignty, as a matter of right, 
appertains to the Nation only, anti not to any 
individual; and a Nation has at all times an In* 
herent indefeafible right to abolilh' any foiin of 
Government it finds inconvenient, i.nd eflablifH 
fuch as accords with its intereft, difpofition, and 
happinefg. The romantic and barbarous diftindidn * 
of men into Kings and fubjefts, though it may 
•fuit the condition of courtier^, cannot that of • 
citizens ; and is exploded by the principle upon 
which Governments are now founded. Every 
citizen is- a member of the Sovereignty, and, as 
fuch, can acknowledge no perfonal fubjeftion j and 
his obedience can be only to the laws. 

■ When men think of what Government is> they 
mud neceffarily fuppofe it to poffefs a" knowledge 
of all the obje^ ■ and matters upon which its 
authority is to be exercifed. In this view of Go- 
V ernment, therepubHcan fyftem, as eftabliflied by 
America and France, operates to embrace the whole 
of a Nation; and the knowledge neceffary to the in- 
tereft of all the parts, is to be found in the center, 
which the parts by reprefentation form : But the 
old Governments are on a conftruSioH that ex- 
cludes knowledge as well as happinefs j Goverri- 
X ment 



mcnt by Monks, who know nothing of the world 
beymid the walls of a Convent, is as confiftent za 
government by- Kings. 

What were formerly called Revolutions, were 
little more than a change of perfons, or an altera- 
tion of local circumftances. They rofe and fell 
like thii^ of courfe, and had nothing in their 
exiftence or their fate that could iniluence beyond 
the fpot -that produced them. But what we now 
fee in the world, from the Revolutions of Aiherica 
and France, are a renovation of the natural order 
of things, a fyftem of principles as univerfal as 
truth and the exiftence of man, and combining 
moral with political happinefs and national pro- 
fperity. 

* I. Men are born and always continue free, and 
' equal in refpeSl of their rights. Civil di/iinStiomt 
' therefore^ can he founded only on public utility. 

* II. The end of all political ajfociations is the prC' 
' fervation of the natural and imprefcriptihle righti 

* of man ; and thefe rights are liberty^ property, 

* fecurity, and refiftance of opprejfion, 

' HI. The Nation is ejfentially the fource of all Sa- 
' vereignty; nor can any individual, or any 

* BODY OF MEN, be entitled to any authority wh'tcb 

* is not exprefsly derived from it.'- 

In thefe principles, there is nothing to throw a 
Nation into confufion by. infiaming ambition. 
They, are calculated to call forth wifdoro and 
abilities, and to exercife them for the public good. 
J ,' . ■ ■ ^ ' " an* . 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



i 'S9 1 

and not for the emolument or aggrandizement of 
. -particular defcriptions of men or families. Monar- 
chical fovereignty, the enemy of mankind, and the 
foarce of mifery, is abolilhed; and fovereignty itfelf 
is reflored to its natural and original place, the 
Nation. Were this the cafe throughout Europe, 
the caufe of wars would be taken away. 

It is attributed to Henry the Fourth ofTrance, 
a man of an enlarged and benevolent heart, that 
he propofed, about the year i6id, a plan for 
abolifliing war in Eurc^. The plan confifted in 
conftituting a European Congrefs, or ^ the French 
Authors llile it, a PaciSc RepuUic; by appointing 
delegates from the feveral Nations, who were to zSt 
as a Court of arbitration in any difputee that might 
arife between nation and nation. 

Had fuch a plan been adopted at the time it 
was propofed, the taxes of England and France^ 
as two of.the parties, would have been at leaft ten 
millions fterling annually to each Nation lefs than 
they were at the commencement of the French 
Revolution. 

To conceive a caufe why fuch a plan has nqt 
l)een adopted, (and that inflead of a Congrefs for 
the purpofe of preventing war, it has been called 
only to terminate a war, after a fruitlefs expence of 
feveral years), it will be neceflary to confider the 
intereft of Governments as a diftiilft intereft to that 
of Nations* 

Whatever is the , caufe of taxes to a Nation, 

"becomes alfo the means of revenue to a Govern- 

■.'Bient. Every war terminates with an addition of 

X 2 taxes. 



t '60 3 

taxes, and ronfequently with an addition of 
revenue ; and iA any erent <^ war, in the matmer 
they are now commenced and concluded, the power 
and intereft of Governments are iocreafcd* War, 
therefore, from its produaiveftefa, as it eafiljr 
ftimiflies the pretence of necciBty for taxes and 
appointments to places and offices, becomes a prin- 
■dpal part 6F the-fyftem of old Govemmeiite ; and 
to eftablifii any mtxie to abolMh war, however 
advantageous it might be to Natiofts, would be to 
take from fuch Government the moft lucrative of 
its broaches. The frivolous aiattws upon which 
war U made, (kevt the difpofiti^tn and avidity of 
Governments to uphold the fyftem of war, and 
betray ihe motives upon which they aS. 

Why are not Republics plunged into war, but 
becaufe the nature of their Government does not 
ttdmit of an intereft diftin^ft to that of the Nation ? - 
Even Holland, though an ill-conftruGed Republic, 
and with a commerce extending over the world, 
exifted nearly a century without war : and the 
inftant the form of Government was changed in 
France, the republican principles of peace and 
doraeftic profperity and cecono'my arofe with the 
new Governmenr; and the fame confequences 
would follow the fame caufes in other fJations. 

As war is the fyftrem of Government - on the 
old conftruclion, the animofity which Nations 
reciprocally entertain, is nothing more than what 
the policy of their Governments excite, to keep up 
the fpirit of the fyftem. Each Government accufes 
- the 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



c >«<- 1 

the odier nf perfidy, intrigb^ «fti ^Mbitiofi» %t « 
means of h^iting the indigibation of their reQKdiT^ 

Nations, and incenfing them to holtilities. Man 
. is not the^tiemy of iaan, IsucilirQ^gU tUt ipsdaum 
of a fitlfe fT^bi-c^ Goveitemcnjt; Inft«t4 there> 
fore, uf esolcdinik^ igainft the a&Ai^B of Kingaj 
thb ek:claoi«)oa fhould br dire^ed ag^i^ tb^ 
piinc^le of fufi^ G(^ei-tun«ittft; oad iaU^d t^ 
fceking-to r£fbrm the iadivi<laai» ibe wi&Laa {if 4 
Nation fltould lapply itJeli- to. reform the fj^fteia., ; :; 
Whether the forms -and maxima of Gdvem^ 
inents wMch ue Hill iu praiQicc, were adapted to 
theconditicmof the world siC theiperiod thej wer« 
eftabliflied, is not io this cafe the queftion. The 
older they are, the lefs correfpondence can they 
have with the prefent ftate of things. Time, and . 
chan;ge of cJrcumftaiices and opinions, have the 
fame progreflive effeft in rendering modes of 
Government obfolete, as they have upon cufloms 
and manners. — Agriculture, commerce, manufac- 
tures, and the tranquil arts, by which the profpejity 
«f Nations is belt promoted, require a different 
fyftem of Government, and' a different fpecies of 
knowledge to dire^ its operations, to what might 
have been the former condition of the world. 

As it is not difficult to perceive, from the 
enlightened ftate of mankind, that hereditary 
Governments are verging to their decline, and 
that Revolutions on the broad bafis of national 
fovereignty, and Government by reprefentation, 
are . making their way in Europe, it would be an 
id. of wifdom to anticipate their approach, and 
produce 



C 'So 1 

pfoiuM'RimiiadctDt by reafoni and acconunoda- 
^btii -rather than c<»linic them to the iffue of con- 
?^(fion». 

- - From' what wc now fee, nothing of reform in 
the pbWt$»l world ought to be held improbable. 
It is ati age of Revolutions, in ^hich every thing 
may be looked for. The intrigue of Courts, by 
which the fyftem'of war is kept up, may .provoke 
ft 'confederation ef Nations to aboUlh it : and a 
European Congrefs, to patronize the progrefs of 
fred -Government, and promote the civifizatkm of 
Nations with each other, is an event nearer ia 
probal»Iity, than'onee were the revolutions and 
klUance of France and America. 



F I N 



■ U;.t.z=dbv Google 



D I A L O G U E S 



OH T H ■ 



RIGHTS of BRITONS, &c.- 



DIALOGUE THE FIRST. 



{Price Two-pence ; or. Three Shillings and Six- 
pence the Quarter of a. Hundr&d.J 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



DIALOGUES 

OK THl 

RIGHTS 

OF 

BRITONS, 

BETWKBR ^ 

A FARMER, 
A SAILOR, 

AND 

A MANUFACTURER. 



DIALOGUE THE FIRST. 



THE SECOND EDITION. 



LONDON; 

VRlKTED rOK T. I.ONCUAH, FATBH-HOITIK-IIOW | Ct HICOt, 

FALL-MKLLi J. tBWtLI.i COKHHILL ) ]. Pllll>I>IH| 

Fl.IIT>STIlEl,T{ AND ]. nEBlITT, PieGADILl.T< 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



DIALOGUE Si &£!. 



1 Farmer,-^Sa!lori 

Farmer i-^ ' ' 

WELLj jack! I r^oice tliat you have 
made fo fuccefsful a vpyage, and I am ' 
happy to inform you that the prize-money 
which you got vrith fo thtu;h honor the laH; 
war, and which I previiled on you to let me 
lay out for you in the funds, is almoft doiibled 
by the prodigious rife of Stocks; But he^e 
comes an old friend of yoars-^ 

Enter MANtlFACTURElt. 

Sat, And I am forry to fee that old friend 
has a new face. Good God ! what an altera- 
tion : How ihy he looks : Wlut cheer my lad ? 
A 3 Mayhap 



[ « ] 

Mayhap you liavc met with rough weather. 
I^eyer mind« we can't always have a fair windr 

Man. (Jur/i/y). No, and I believe we fliall 
have a ftorm before a calm. 

Far. Why, what is the matter now ? No 
frefh misfortune, I hope. 

Mart* Only my •cuffed landlord has threatened 
to feize my goods again if I do not pay my rent 
in a week ; and God knows I could as welt carry 
the houfe on my Ihoulders. But all thofe mat- 
ters will befct to rights by-and-hy. and land- 
lords will find thenifelves in the wrong box. 

Far. How is it that every thing of late feems 
to have gone crofs with you ? Formerly you 
were in a thriving way, and full of mirth and 
gaiety ; now you are moping and peevith, and 
always meeting with ibme misfortune or ano-- 
ther. WBence comes this change ? You have 
had nb illncfs in ybur family to pull you back. 

: Mf^fi.. Why, to tell- you the truth, my time ' 
hfls.l^ely been taken up a good deal out of my 
bufiijefs and in a better way. And i bough 1 feel 
the. incopvenipnccin family affairs, 1 am wifer 
than ever I was in-niy life. . - 

Far. More f}o/iJh, you (hould have faid, lince, 
by your negleft, you have brought your family 
into trouble. But pray tell me in. what man-- 
ncryou have been employed. 

Man, I 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



t ? ] 

Man. I hftffc been iludying Mr. Paine's 
** Rights of MdH," and other 'VS^jrfcs of the like 
kind: and I hare been attending Clubs which 
have been eftablilhed in our town for the pur- 
pofe of obtaining thdfe Rights. 

Sat. And who the devil has dated to fall 
foul of thofe Rights in this Country ? I'll be 
d— 'd if any foreign force will venture to at- 
tack them while they are defended by fuch 
a Navy and fo many gallant Tars. And as to 
matKTs at home> I never heard before but that 
every man's Rights were protefted by Law. ' 

Far, Andfo the^ al-e, aild eve^ will be while 
the Conftitution remains in force and vigor; 
thank God there is not a lingle right which 
man can enjoy, that is not enjoyed and fecured, 
in the completed manner, in this Country. 
But if you {toManufa^urer) have been ftudy- 
ing Mr. Paine. I am not at ^1 furprized 
that your mind is become rcAlefs, your hands 
idle, and your circumflances embarrafled. 
Thefe are the Rights which he endeavours to 
eftablifh among the laborious part of the Com- 
munity : He fecks to infufe the poifon of dif- 
contentinto their minds, in order to make them 
his tools to promote confufion. He wifhct to 
difturb the State, to overturn the Government, 
to demolifh the CoDHitutionj and to throw 
the Kingdam- into diforder, that he may 
gain thofe advantages in a fcratable which 
A 4 he 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



[ S ] 

)ie know6 can never be procured by his 
merits. But leeing that the Country is ftouriOi- 
^ngv and its inhabiunts free, loyal, and hgppy, 
be finds that there is no chance of fucceeding 
in his diaboHcal rchemes, unlefs he can reBdcf 
the people difcontented and difaffc<ftcd. He 
therefore endeavours to blind their eyes to all 
thofe glorious and folid advantages, which hav« 
hit;hertQtiiade;thenameofan£ngliihmanrefpe^ 
f^jand his cpndit|on enviedall over the wqrld^ 

Man. *thcTK I find yoji have read his works, 
as ^yell as ipyielf. 

Far. During my lute confinemcat I read 
them at the requcil of a friend ; and 1 never 
iaw fo much sialicea fo much falfehood. or 
real ignorance in any work in my life. My ■ 
age, obfervation, and experience, aided- by 
agood education (for you know I was firft in- 
tended for the church), enable me, I hope, to 
form a tolerable'judgmcnt ou moft fubjeds, and, 
I believe, you will not doubt .that my inten- 
tions are honeft ; and 1 am glad of an oppor- 
tunity to undeceive you, and to reftore your 
former attachment to the Conftitution of your 
Country. 

■ Man. *rhat will be a difficult matter, for 
Me". Paink has convinced irie that we have 
been hitherto without a Conftitution in this 
Country. 

Eai. The 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



t 9 ] 

Sal. The devil he has, and yet that's odd 
«nough, for I have heard of the Britijh Con- 
ftitution, and as a d— d good one too, all over 
the world. 

' Far. Phoo, Phoo! Paine knows well enough 
that we have a Conftitution, which has long 
been the admiration of the world ; and, though 
]ils taile is too depraved to admire what is Ho 
excellent, it excites his envy and his malice; 
while he denies its exigence, his grand wi{h is 
to iee it demoliflied ; and, in order to promote 
its deflrui5tion, he labours to prejudice againft 
it everyone who will liften to him. 

Man. But I wi(h to know where this famous 
Conftitution is to be found. I have feen a copy 
of the late Conftitution of France, in a neat 
little book, containing the whole complete 
from beginning to end, and I dare fay the next 
will be drawn out and publiihed in like manner: 
but I have never had a copy of the BngUJIj Con- 
llitution put into my hands, nor have 1 heard 
of any fuch thing being kept at the 'tower or 
any where elfe. 

Sat. Nor I neither : but though I never law 
& plan of it, 1 always underfto(xl that it was 
made. of the beft materials; that it was a long 
time in building ; and that, being well put to- 
gether, it has weathered many a hard gale. 

A.j Fiir, 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



I >» } 

Far. {to ManufaSlurer), You hare hit upon 
in effential difference between the Englifk 
Constitution and that which the Trtncb laicly 
proje£led. The latter was indeed drawn 
up in great form upon paper, but it was 
only to be found upon paper ; but the forrncr 
is a foljd and well-tried Syftem, founded 
upon Experience, and long cxifting in aftual 
pratftice. Theibs was a mufliroom plan 
grown up in a night, and demoliihed as quickly 
as it was framed — the produce of Fancy, and 
containing nothing more fubftantial than mere 
theory. OuPS, like the Knglifli Oak, has 
arrived by flow degrees at maturity, and, like 
the EngUfli Oak too, is ufeful and durable, 
fniming the flrcngth, while it fccures the 
lafting happinefs of the Nation. 

Sai. You could not have explained it better 
to my mind. Englifh Oak i?, as you fay, flow 
in growth, but then ii excels all oihcr timber, 
That of America grows much quicker, but the 
{hips built of it go fooner to decay. There's 
nothing like Englifli heart of Oak, and that 
cur enemies well know. 

Men I cannot fay 1 am yet fatisficd. The 
late French Conftitution, it is true, had bad 
luck, ana lafced but a fliort time, but yet in my 
little book can fee what it was. I can* 
** produce it in a i)ifihk form, and quote it article 

• Rights of Man. 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



t " i 

** iy ari.'c/i.''' Now can ydu iri like manner 
produce the Englifti Conftitution. Where is 
tiutf Co be fouii4 i . 

Far. I admire your per&vcraiice about tri- 
J]c6. Nothing fjeenis likely to fatisfy you but 
a fchedute or inventory of the Conftitu- 
lion. as if it were to be put up to audlion-: 
but it is cur advantage that there is no occatioii 
to publiQi a code or plan ia order td make it 
known; for, thank God, it is To well afcertain-' 
ed, and fo univerfally underilood, as to render 
fuch a meafurc quite unneceilaTyi The Frencli' 
ii^eed wanted 4 code to deifeiribe what had 
never before exifted in point of.faS ; bat their 
paper Conititution fell to pieces before they 
could well get it. into their heads; while ours 
is deeply engraven 00 the hearts of £ngliIh-> 
men. 

Man* Then you allovv that (hefe Is no code 
to which we may refer for the Articles of thft 
Britilh Conflitution. 

Far. Indeed I do not. The Conftitution of 
this country is to be found blended and incar^ 
pbrated with that venefable iyftem of writtca 
and unwritten laws which is juflly the adora- 
tion of Englilhmen : derived from the fame 
origin, and having advanced together to nia- 
tunty, they a€t upon, explain, and fupport , 
each other j their connexion and mutual de- 
pcodance are fuch that they muft Aand or fall 
A 6 together I 

L);.i....i by Google 



[ .. ] 

together ; and the enemies of one are the eoe^ 
mies of both. It is therefore among the facred 
rcgiftcrs of our private rights (the moft prefer 
place furely) that the principles and fecurities 
of our public rights are to be found. Many 
of tbofe principles have ftruck their roots deep 
among the original foundations of the commoft 
law i while in the feature-book the various fe- 
curities and privileges obtained by the people 
at diffi;rent times arc faithfully recorded— 
There wefind the greatChartcr of our I^iberties, 
eommonly called ^fl^B<7Ci6dr/<j,obtainedfoicmg 
ago as the.reign of King yobn, and confirmed 
by many fubfequent ftatutes. — There alfo we 
find the Petition of Right, beingaParliamen<ary 
ratification, iii ihc reign of Charles the \9i\ of ths 
rights of the people — There alfo we find the 
immortal Habeas Corpus Aft, the laft, the firm, 
and immoveable barrier ofperfonal liberty — 
Afterwards, by the Bill of Rights, andlaftly by 
the Aft of Settlement, made in the beginnmg 
of the prcfent Reign, we find the fucccflion to 
the Crown and thcfundtionsof Govern mcntand 
limited and guarded in fuch a manner as to pre- 
vent thepoflibility of encroachment, andtoiccure 
the lafting felicity and freedom of the People. 

Sai. Now fink me if I think any (hip could 
have kept her log-book better. This is what 
I call a fine courfe, a good reckoning, and a 
profperous voyage, 

n;vi by Google 



[ -3 ] 

: Mm. And fo we muft pore over told iriufly 
A£ts of Parliameat in order to difcover this 
famous Cdnilitution; , 

,' Far. I do not know whatyou.cali o!d muAy 
4&£ts.Qf Parliamcot; but I think it is a great 
advantage, and. a foHd ground for rejoicing, 
^hat our rights have been eftabH^ed and enr 
jqyed for fuch a len^h of time. They are 
thereby rendered more rcfpedable, us well as 
mpreiecure; and accordingly the people hold 
their Magna Cbartain a veneration proportioned 
to its antiquity, 

Man. Bqt I for one have very little incli- 
nation to ftudy, and ftill lefs ability to pur- 
chafe, the voluminous colleflions of the Sta- 
tutes. 

Far. It is not at all nccedary that you 
fhould J. for the Hiftory of theCouijtry cqntaitM. 
an adequate code of its Conftitution, and dif- 
.plays to the comprehenfion of every one the 
manner in which that Conftitution, grew, the- 
circumftances under which the feveral parts o£ 
it were formed, and the principles upon which' 
it was founded. In perufing fuch Hiflory we 
iball fee that the people have, from time to 
time, inlifted upon and obtained fuch civil 
advantages as Experience, the mother of True- 
Wifdom, pointed out to be ncceflary to their 
fecure enjoyment of focial liberty. They did 
not 2i£t upon mere opinion, which difiers fo 

ciudh 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



much in dif^ent perfbne, and theref6r& aflWds 
but a very weak foundation tobuild upon~} 
they improved thofe opportunities which evant* 
threw in their way, of refiftingandof vanquiih- 
ing the abufes which they had adually endoitd, 
and of providing- cdbdiuat means ag^inft th* 
lepetitibiX thereof. Hence the remedy was 
always adequate to the evil — one fource of 
oppreflion was cut off after another -i- ad- 
vantages were fecured as they w^re obtained— 
and at length the Conf^itution, being .founded 
upon experience, and matured by time, arrived 
gradually at the perfe^ion in which we notf 
behold it, and becamccalculated both for utility 
and duration, every part being fitted for the 
purpofc it was deftined to anfwer, and thc^ 
whole forming a wcll-conneftcd and wcll-pro- 
■portioned Syftem. 

Man. It feeras, hoWvii-, that tlxePrench didf 
at once what the Englijh were ages aboat. 

iPar. You (hould rather foy the French pre- 
tended to do at once what th« En^tifi) were lb 
long in performing; for the former have only 
vertlied the old faying, that what 16 faaftily dood 
is ill done. Great changes can only be made 
to advantitgc by very flow degrees. The late 
Wnnch Conllitution was only a matter of 
experiment, and it was loon found to be iin-> 
pradticable, and fpeedily vanilhed into air. 
-i-'* Like the bafelefs fabric of a viCon, it has 
•' not left a wreck behind." Oun is the re- 

.f»U 



[ -5 ] 

f»lt of experience, and after a lapfe of age« 
(lands as>firm a$.a rock. The Makers of Con- 
ftitutions may hence derive a very ufefu! leflbn, 
and learn the difference between Theory and 
Pradicc. If all the Philofopbers in the world 
yrere to a0emble in order at once to frame a 
Conftitution for a country, however beautiful 
and alluring their plan might be in appearance, 
there is v?ry little chance that it would fuit 
the manners, the habitE, and the national cha- 
rafter of the people, or that it would be prac* 
ticable when it ihould come to be tried. But 
the French, defpH|ng even the advantage of 
calm and orderly difcuffion, began with remo- 
▼ing all thofe powers an4 authorities which, 
however in fomc inflances abufed, were the 
only fecurity for order, and attempted the great 
work of forming a Conftitution in the midft of" 
Tumult, Riot, and Confufioo,— when calnt 
lleafon was djliged to give way to Faflion ao4 
to Outrage,— when popular Commotion, art-r, 
fully fomented, and difplaycd in Devaftatioi| 
and Maflacre, kept the whole Kingdom iq 
conftant agitation and alarm. Judge if a Con- 
ftitution iTaus conftrufted was at all likely t(> 
l)c ufcful or even pradicable ) 

■ Sai. I fho^Id think the State-velTel muft 
4riv« before the wind in fuch a ftorm, and that 
ihe would founder without ever coming ia 
fight of port. It muft be very foolifli to' 
think of building or mending Conftitutions, 
qr doing any fuch nice work, in fo hard a ^ale' 

L);.l..=.JbvGOOgle 



At fea we never venture to laya fliipuiukr repair 
but in calm weather and fmooth water. 

Far. Your fuppofiiion has been cxadlly re- 
alized ; one of the fineft countries in the world 
has been ruined, and is become at length 
fiich a fccne of horror that Human Na- 
ture Ihuddcrs at the ipeftacle : and after 
four years fo fpcnt, with Revolution following 
Revolution, the whole bufinefs remains to be 
done> and a Conftitution is fttll to be formed, 
which will probably meet the fame fate as that 
bcfare it. But it has been the happinefs of 
England to obtain, by far di6Ferent means, a 
Conftitution which fccures the Happinefs and 
freedom of the People, and which is of courie 
lieloved by them ; adapted in its nature to their 
temper and habits, and friendly in its exercife 
to order and tranquillity. I hope I have made 
it appear that this Confbtution is authenticated 
by written vouchers, and thofe of a much more 
rcfpedable kind than any new-fangled code pro- 
duced byFancyandhever confirmed byPraaice. 
But the grand excellence of the Britijb Confti- 
tution ftill remains to be noticed, namely, that 
it exifls not merely upon paper or parchment, 
but in a£i:ual practice: its benefits are hourly 
experienced \ it is to be found in enjoymeot; 
it is befl: known by its effefts, as a tree by its 
f uits ; and no more requires a pompous dc- 
fcription to convey an idea of its value than the 
genial 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



[ '7 ] 

genial wirmth' of. the Sun, or the benetrolcnt 
fliowcrs of Heaven. The aftual advantages 
poflcfled by F.nglijhmen as their fure and un- ^ 
alienable Birthright afford the inoft forcible and 
the moft feeling defcription of the Conftitution, 
and exhibit to the eye and the heart Magna 
Charta, — the Habeas Corpus A&y— the Bill of 
Rights, and all the other Sources and Safe-* 
guards of our Liberties in theirnobleftfortn : 
and thefe advantages are peculiarly manifeft iri 
that Liberty and that Security which every In* 
dividual enjoys in this Country, which are the 

fraud ohjefts of Socisty, and the moil valuable 
lefiings it can beftow. 

Sat. People make fuch a pother about Li- 
berty that I tt.ought it included every thing j 
but I don't remember hearing much about what ~ 
you call Security. 

Far. And yet without Security Liberty 
would be the worft of Evils. If a People could , 
live without Government and Laws, they 
would poflefs perfcft Liberty withoutReftraint, 
a"nd confequently without Security : that is to 
fay, there would be no Reguiaticiis or Public 
Force to prevent Individuals from doing what- 
ever they pleafe ; of courfe the Strong would 
tyrannize over the Weak, the Good would be 
at the mercy of the Bad, and a conUant icene 
of Rapine, Violence, and Bloodihed would pre- 
vail. It is neceflary therefore lor Mankind to 
rcfort ' for Proleftipn to a State of Society, 
where 

U;.t.z=dbv Google 



[ ■» I 

YvTiere Individuals are reAraiAed ' by the 'c5m* 
Ijulfory obligation of Laws frdm doing what 
may be pernicious to Others or detrimentat to 
che State. It is plain, therefore, that in Society 
a.Portion of that Liberty which would belong 
to 3 State of Nature is given up as a neceftkry 
Price for Security. And Social Liberty means 
9 Right to do whatever is not forbidden by the 
laws ; which Liberty flcuriihes in the higheft: 
Perfettion in this Country, where there is no 
Power but that of the Laws to controul the 
Aiitions of any Ferfon. 

Man. But can you fay that thcfe Laws are 
«qual for Rich and Poor ? 

Far. Certainly I can ; and if you had 
irufted to your own obfervation, inftcad of 
Ijftening to the falfc infuiuaiions of malicious 
incendiaries, you would never have doubt- 
ed it; for nothing can be more obvious. 
than that all perfons, whatever their birthy 
jhcir rtation, or their circumftances may be, 
are of equal confcquence in the eye of the Law. 
The Rights of an£n^/y7.ma«are not the Rights 
merely of the Wealthy and the Great, but of 
AtL without diftinftion. The fame Laws ex- 
tend their protection alike to All i and whether 
3 Nobleman ftrikes a Labourer, or a Labourer 
a Nobleman, it is equally a violation of the 
Law, and the fame Juftice is open to Both, 
The grand prevailing Principle of our Coufti- 
tution is to provide as much as poflible for the 
Peace, 



[ >9 3 

Pfacc, Security, and Happinefs of every Indif 
vidual in whatever flate or condition he maf 
appear; and the elTentiar Rights of .Human 
Nature, which it a 'the objefl: of Society to 
protcft, arc as iacred in the perfon of the 
Loweft as of the Highefl. No mao. how- 
ever Rich or Great, can opprefs the pooreft 
Subjeit of thefe realms, no Station or Wealth 
can furnifii the leaft proteiSion from the pe- 
nalties of the violated Laws; or prevent an 
injured Citizen from obtaining redrefs for hi* 
wrongs. Such are the important and invalu- 
able privileges of Britons j while the grand 
bulwark of all, Trial by Jury, protefts the en- 
joyment of our Rights from every danger, and 
forms the corner-ftonc of our Liberties. 

Man. It furely, however, is no proof of the 
equality of the Laws that the poor are obliged 
to fuftain ib many hardships and burthens, 
while the rich revel in luxury at their expenc«. 

Far, Such cant is exaftly the kind of argu- 
ment upon which Mr. Paine chiefly relies for 
exciting dlfcontent in the lower orders of 
Society ; and I beg you to remark what a ftrong 
proof it affords of the falfehood as well as of 
the malice and abfurdity of his aifertions. So 
far from' its- being true that burthens arc im-> 
pofed on the poor to fupply the luxuries of th« 
wealthy and great, as he would have you be- 
lieve, the cafe is cxaftly the reverfe. The bur- 
thens of the State are impofed upon thofe who 

ar« 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



[ 10 3 

ate in' circumftances to fuppdrt thenl, ani, ' 
ss much as poffible, according to tiieif cir- 
ciimftatices : while thc^reaieft pofllblc Care is 
taken to prevent their falling upon bthers. 
Thus, for inftancc, no part of that large pro- 
portion of the taxes which Is raifed from Houfes 
is paid by thofc who depend for fubliltcncc oh 
their bodfly labour. Many other inftances of a 
fimilar nature might be mentioned, proving 
that the principle of taxation in this country 
is to lighten and relieve as much as polTible the 
fituaiian of the labouring part of the commu- 
nity, and to col left the neceflary revenue from' 
thofe who are belter able to fupply it, and in 
propon.'on to that ability. But in what part 
of Mr. Paine's writings is this important truth 
to be found. His aim being to deceive, it did 
not fuit him to make any fuch acknowlcdg-, 
ment. It would have overfet his fyllem, and, 
defeated his views. Thus you. fee to what de- 
ception they cxpofe themfelves who give any 
credit to fuch a man. Who that attended so 
Mr. P.i'm would imagine that among all that . 
induftrious clafs whom he reprefents as " pay- ■ 
'* ing their earnings in taxes to fupport Court 
*' extravagance," fcarce a fingle individual ever , 
fees a tax-gatherer enter his habitation i 

Afan. GocdGod I you aftonifli me; and yet, . 
Upon confideration, what you fay is perfe£tfy 
true. I fee that J have been milled in this 
matter* 

Far. And 



[at 3 

• 7ar. And fo will every one be who taket 

i^r. 'Thomas Pmne for his oracle. BiM I beg 
vou to confider further* chat white the. con. 
dit^n of the poor is alleviated as much ai 
poinble> the luxpries of the rich are converted 
into fources of revenue. Is there a luxury 
which ifi not made to contribute its due Oiaro 
towards, the pvtblic burthens } And are not 
|he very fame acticles taj^ed whep they are ufed 
as luxuries^ and 'exempted from taxation when 
they appew only as neceflaries— of which the 
duties upon fervants may be mentioned as an in- 
flance. Nay, in fome articles, which the pecu- 
liar and preffing circumftances of the moment 
^ad ren(kred it nece^ary to fubjedt to a tempo- 
rary additional tax. did. not the Legiflature in 
the lail feHion feize theearlieft bccafion, afford- 
ed by the flouriiliing flateof the finances, to take. 
piFthpfe burdens, exprefly becaufe they affeftcd 
thofe clafies which were leaflr'able to. fupport 
them * : and are we not in expeft uion, that the 
continued and increasing profperity of the Na- 
tion, aided by the judicious and fucceGitul' plant 
pf a wifeandable Minifter, will Ihortly produce 

• One of the articles from which the above ailditlonal 
duty was taken off, furniflies a ftriking proof of the Farmer'i 
bbfcrvation, that the fame article is a fubjtfifl of taxation 
^hen ufed as a luxury, and of exemption when ufed as one 
of the neceflaries of life ; for die additional duty on wax anj 
Spermaceti candles was retained, tWiile that on other cantUet 
was taken off, ' . 



U;.t.z=dbv Google 



[ " ] 

roorcnrtenfive aHeviations,andin time, perliaps, 
ifelicTC us from all our burthens ? One thing, 
indeed, might binder Aicb deiiraMe events from 
taking place, and make alt oar brilliant prcf- 
peftt vanitb into darknefs ; I mean the fuc- 
cds of Mr. Paine's endeavours to introduce 
confufion and anarchy. But I am perfuaded 
the people are inuch too fenfibic, as well of the 
advantages of their lituation as of the malice of 
bis vKws and the ruinous tendency of his pro- 
jcQSf to pay any attention to what be fays. 
And they will be little difpofed to rely either 
MI the friendship or the wifdom of a man, who 
lias never bad any reputation either for prin- 
ciple or prudence, who has neither charaAer 
nor property at Aake, and who evidently has 
soother objetft than to create dlAurbance among 
a happy and contented people. 

Sai, Pray who is this Tom Paine, who 
makes fuch-a noife? I think I have not heard 
any one talked of fo much iince the time of 
Join tbe Painter. 

Far. Hishiiloryisfoon told. Hewasbrought 
npa ftaymaker under his father at Thetferdt in 
the county of Norfolk. He fomehow became 
an excifeman in the year 176^ ; was difchargcd 
for malpra^ices in 1765; found means to get 
himfelf rcftored in 1760; but, being incorri- 
gible, was difcharged again. While in that 
office, befides taking bribes from others to de- 
fraud the revenue, he dealt in excifcable com- 
modities himfelf, and fo made his intcreft and 

his 



t ^3 ] 

his duty draw different ways. He was twice 
married, though the death of his iirft wife fau. 
never yet been afcertained ; and upon his fecoiKL 
n:)arriage, in defiance of tt)e laws, he was falfely 
en tered upon the regifter as a batchelor. Hegav^ 
his wives plenty of ill ufage, butallowed them 
none of the comforts of matrimony. He was 
a bad fon* and broke his mother's heart. He 
never had a friend whom he did not reward with 
ingratitude. Finding no chance for fucceft 
here, he thought it bed to decamp, and went 
to Americ(i\ where, during the war, he Hiew- 
fid himfelf &n enemy and traitor to his coun- 
try, and did it all the harm he could. But, al- 
ways confident with himfelf, he betrayed his 
new friends the Amerkam^ and was therefore 
turned by them out of an office which his ran- 
corous enmity to Great Britain had procured 
him. Returning to this country, he had the 
audacity to libel the King and Conditution ; 
and, being profecutedfor his breach of the laws, 
has iled from judice. LaAly, having thus 
been twice a Refugee EngUJhman and once x 
Refugee American, he is now become a yacobm 
Frenchman, and is plotting with our ancient 
and implacable foes to bring deflrudiion upon 
his nativeland, 

Sai. Well, it is no bad thing that the ihark 
has left our coafl-, though it would have been 
better to have given him hisdeferts. But per- 
haps his new friends may do that buiinefs for 
him. 

Far, 

U;.t.z=dbv Google ■ 



r 2+ ] 

Far. Not at all unHkel}^. But I think we 
have fpent more breath on him than he deferves ; 
and at prefent I muft part with you, as I have a 
particular engagement. To-morrow I fhall be 
glad to fee you both ag^n. 



THE END OF THE FIRST DIALOGUE. 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



DIALOGUES 



RIGHTS of BRirONSy &c^ 



DIALOGUE THE SECOND, 



[ Price Two-pence ; or. Three Shillings and Six- 
pence the Qiiarter of a Hundred. J 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



DIA LOGUES 

RIGHTS 

or 

B R I T JV S, 

BET WEE K 

A FARMER, 
A SAILOR, 

AKD 

A MANUFACTURER, 



RIAtpGUE THE SECOND, 



LONDON: 

j>R.THTED FOR T. LONGMAN, SATER-NOSTER-KOW } O. NICOl, 

PALI."MAI.I, ; J. SEWELL, CURNHILL -, J. TRIODtK, 

fLEET-STREET; ASD J. DEBSET'^i VICCADILLT. 

^ MDCCXCIU I v.v.wL' 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



XftAhOGvnsy ^ 



F^lJrfE*.— Ma^U J ACT UilERv*-^Alt.O« . 

I .HAVE tbaugbjt p good Atf^ upon our coni* 
;VflFi^^tion of y<£ftej4a^ > 9ad tluHlgh I 6nd I 

^jf^l^ns rpfwtiiipg ^ tbc Afttc of thipgs.ifi 

i^tfr*,' That* perjiaf Sj is not much to be wdn- 
^dec^daf, coniiderihg what patnsliave been taken 
to malfc you dilTatisfied and difgufted with every 
^thin^ ; though I (hould rather have thought^ 
tliat, 'Ending yourfelfimpofed on in being made 
to believe that we htvenoConftitutionf and that 
the Taxes are laid-heavily on the Poor to fupply 
the luxuries of the Rich> you would have lip 
confidence ip thofe who had told you jruchgro& 
and abominable falfehoods* 

A ij JMi*«* 



U;.t.z=dbv Google 



inequality that cxifts in this Country? A1-! 
Ipwingthat vre^ave a Cojiftitijtjon .which^nE- 
lervcs to every one Liberty and Security, and 
that the Taxes afe itnpokd with the utmoft 
confideration for the Poori which I own you 
hay^ convkiced me is the ca^ i^t not %nuw- 
■<ify5tig tfefeg *ii fee-fome merf \*aUo(vin^in*«l 
the luxuries of life, while others are obliged to 
work hard in order to obtain common nccef-' 
faries P Wou l d no t-'B ^pf a H siws -prevent fuch 
a Difparity ? 

Far.. l,believe. if the matt^ were fairly tt* 
anifheS','it'wt)l3a appear; 'i:iiar"niofe wftd f)ro- 
curc their fubfiftence^^by .that labour of their 
hands, enjoy mu'cH more' true happinefs thart 
,-ttoSft-'who''?ftJ6l^''ii5^aR tijf^'mjeuf'tts-^f mjj 
'Bii^yba al«S)gtt4=)«« fet^t^ -th^ 'fhofe-Uixlfl^esU 
wbich-yotf^Qfhi^'iih a* a' pf 6cji*6?Erifi?a^{:btf- 
Mv& contri&utltig krgel^ tQi\i»km&^ti^&^t^ 
State, furnifh neccflaryandcopiou*"Jcfctir<?efi'(yr 
the fubfiftence of the labouring cliUe. How 
many hands aje eiiriployed^ "Kow rnany Families 
comfortably mai-ntain?d by,fuch,'rnearis ! 'What 
'p.Miribers would be unavoidatlv.r.cduccd tq;i'i\c 
'griateft diftrefs, if fucTi four.ces Of emplbyt]Hei)t 
.were cut off! Think not/ However, tBat th^e 
'.difference between thofe. .who labour fpr 
\heir bread and thofc who. abound. in wealth 
,is "to be afcribed" to. the 'Caws i fuch Xr\%- 
'fluality is founded in ^Jature," and infeparabte 
fr^om Society. The Laws neither make "any 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



'ttah i-ich.'pf pcwr ;,'they lis' 
i^dr'ts of nis qwii indilftry. 
IS'loJiWted'jiitaJn'tteiicft 

•iWiifA thtMsvrtie'fit •6m 

■ WHBls tlfttWefedioh fc 
9da3sw:'kcb'6f<Un|^^fc4 tl^ 
MiHlty (biiiaceMjlv.''3i 

.■A|H4lilcdff,'lVianti?4aiiirtt5 
; \i£-^ NtiWbfre :' Is; therg 1 

'ittifnbymcrit, ,fuch' ^triple ! 
'ijabbure'r, ih.eMantiTaam'ei 

oth'er cIai[IH$ c'f'irhdrp'mdb 

■ fo'imthe ifaoft'HiiHttfdtiS ari 
'tjart-=of;Sotiii(yi/'^And it 

eveiy ioil't BJt ; t'alfciitS' aid i 

aid'tofoppbrtiihltji; to rife': 

Btnfce aiiH '**eJIth; '■" .SlichJ 

'ViHtagjcs of.a.Fttt CdaAti^ KWid'SH the nitjlre 
i)f fliJngs SdcKiSfi^oVft-iimeHV, Jrtdtarfsi'fcSn 
do no moTK-'J^'"-' r ■'-'■"■■^ •- -■" ■ ••'• "■■ 

■iian.f'ThfiiMcMayiJffitijjf^e^.wbocia ad» 
Vancc'theip^ly,es,in^thfit.njanpqr.. ; Butltbidk 
you faid juft now, that tnofe who^ labour 
hard for their fubliitence have no occafion 
to'dnvy fueb.-:af;cnJQy all the iuituiies Df"-lifc* 
This» I dw&^ foutids .a little .Ursn^ety 'in 4ny 
ears; ;; ' .' i. '; .-!, * rfi i-n ■• i -r 

■ Jfar; Itisiie'viitth£lel5.tfiiy.''ttclat>ourmg 

■ clals neccflarily'^fditos thfe'iiib'ft numerous part 
' of Society, and their labour not only conAi- 

A 4 tutes 



Dgitiz^dbv Google 



[ .s ] 

ti^tes t|ie fl;rengtb and the ridiesof aSute^.t)Ut 
is indiAjchfable 10 its cxlfteqcc- Their coo- 
ciilion Is, not -iiideed :n^tby; if. it were, they 
yvouii ,t}e littlp .^Upo&(l\to bep^t Society 1:^ 
tbeir4ab(iur,„^pJ Ui^n bptlber ^bc coQffcnicocfs 
iip; the (iciccffwics pf ,Ufc coiiid be procured, 
'and[,.the^r .^.cajth would ,do tbcm ^o ^good. 
^utj'^n^hp'o.tbpriKind, tlwy (^ not properly 
'come wjtbifl tb«, defcflption ,of Poor» -fince by 
;^hcjr 'pwp mif^rV iheyin^intflio thenjjfeWes and 
"ibe}r faqiilies. They hi^e tbe ftroogcfl; and 
fur^ft'filaira fpr,? rccoinpence ad^ua.tc to^hoir 
^'marntehanfe. This is.tbcfiiil-)Claim-thatjmuj[l 
.'^^be attepded.tQ* i^i^. all .others ,{PBA.giye way to 
..Jt'-'Thpir ^«a|ioo if thercfoKCia rei(pci;tobjc 
Ofie'^s it .is Jtt9th.uj[efi4an4^ independent^, a^d 
'Juch pcrfon'fia,! i'n the honeft cjterct^ pf 
iheir iiid.uftcy,. h,ave norcafon to fCgrct the 
bUmbJe. iirt^iJifiit^-pf (heir ftatipfl,'.the J>e«pli?r 
advantages of which.. are .a|t lam equlv^leqt .to 
all that rank or opulence can beftow* . ,-. 

■ Afowi Anrfpray what advantage's can poffibly 
b^ong to that i^ation beyond o^ers ?.'. 

. .. iFitr-'AdiyxDia^iof the-ipoflimpoiitantkitid, 

' and onmnhich.TJature haS'ilatnp«d the higbeft 

value. Do not the cflential bleflings of health. 



igpuE, and contep.t, Spofn- %o beparticulaply al- 
jtfed to perfpn^ i^^th^i fit,ii£it^on, wbile'thflujf- 



.;,„...i by Google 



:t 9 i, 

iirics to which, they are ftrangc^s, and which 
they would be fools to. covet^ generally pro- 
duce: dil^ppointmentj difguH:, and indifpofitton 
both of body and mindf Obferve the tranquil 
itiind, the ftcady and cheerful labour, the fure 
and welcome reward, the robuil healthy the 
keen relilhi the family end^rments, and the 
calm repofe of fbe.induitrious peafant^and tell 
me what other ftatlon.has.an equal chance for 
real happinefsi 

^42/. £gad ! you fpeak fo home to my ihiodi 
that- if ever I ihould be fo unfortunate as to be 
taken from a fea life, I had rather go to: liv<t 
in a cottage than a palace* ... ' '■ 'V" 

Far. Your attachment to a ffea 'life -is Only 
one of the many proofs we fee every dayi„^at 
nian, in eycry rank, is a creature of habi_j,'ai)d- 
can fcl.dom find his ei^oyments out of the 3c- 
cuftomed channel. Suppdiing the advantages 
for happincfs equal in the higher and low ej 
ftations, nayfuppofing, for argument fake, that 
%hofB advantages were increafed with -elevation 
(^thtcohtrary of which is, F believe, the truth),Do 
you think that fuch advancement would be a 
iburce of felicity to the Labourer ? Would- it 
be any gratification to him to be taken from his 

• The farmer doubflefe rtmemW^ed' that ft irffc tain haA 
'Aid, " The fleep of a Ubouhn^ inaa is fweet^ hiiB the atmn- 
,V <liuice of the rich, wiU not USkt i^ to lleep. £cti. £. tit 

A $ familiitf 

i);v.nvC,OOgIc 



i 10 j 

romtltar aflbciates, from his homely itiougn 
fubftantial fare,' from his regular ileep and 
meals, from his plain, eafy, and fimplcman* 
iiers, to make him linder^ the cereinonie** 
the refinements, the faihions, the intircourfev 
arid the reftrairtts of higher life?' Would -not 
this be taking him from himfeW?: Soon, wouli 
he'MriOi to return -to his crackling :6re and hia 
jimple bnfetc^red-habitG. Befides, ae happinefs 
cannot be enjoyed without employtnetit, witat 
would he be able to fubftitute for the plough, 
the" loom, or- th4 chifci ? - Would the Ma* 
mbii^karot fee. made more: hafipy! by wQartmg 
the'fiik which'.hc has been emflD3(ed to wcat^ ? 
Or, inlhort. Could thei^. be: a.'fcvcrer,puiiiiht-> 
mcnt inflided on the Peafant than that o^ 
CT^king him a. Hcec ? 

■ S!aK Thatis very^rue-^jdft asif aForemaft- 
jnan *as made an Admiral- of a large fleet be- 
toie an engagement : he'd foon wifh to go 
t>acl£:tO hisgun, to obey orders and. fight th« 
eh'emy'in hisold way. ■ .''. ' 

■.■■.-Fori:. No doubt of it ; and, it 'Would fefi if 
much better for' the fervicc as for himftilfii 
•Thi truth iff, a great Variety of rtations muft 
£xift in Society, cVery one of which benefits 
^le-ieft. The bodily labour of the lower clafs 
is effential to the utilityi and Indeed theex- 
sfefkO?,_ of the wit^oJci . while the mental excr- 
-tions, the comraeccial fpecutatcons, the ambi- 
■6bu8 fehemesi-'thc more poliihed manners, 
: ; - . pay 



t .1 3 

n^y Qven the.reftngOTents sn^lthe luyuries,- of 
the feveral afcending ranks, return the benefit, 
and c,oi]duce alike to the cocufort and happin?^ 
of inferiors^, and- all join . to promote tl^e 
general advantage. In all, however, the 
chief fource of felicity is Content. This, after 
?ll, is the graqjl ieerct of human blifs ; and this 
bleHingiicnpanklHeaven (to iT}kke the balance 
even, and W take away all caufq for co(np)*ii>f 
at. an apparent Inequality) feemp to have deP- 
tinpd cbieriy. far thofe who occqpy the hurablcft 
M^alk of; ufeful life,-and fubfsfl on the lubpqr of 
their hands. Dp them chie6y is- this treafurf 
beftowed, for purpofes the moft wiie and tlw 
tnoH kind botb to the^iifelycs qnd tQ Society, 
of which the onlyTqlid bafis is their quiet and 
cheerful induftry. What a wretch then' miift 
he be vifho {cg^s to make tbefe happy and va- 
luable people exchange their Content for Reft- 
ieflhefs and DijTatiEfaiSion}. How cruel ^ndinhur 
man to them.-r-how mifchievqus to Society,— 
is fuch an attempt ! How particularly ccnfu^ 
rabie and uialiciqus in a. country like this» 
where every. Artizan and Mechanic is as mucb 
within the fure protedtion, of the Laws as th^ 
higheft'Noblen^an ! And ye^ fuch.a fcheme, • 
black and diaboJi.c^l as it is, is-the grand tfbjc<a 
of Mr. f aiije's writings y and you (to Man.J^ 
I am forry to fay it, are a melancholy initanqp 
pf its effea,,--,-:^, :' r .■.. , . .J 

■•-""" " '-■- ' ' " A 6 Man. 



Dgiw^db'vGQOglC 



[ >? 1 

Man. I ^annet deny tt, but what cpuld I do ? 
I now ftel the force of what you fay ; but 
the fyilem of Equality appeared to me fo fair 
-andjuft, that I coqld flat hclpwifliing to fee 
it realized. 

Far. I finccrely lament that fo good a dif-. 
Aofition as yours fliould have been deluded from 
nappinefs by the artifices of defigning mcnJ 
If yoii think for a* moment, you will fee that 
the i^ftem of Equality (fuppofing it praftica- 
bte) would be a fource of mifery to Mankind. 
It muft be obtained either by raifing thofq 
who arc in low ftations, or by depreifing thofe 
in high ones, fo that all might bfc brought to 
the fame level, Now I hope that. 1 have 
already faid enough to (hew that it would b? 
unfortunate to thofe of the labouring clafs,and 
ruinous to Society^ if fuch perfons- were raifed 
from that ufeful ftation in which Providence has 
placed them, and on which fo many advantages 
are bcftowcd—rand they would fuffi:r equally if 
their Superiors were reduced to the fame rank 
with themfelvesj fmce the 'many fprings of 
iridiiftry which are ndw fet in motion by the 
luxuries and manners of the rich and great, 
would thereby be inftantly cut off. In Ihort, 
the different parts of Society have their re- 
fpeftive ufes and funftibnsj and dApend upon 
each other as much as the dtftcrent parts of the 
■- body— and fubordination' is equally nccelfary 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



■I. "3 ] 

in both-:— nor fhould envy take place, while all 
contribute to the felicity and comfort of the 
r?ft, 

Man. That, I cannot deny, is the real c^fej 
but I have been told that Nature made Man- 
kind equal, and if fo, why cannot fuch Equality 
be preferved, 

■ Far. If you confult Nature, you will foon be 
convinced that fhe never intended Mankind p 
be equal. If that had been her intention, (he 
would have formed them equal in bodily 
iftrcngth and mental faculties — fimilar in dif- 
pofitions, and in all thofe properties which are 
now fo varioufly beftowed among men. Nay, 
to prefcrve that Jiquality they muft have been 
■ deftitijtc of thofe paffions which are the fources 
of rivalfbip, ambition, and contention ; they 
muft alfo have been free from thofe viciffitudcs 
and changes which they are now fubje£t to, 
and they muft, in fiiort, have been very diffe- 
rent beings from what ^hey are, and placed in 
very different fituations. How can Nature be 
faid to have made- men equal, when at their 
firft coming, into, the world there is fuch a 
wide, difference as that between a child and 
its, parents, :. infancy, manhood, and old age, 
:hunger, andfleep, rain, lightning, and tempeft, 
and a thoufand other natural caufcs,, are at per- 
pet,asl^s!i»ar with fuch Equality, Eyen-if it 
W-?r4:ppiTible for men to lubfift in a ftate of 
Naturcyjas it isxall^, that is, without Society, 
Govcrn- 

D;.i....i by Google 



[■4 3 

Government, and Laws, the rnequaitty prct* 
ceeding from the above caufes would foon 
become intolerable. A ftate of fociety is there- 
fore their only relource, and may with pror 
priety be called the natural ftate of Man, fir.ce 
he cannot fubfift out of it. But the" very for, 
mationof Society is inconipatiblewith Equality, 
becaufe its elfential objetft is to velt, in one part 
called Gjvernnient a fnfficient power to keep 
the whole in oider, and in fubjeilion to laws, 
and the pofleiTion of that power mufl: ele^ 
vateTpme greatly above tlie reft,— ^Subor- 
dination is therefore unavoidable, and" there 
muft be a great variety of ranks, of oflices, and 
pf duties, every pne qf which ifi deftru^tive of 
Equality^ 

Sat- F fuppofc fuch a diffsrenceia as necef- 
fary afhore as it is at fea, where we have 
different tjutics, which would never be per- 
formed if we were all equal in rank and power, 
If al! were Captains, who the devil wo^ld heafC 
the water out of the loqg-boat ? 

JRyr. Neither at fca nor on (here pan Man- 
kind adopt in pradlice the levelling fyfteni 
without involving themfelves in anarchy and 
ruin. Not even a private familyj conlifting 
■merely of ten perfons, can maintain peace and 
decorurfi but by the aid if fubordihStiori, 
How then is the large family of the State, 
containing as many nvilUons, to be'rcgjilatod 
without th'6 f&ttieuffiflancef Bat I btfg' yqu 



L);.l..=.;bvGOOgk 



C "j 3 

to obferve, that the Incqcality arifing in arid 
frbm Society, is of a very different kind .from 
that'Wliich mufl: take place in what is ufuaUy 
th(Migh eiToneouQy .called a Aate of Natureu 
in the laticr.it would he, deftrudlive of aH 
peecs, ordeD, fecurityt and happtnefs, for it 
would be all ill favour of the ftrong, the vJolet)t, 
andthe vicioos. But the inequalities of Sp- 
cicty.arc.realjy cakulated for the benefit of sU 
— twithout them tlie objefts of Society could 
Hot be obtained — they : atlually conduce to a 
liibftttntial Equality- an Equality in freedom, 
■in:fecarity, in the enjoyment of thofe important 
Jkights which belong to focial Man. Thaf« 
very appareui: Inequalities, diieftcd and cod- 
trouled by fueh a Government as outs, tead as 
much as: human means can do to promote au 
Equality ofiiappinefs. They form an indif- 
paifable part ^of that fyllem which proteins 
every one inthepurfuit of his own happinefs^ 
while he docs- .not annoy that of others, nor 
difturb the general tranquillity* 

Mam But the modern fyftem is not to 
cftabli{h Equality by itfclf, but along with 
Ijiberty, fo that they may help each other. 

Far. I know that is the pretended fafliion in 
France ; but as" we are not out of our fenfcs, 
fuch a falhion has not been adopted in 
thi? country.-'— Liberty and Equality is the 
burthen of their fong who wi(h to turn the 
.World upfide dovrn, . but fo far from aiding 

each. 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



t I« ] 

tacii other, at ycm fuppofe, na two', things a*-* 
fo oppofite and inconfiftent. They are like 
fire and water, and mufl deflrojr each othefi 
, It is impoffible thcy fliould fubfift ^together. 
Every thing, in Nature tends to InequiUty, and 
while Nature is at all freej while Liberty exifts 
in any degree, Inequality muft arifej The 
moft abfolute force mud be exerted^ the moA 
violent defpotifm muft be cxercifed to prefervo 
Equality : and theti it will be mort! in name 
and appearance than in fa(5l : for nothing can 
entirely fubdue Naturt^^fhe will be breaking oiit 
in fpite of all refiftance. Turkey is the eountcy 
of Europe which approaches neareft to aftate c^ 
Equality, bccaufe there the mdft abfolutc Def' 
polifm prevails. TheDefpotis the only excep- 
tton,3nd (as ever muft be the cafe where Bqua* 
lity is to be found) the people are equally Haves. 
If the weight were taken off which preffes them 
to the fame level, we {hould inftaotly find them 
riiing in all thofc various gradatioas which arc 
diftatcd by Nature. 

Man. But you fee they have eftabliftied both 
Liberty and Equality in France. 

Far. I deny that they have eftabliflied either^ 
Formerly^ whoever fpokc or wrote agairift the 
old Government, was clapped into the Baftillc^ 
from whence there was at leaft a chance of 
being delivered. — .Mjw, whoever fpeaks or 
Writes againft the prefent Syftcm, is furc to 
have his throat cut, or to be hung at a lanthern- 

poft, 

L);.l....l by Google 



C ■? ] 

poft. - Judge if that be Libpr^^ And as to 
Equality, ^ere is no pretence to tbatt except 
whatiM'i^es from general confufion. Thepeople 
are indeed deluded by the name* but while 
many thoufands of the industrious part^ who 
formerly fubfifted very comfortably, arc ilarviog 
iov want of employment, their rulers, whp are 
in faa a thoufand times more tyrannical^ in- 
folent, and overbearing, than any King ^h^t ever 
fat pn the throne, arc improving the opportu- 
nity their fituation affords of accumulating For- 
tune.^. Such is their beaded Equality I But let 
the frencb be or dp what they ple^fe, is it ct>n- 

~ .fiileiit with the independent fpirit of ^^gS/^ir^ 
to adopt fr^w^ maxinis, to imitate Frfsfi man- 
ners, or to praftifcFr<f«i:<& principles ? That.vain 

' and ambitious People, our ancient ajid i)acur^ 
rivals, feem more than ever to covet univer^ 
conquert. They only purfue it in a new 
mariner, by the daftardly means of exciting the 
people to revolt againft their lawful Sovc- 

. reigns: but fuch as liHen to them will Toon 
find outtheir error, and learn, to their coil, that 
ilhey have embraced Slavery rather than Liber- 
ty. Fearful of our valour, thefe new-made 
pretended Patriots treat us outwardly with 
refpe^, while they have numerous Emiffaiies 
among us to c^tt^te us to confjjlion, and to 
make us difcooteDted and difpnited; hoping to 
obtain .tha,t pre-emiqence by their arti&fles 
which they cannot expe<a from their 9m^. 
"What a fine thing it would be for them, if we 
could be prevailed on to follow their example, 
. and 



H;.t.z=dbv Google 



ktid be?drnrf n Republic f Wc {hojal4 fopn.bp- 

come fubdrdinatt to them, and -per^apsj like 

.Savoy, foT^ a. new Departinent of" the Country 

' Tvhich we have fo often -pade to ircmblef-T^We 

' "ftibtlld, like the Brabahtera, be deprived of our 

'com, aha be made to exchange our iirvef arjd 

"'"gold fot ti'rericH arfi^nats-^Wc rfipu'lcrhatre'^c 

'■lTonoiirofpayingcbritributi6ns.t6FrencKarroiesj 

bird taxes to the National Convention. ; But Hap- 

■ ftily we' know that oui' c'ohfcquencc arid 'our 
■iHaependcnce are infcparahle.frbiii oar Cdhlti- 

tution and monsirchical fb'riiiof GoverJiment^ 

"iAs ^ Monarchy, we have rj'le.h to -be ihe'firft 

''8tateinEuroJ)e--^Wepoffefs/ihan'kstoo'ur'wil(S 

'and brave anceftdrs, the beft Conffitufioh in 

the wotld-^We will' prcfefveit^and if iver it 

ihould h6 abufed, which is not very likely. We 

will find our own remedy in the ffiile, jjpiHt, arid 

" rnbdcration of BriKins, ralhei' , than in. ilia 

-example of !^renchmeh; . ' . .. , ] 

Sail Would I could meetf ■wtth;)Ohe.af UuMTe 
French rafcaU who epdearotir to make i,dif- 
turbance in this country, egad I'd rub him well 
, down with a-good Epgtilh oaken trowel :.t'd 
ibori make him wifh to be toaAing his frogs 
again at home. . 

'-■ '-Fari The ehaftifethent -would be juft'j b"u^ 
-what fay yoa to thofe degenerate Englifhmcn 
Mvhojoin with thcfti in purfuit "'of the fatne 

■ o-bjea? 

,' .'Sat. Nay, now you are trying to ,get to 

' ivindward of me ; but it won't do; I'll never 

believe 



i *9 i 

believe thit any of my Countrymen can aifl Wi 
though I darfc fay there are' fi^d fellows 'among 
them too.' " - '• ■ ' '■ 

^ : Far. \yell, I don't wifli to put vou out of 
■ conpcit with ^our qountryfiien,', thpugti yoyr 
Friend Kere might, probably be jiHl? to fuppoit 
wfiat jf'have iai^. . Bui there is^Ks douhi -that 
Ihie frehch'irh.is- defiroas as ever of reducing 
our. power arid-, confcquence, of fteaUng our 
commerce,, arid of giving the death-blow to 
our national independence -and our naval fupe-^ 
riority. They are the fame artful and deljgn- 
ihg-PeopJc th^evcrwerc; andpin IheifBicVo- 
J&irioM,;; Cbey.eifbibit 'the faine treachery, .and 
4wrtuiyfcntJiJ ^eioic- fickjenefe -and:. levity. Asrhich 
«*rff atoirfejBditbeir t:haraSer..r>Hut they, have 
aHM^ejvn:4he^;^iyfeS)ai^jtffid:Hy a. brutal, and 
Jangutwajy iitpOfrtioti, and:o4p3bic of theinoii 
i>apbwousv,'^d,.favAge:,eFUcJty, ifiiqit as.mufr 
Jn^rfe. the; iniind oft'cwery^ JEi^/^OTa»-,with 
■hdrrorj -We.'are-,':* bumwe- ami af genemus 
JPidopJe; &tl(^.^a.ve^'thl$nki I^)av«n, im infupfi^ 
irabTp-averfioffl' toSlood, lunleiaiwhen'foitour 
H4«our ,wt;"(hedjot lore,.iti;gail«ntIy in tba 
&dtly .During, all oer popular- eointiiaiions 
■vf.^ -fievcr loft.Jight 'of Hu«iinfcty ; and cweaiin 
^le dreadful yeajT -J 780 thei Mob^ did not hurl 
-thethair <Jf. any (nan's head. ::Bat the F^eaab 
<()^s^ot. bo- iQ^^hnt withiKit I bding. bk>adi* 
fh'&iiy J-— .Hfhjie sb'fy -have Liberty in- their 
JjpJEouihsthfiirJBAnds arc engaged., in Slaugfa tier j 
^tbcii Tree of Liberty cannot thrive, unlefs 

tha 

Dgiw^dbv .Google 



t »o ] 

the Soil be dreqchcd with Blood. t( becos^eii 
therefore, every Englijbman to fty, '* From 
French Liberty the good Lord deliver u« I*' 

Man. I am as much Ihocked as you can be 
at the horrid maflacres lately comrnitted 1ft 
France^ and I believe that EngHJhmen are inca- 
pable offuch barbarities. Biit I cannot cgpr 
ccive bow the little paffage of fea between Dofxr 
and Calais can malte fuch a difference in difpo- 
lition between one people and another. . 

Far. There arc a variety of cau&s which 
operate in forming the difpofition of a people, 
and perhaps none more than ' the Conditutiea 
and Form of Government under wliidbi^ they 
live. Thus the Engl^ Chu^er has acquired 
a vigour and a inanlinefs fromtheConftitutioa. 
The confequence which every Eng^Jhman ieeU 
10 belong to t^nl as (iich, and i^ fiEnfe4ie en- 
tertains of the value of thofr important rights 
and privileges wbich he4njoys as 1ii« birthright, 
endue him with firmnefs and magnanimity, and 
inlpire him with a fenfe of honour, and a 
dreadof difgr3ce}-»i-whilehi9dirppfition,formed 
under the mild and genial influence of legal, or- 
derly, and falutary Freedom, is as open, humane, 
and generous, as it is bold and brave. Every fpe- 
cies of cruelty is repugnant to his nature ; he is 
as ready to forgiv« and to.fuccour as to £^t> 
and he will no more hurt or eVeo- infult a van- 
quifhcfl 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



-4)ui{hed ibe, than he will yield the palm of vic- 
tory while he has ftrength to dtfpute it. Nor 
is ^ere a People io the world (o diftinguiihed 
for their benevolent bounty as the Ertg/i/h, 
JVIuniScenceand Charity are here difpfayed be- 
yond all example and without oftentatibn ; aiKt 
Woe, whicb^ by the laws of Nature, is evef at- 
tendant upon the condition of Humanity, is 
fure among us to ittnik pity ami relief. Thus 
may it be faid» that to live under the Laws and 
Government of this Country, tends to refine and 
improve Honian Nature itfelf, ai4id to cultivatd' 
thegYowth of itsnobleft virtues, —In like manflei? 
do the {Principles of the Conftitution favour the* 
fucccfa of honeft indufltryand o£ ufeful enter- 
prize. Where do we find Commerce and Ma- 
nufactures flouriih as in this Country ; where 
sre the Labourer, the Aftizan, or the Mechanic, 
fo certain of employment ? Where is Diligence 
fo furcoSSitccefa, andMeritof a Rccompenee? 
And to what is this owing, but to tftefoilcring 
hand of the Conilitutiony which bellows Liberty 
?nd Security as an univcrfal boon upon all i in-' 
fpiring thereby confidence and fatisfadion ; and 
encouraging, while it protddts, the L^odfs trf" 
the Hand, the Exertions of t^e Miod^ atid-the 
vtirroiie Efforts of ufeful Indqftry. 

Sai, I hope, Brother^ by this time you are 
fatisfisd, clfe I cannot imagine what the' devil' 
you would have, And as for Tom Paine, or 
any qthcr lying lubbcfly rafcal who tries to 

put 



put Englifhmcn out of conceit with their 
Country, and tdftir up fuch a happy People ta' 
iDutiny, he dcferves death a thoufand tttiies 
tjiorc than a robber or even a pirate, [ 

Far. Such wretches deferve both execration 
^d punifhment ; but I fancy they fuifer very 
fevcrply in the difappointmcnt of their hopes, 
It is no fmall moiti^cation' to them to fee that ' 
Mniverfa!. attachment to the Conflitution, and 
that ardent and enthufiafticloyalty to the King, 
tyhich i grateful ^nd aiIe£Uonate,'.a fenlibte, 
9 free, and a happy people difplay with fuch 
seal and fervor. Thefe fentiments and feelings 
gifted before } they are indeed infeparable from 
the heart of every triie Briton ; hut they have 
been called forth, at the prefent moment, into 
fuch loud and univerfal acclamations, by the 
daring, and mifchievoas ^attempts of wicked 
Incendiaries who fought to excite Infurrec- 
tion and Rebellion. The people law them- 
felves infulted, vilified, and menaced. They 
I\ave joined their hands and raifed their voice 
evep to Heaven, to vindicate their honour from 
the foul afperfion of difloyalty, and to teftify 
tfeeir regard for thofc rights for which their 
anceftors, ftruggled and bled. The Britifli 
Lion is roufed, and ihews himfelf determined 
to defend the Throne and the Conftitution from, 
all foes both within and without, and woe to^ 
thofe who dare provoke his vengeance. 

Sai, 

■ Dgiw^dbv Google 



[ >3 ] 

Sat. All traitors at home will, I Hope, jiiee| 
with their deferts i and believe me', the wooden 
walls of Old England were never in better 
condition of defence againft all foreign foes, 
fhould any dare either to attack or to infult us. 

Far, That is pcrtainly true^ and I will add, 
jhat fuch is the tried valour, fuch the fteady 
and unfligkcn fidelity both of the Britifti Army 
and Navy, that our honor and our interefts arc 
fecure againft the whole World. With fuch 
gallant protcSors we may reft cafy and undif- 
'turbed, and thank Heaven for diftinguifliing 
UB with fo many and fo great advantages, be- 
yond all the Nations of the Earth. But, for 
^hc prcfent, I muft conclude our converfation; 
and to-ijiprrow evening wc will refume it 
agajn. 



p:iJp OF THE SECONp DIALOGUE. 



■ L);.I..=.J by Google 



lT;,k,.J by Google 



DIALOGUES 

BITWIIH 

A Farmer, a Sailor, and a 
Manufa£hirer. 

DIALOGUE TH£ THIRD. 



£ Price Four-pence; or. Seven ShilUngl th» 
■Qutncr sf a Hundred. ] 



;v..ii,, Coot^lc 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



DIALOGUES 

# ON THE 

RIGHTS 

. "' 
B R I 7 N S, 

BE T WE E M 

A F A R M E R, 
A SAILOR, 

AND 

A MANUFACTURER. 

DIALOGUE THE THIRD. 



LONDON': 

rftlHTBD '(><( T. LOHCUAN, PATBK-NOITEll-ROW) O. Hlfi^t. 

tkLL-UKlA.; J. nSBKETT, PICCADILLY J AHS 

J. POWNEli NO. lAOifBAK TtHPLB^BAHf 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



DIALOGUES, &e. 



FaiIuek; 

(To Mamtfaaurtr) TXT'ELL, I hope, flpon reflcaion^ 
you arc now reconciled again td 
Jrour ufefal conditibn of life, and tliat y oil will return t6 
that contented and cheerful induAry Which formerly made 
yourfclf and your family fo happy. 

Man. Why, I mull ackiiowkdge that I oftd to be very 
contented and very happy. I found my lahour an amufc' 
ment as well as a means of fiibliftencc ; and my Iatif> 
faftion was complete when after my day's woric I return- 
ed to my family. But then I had never read Mr. Pained 
and knew nothing of thole grievances which he has 
pointed out. 

Far. Your grievances mult have Been very great fined 
you could not find them out without Mr. Paine's 
affiftance. If a perfon is out of order, his feelings ar^ 
fure to infomi him of it ; fd if you were injured or op^ 
prelfed in any degree, I fhould think you would noc 
Want Mi-. Paine^ or any one elfe, to point it out to you: 
£nglilhmen are very quick in difccrning their'vrrongs, 
and are much rhore apt to fuppofe imaginary evils than 
to overlook real ones. But, pray, what are the grievances 
to which you refer? I was in bbpM I had convince:! 
A3 JO* 



f « ] 

you that every individual in this Country, being under 
ttw {(roCS£tiA of known aiid ^ual laws, and in tlie en- 
joyDMnt of equal conftitutional liberty, is fecurc from 
every Kind of oppicuion* 

Man. And fo you have, Dor can I dcniy tliat the people 
of this Country enjoy, as individuals^ all the advantages yoa 
have mentioned. I feet that I poflels fteidotn anl feturity, 
and Ihat haWng the protcflibn of the laws in my favour^, 
no one can hurt or injure me. Btit what is all this while 
the form of Goftiiiiutm Milerirhidi wc live is Jncoa- 
fiftent with the Rights of Man ? and of that I am tho- 
roughly convinced by.iealiBg Mr. Paine, however he 
may tuivc deceived me on other points. 

Far. You are not aw^re how gtofsly yon contradift 
yourfclf. You fay our form of Government is incon- 
liflent with the Rights of Man. Now before you adopt 
that opinion.youfhould examine whataretlicRightsofMati 
with -rcfpea to -Government. Pray what do you imagine 
to be the objed for which Government is eftabUflied ? 

Man. 1 fuppofe, to make men as free and as happy as 
pojliblc ; or for what you, perhaps, would qall Liberty* 
Security, and the Welfare of Society. 

Far. They arc exaftly the fame thing ; and as Govern- 
ment is inftituted for fucti purpofes, I fuppofe man- 
kind have a right to expcd that it Ihall produce thocnds 
for which it is eflablifhed. 

Man. Moft certainly. 

Far. And can there be any right more important or 
niorc cflential than tliis ? 

Man. No, t do not think there can — it iecms to me 
to include all our rights. 

F^r. Then, without inuch difficulty, we have got at 

the grand and eflentlal Rights of Man in Society ; 

Bamcly, to derive aU the Protedion and Security in 

feribik 



[ 7 ] 
FdrfoD and Property, <9rhich it is in the power of G6^ 
Vernment to bcftgw ; and thefc rights, as you ha« 
-already admitted) are completely ctijoyed in this Couii' 
try, where every one hais equally the protedion of th4 
liaws, and where there does not exift any power to ia- 
jure or opprefs : our form of (jovernincnt, thcrdbre, caA- 
Jiot be tnconliflent with thofe rights, Hace we enjof 
, them fo ftilly. 

Man, But what if ano^er Form fhould appear prefcr- 
ake? 

Far. Pray tell me, if you were to chufe 2 machine^ 
fhould you conlider chiefly whether it were of a particu- 
lar form, or wtftther upon trial it worked well, and an- 
swered in the beft poiUble manner th»porpofc for whicli 
it was made ? 

' Man. I Ihould certainly work it^ and if I found it 
vfeful and Q>mmodious, I Ihould not care oiuch about 
the fotm.. 

Far. And if, befides finding upon trial that itanfwcred 
your purpofe, you fhould learn that it had been gene- 
rally ufed with great approbation by others ifl the &mt 
' line of bullnefs with yoiirfelf, and even by your predc- 
ceflbrs for many centuries back, flioUld yotl not inunei 
diately conclude that it was conftrufled in the beft man- 
ner, and put together in the moft commodious and adi 
TantageouS form ? 

Mi/ii. Certainly I (hcluld. 

Far. Then why Ihould you not judge iri the fani^ 
tnanner about Government, which >s a machine, and jL 
tery imricate one too, the office of which is to fecrfrc, as, 
tnuch as poffible, the welfare and happiniefs of man ? If 
we had ftiil to form a Goycrnraent, wc Ihould endea- 
vour to difcover one which was likely to produce tbofH 
tery adraiitages which we already enjoy. And are w« 
A4 - ,>. t« 



t.« J 

tt> be told by Mr< Paihe, or any one dfe, ttutovr fonn 

df Goveinment ts inconfiflent with the Rights of Man, 
while it is fo plain that we are in full polleffion of 
tiiofe Rights — white every one is free to do whatever 

^ he pleafes, fo he does not violate thofe laws which are 
made for the happincfs of all — wlule every man is fc- 
curely protcfled againll all the world f Thofe who do' not 
lik.e fiich rights, mnft wi(h ta'elUblilh other rights of a 
contrary nature— ^uch as the right to plunder, to ra- 
vage, and to murder, which I take to be the moJirn 
Rights of Man — which the doftrines' of Mr. Paime 

. tend to eftablilh, and which are afiually praftifpd by his 

\w friends the Jacobins in France. 

Man. I'm fure you will not fu(pc£t me of favouring 
fuch horrid rights. 

Far. No; I am confident yoo are an honeft well- 
meaning fellow, and have only, like many others, been 
led aAray by' attending to the artful writings of dc- 
iignlug men. Thefe men feek to create confulion, 
by rendering mankind diflatisfied with tlteir lot, and 
while they promife fomething iar better, they only en- 
fbrechcbittcreftdirappointment to thofe who believe them, 
as you yourfelf have experienced. Xliey do not like the 
rights enjoyed in tiiis Country, bccaufe while fuch rights 
•xiil, their wicked propcnfities muft be kept within fome 
bbunds ; for the t,aw9 cannot proted: the good without 
rcftiainingthebad. Therefore thefewretches have a violent 
antipathy to al! regular aiideftaMifhedGovcrnmciit, bccaufe 
insthebufiiicfsthereofto fee that the Uws are executed. It 
Would nat, indeed, anfwerthcirpurpofc to coir.plaiiiexprcfs- .- 
lythat pci funs and property are fecure j that would he too 
barci'aced, and wouJd certainly defeat their fchemesj but 'i 
they liiake a violentouccry againftGoveniment : — -inorde^ 
'ID raife a prejudice, they aittibc to it all thofe evil's, mif- 
fortones. 



' [ 9 ] . 

fortunes, and hxrdfhips which are attertdant 6n our na* 
tan, and which, vndcr a mild Government like oar'i, 
aTc alleviated as much ai poflible. If any other Govern* 
mcnt could be fubftitnted which fhoutd afford like protec- 
tion, they would be juft as noify and clamorous. No- 
thing* indeed, could peHe£tly fattsfy them but the total 
deftruAion of all'GoTcrnmentwbatever. ' 

■Alan. How can you charge Mr. Pai»e with any 
(uch intention ? Miay he not wjfh to change one Govern- 
ment for anotherwitbout being deiirouf of deftroyingall 
Government whatever i 
■ Far. In general he is too artful to avow any fudi dc- ' 
Hgn ; but in one part bis zeal got the better of his pru- 
' dence> and made htm cxpofe the cloven foot— f mean 
where he fays that Government is of very little atility, 
and a; the bcft a thing more in name and idea than in 
fad ; and that the diflblation of Government would b« 
Attended with advantage. 

Man. Oh ! 1 remember now that I vras a little fur» 
prize at that part ; but perhaps Mr. Paihs coi^U ex- 
plain it fatisfeftorily. ' 

Far. I foppofe yon mean he could explwn it away ; 
but he would be hard put to it to do fo ; and in fpite of all 
bis fubtlety it will ever remain a damning prpof of the 
real extent of his wilhes, and afford a full explanation 
of all his writings. Thus it is that people who want to 
deceive, and are rtiereforc obliged to conceal tfaftir real 
meaning, are apt fometimes (fortunately for the canfe of 
truth) to be off their guard, and to let the maik drop oC 
But after {bch a fpccimen, it is fairto infer, that whenever 
Mr. Paine or his abettors oppofe any particular form of 
Government, it it Government itlelf in every praAicable 
form that they mean to attack (at leaft vntil they can- 
get to tht head, and then they would rale with a rod of 
Aj . irons 

U;.t.z=dbv Google 



f lo J 
iron, anc( prove that Government may indeed beacnrfcji 
But at prefent, whatever pretences they may ufe, the 
forms which moft difpleafe them 'are thofe of the OW 
Bailey anJ the aflizes ; and of all the Agents of the Exe- 
cutive Powcf) they mo{l diHikc the Executioner, and on 
his account chiefly all the reft. 

Sai. Egad, Mafter P^-ise has let the cat out of the 
bag, and they muft be d — — d foolsi indeed, who fuffer 
themfelvcs to be gulled by him after fuch a difcovery. 

Man. Well, weD, you mufl have your laugh out, for 
1- cannot' deny that you have made a fiir hit. But ftill, 
as Mr. Paine brings ohjeflions againil our. particular 
fcrm of Government, it is an important queftion, Whe- 
ther thefeVbje£tions arc well founded or not? 

Far. That is a queftion I have no objeflion to con- 
fider, though I muft previoufly obferve to you once 
more, that as Conftitutions and forms of Government 
are not mere fpeculations, or fancies of the mind, but 
inftitutions of a moft important nature, and altogether of, 
a prafticai kindj the beft way to jud^e of' their merits is 
to obferVt their effefls j to examine^ not which is the 
moft beautiful, but which is the moft ufcful;and ta 
enquire whether they produce the happinefs and welfare 
of the people. We have already feen, and you have 
oandidly admitted, that every political and focia,! blcffing 
is fully enjoyed by the people of Grem Britain, who 
knowing that they are frec^ flourilhing, and profperou^ 
eX honie, and highly rcfpeflcd abroad, are ftrongly 
attached to the form of Government under which they 
enjoy fuch advantages. 

Man. But am I to underftand you, that on fo impor- 
tant a fubjeft we are not to cxercife our rcafon at all ? 

Far. By no means ; I am only for affording reafon the 
ifqpOTUnt^id Qf experience, whenever it can be obtained. 



.,.^ 



t ■■ 1 

Iflallcafcs, ihofe whorenfoii inoppoficiontofaasaiid ob- ■ 
iervationare almoft furc to be miftakcn ; but on a matter of 
fuch importance, we fliould be particularly cautious not t& 
quit the high beaten road of experience j for if we go wrong, 
the confequence is moft dreadful. The comfort and 
happineft of millions are here at flake ; and yet, without 
mentioning fuch incendiaries as Paine, whofe objeft it is 
to miHead, there are perfons of honeft intentions, whq, 
ia a maner of fuch moment, recomm^d wild and random 
experiments with as much boldnefs and compofure as 
if no material inconvenience could attend a failure or a 
miftake. If we could bo perfuadcd to take for our 
guides thefe political WJll-o'-the-wifps, we fhould in- 
fallibly be led into fome of thofe gulphs of mifery nnd 
niin which furround us on every fide, and lofe irrecover- 
ably the ineftimable advantages of our prefent fituation ; 
while the whole world would be more difpofed to laugh 
at our folly, than to pity the wrctchedneft which that folly 
had produced. It is therefore among the plaineA diftates 
of reafon, that a people fhould know the advantages they 
aAually po0efs, that they fhould value them properly, 
enjoy them with fcnfc and moderation, and prefervc 
tiicra with unfliaken lirninefs and unceafing vigilance. 
In ihort, they fhould cake care not to lofe the fuMlance 
for the Ihadow. 

j1/(I7(. I cannot but feel the force of what you fay ; but 
ftill you have not convinced me that Mr. Paine's ob- 
jeftions to our form of Government are unfounded in 
reafon, or that a people might not be flill happier with- 
out either Kings or Nobles. '^ 

Far. Having cftabliftied the excellence of the BrilifK 

form of Government on the beft of all poffible grounds, 

namely, the benefits it confers on the people, I am 

M willing at yourfclf to examine Mr. Faine's ob- 

A 6 jeflions. 



t " ] 

jeAiom, which are founded only in malice, and fop- 
portcd only by falfehood ^nd ntiricprcfcntxtion.*^ 
You a(k ;ne, whether a pcoi>Ic might not be ha[^ier 
without Kings and Noblcj ?— that ii to &y, Whether a 
pure Republic, or Democtacy, is not preferable to a 
mixt Government like ours ? I anfwcr, that aa we are 
now bringing Govcrnizieiits to the tefi of general reafonj 
there is one fliort plain contid^etation which will aiEft at 
very much in judging, rightly upon the fabjcd, aad' 
which Paine wants either the wifdom or the honefty to 
take into the account, viz. that Government is to operate 
upon human nature, which is, and ever tnufi be in 
this world, liable to numberlefa JOtperfefiioost fraildes, 
and vices. Nay, thofc very defers render -Govemment 
neceflary ; for if men were pure and perfcft beings, the^ 
would not want ^e protection of Govemment againft 
each other. As, therefore, GoverAdient is founded vpott 
the imperfediont of human nature, and inlendcd as t 
remedy againft thofe imperfcdions, it is at necefiary to 
take that circumftance into conHdcration in jawing <^ 
the utility of any particular form of Govemment, as it ii 
for a Pbyfician to confidcr the confiitation of bis 
patient, and the nature of the difeafc, befoR tie applies 
a remedy. But thefc arc matters which yoifr defigning 
vifionary writers upon Government altogether overlook. 

Man. Ail that feems rational enough, though I do not 
find any fuch obfetvations in Mr. Paine. But, pray, 
how do yon apply them in favour of Monarchy in pre- 
ference to a Republic ? < , 

Far. Monarchy is beft calculated by its vigour and 
energy to keep the paflions of mankind within bouridsj 
and to rep refi the pernicious efitds of their vices. It is&- 
lounble to public quiet> order, and tran^uiUitys wfallo 

aRo- 

L);,i,.=.ib,.Goot^l 



C 13 ] 

t Republic Is fubjeA to perpetual agitation and di(- 
Inrbance. In the foTmer, the ambition of indivi- 
duals is ufeful to the State, hf prompting men to gain 
(liftin^iioi) and eminence, and to dilplay their talenti 
in the fcrvice of their country,, while there always 
exifts 3 power capable of rcftraining its excclTes } and it 
cannot, however ardent, pals certain bounds, nor afpire 
to fuprcme dominions— but in Republics, ambition has 
no limits i the love of power, lb natural to the human 
mind, is here perpetually excited by a never-ceafing 
temptation, and may be carried to any length ; and when 
that is the c^Tc, the bad, who without fcruple purfue any 
meant to att^n fuccefs, will have greatly the advantage; 
. of honeflmcn, who delirc only to ferve theirconntry, and 
are always under the reHraint of principle. Bbth, in- 
deed, with equal fervour, may lay in their claim to pa<- 
trioti&i, bat how are the people to look into their hearts 
and lee which bcft dcferves it? — nay, the pretended patriot 
is ever moft notfy on. that fubjeft, and thereby oftea 
gains the public confidence. In aid too of bis proteffidns, 
he works privately by cabal and intrigue } he makes the 
pai^ons of the multitude fubfervient to his deiigns, and 
has, upon the whcde, abundantly the beft chance of 
getting into power. .But means that fucceed with ons 
man, or let of men, being alike open to all, may alfo 
fucceed with others >— hence different faftions will be 
continually at work ; while tbc^e that have gained 
their objed maft continue to employ the, fame arts,' ia 
order to prefervc their idcendancy, and to counteraA the - 
efforts of otb^e. Thus a Republic muft be a prey 
to internal difquiet and agitation— it muft be ever con- 
vulfed :by that Ambition whidi, in a Monarchy, is fubjeA 
Co a gruid regiUating fpring ; while the people, dopes t« 
A 7 , ■ «tt 



,,„,.c. 



.ooqIc 



■ t 14 3 
all the delufivc artifices of popularity, and wavering from 
fide tQ fide, according to the flcill and addrefs of their 
refpeftive Demagogues, have no other chance fof repofc 
than the entire afcendancy of. fame one &£tion over 
the reft ; in which cafe, the moft violent and arbitrary 
means muft be icfortcd to, in order to prefcrirc fucht 
fuperiOrity, and to fupprefs all oppofition and inter- 
ference ;— and then you will find the completcft and 
the moil defpotic tyranny that can poffibly be exercifed' 
over a people. 

Sai. 1 think. I fee the rcafon why your ixftlefsr 
fellows arc all fuch violent Democrats, as I think 
you call 'em — for in a Monarchy they arc Itept under 
tlie hatches of rule and order, and that docs not fuit 
them. At fea we always keep a fharp look-out on tlie. 
grumbling, difcontented dogs, who, I dare fay, would be 
liberty boys a-fhore. They are ever trying to draw off 
their fliip-mates from their duty, and would be glad of 
an opportunity to run away with the veffeL 

far. Such perfons are out of their element in every 
wdl^iegulated State, and pant for tumult and confufion. 
Hence the moft turbulent part of mankind are generally 
difpofed to be rank Republicans ; but as the affairs of 
the world fucceed beft by the aid of order, quiet, and 
tranquillity, Republics are but little in vogue, and 
cxiftonlyin countries of very fmall extent, where theii 
mifchiefi cannot make fuch progrefs as in larger territories. 
America, which, after the War and the eilablilhment of 
its Independence, began witli the Democratical Syftem, 
found, after a very few years experience, that fuch a 
fyllem was abfolutely incompatible with its happineft 
■nd profperity ; and accordingly in the year 1787, as, far 
as citcumftances would permit, it adopted the Englifli 
^nditutioij, as it had before adopted the Englilh Laws ; 

and 



[ IS ] 

And introduced the triple form of Government — ^by 
e^blilhing a President, who is invefted with the Executive 
!Power — and two deliberative Chambers. 

Sai. I remember I was thereabout that time — Evepy 
thing at firft fcemed in confulion — the crew was dif- 
orderly,under no command — thcveflcldid not anfwer the 
helm, and was expcAed every moment to founder i— 
liut juft at the nick the Government was trimmed and 
balanced — a Captain was appointed — difcipline was 
ci^bliHied aboard— and fo, luckily, the fliip righted, and 
has rode well ever iince. 

Far. Very juftly as well as fairly dcfcribed. — And for 
want of fuch a bilance in Government as was then efta- 
blilhed in America, the Republican fyftem has ever been, 
and mufi ever be, incompatible with the welfere of States. la 
flioft, todefcribe aRepublic in a few words, its principal fea- 
tures are, unbridled ambition, hypocrify, fuf^icion, jea- 
lonfy, and unrelenting feverity, on the part of the Govem- 
mentj — reftlcflhefs, ferment, ficklenefs, divi£on,animofity, 
and perpetual difquiet, on the part of the' People ; — while 
the bond of union between both is cabal, fa£tion, intrigue^ 
artifice, and delulion. On the other hand, Monarchy Is 
favourable to the repofe and tranquillity of a State ; itl 
principle is honour, its attributes vigour, difpatch, 
mildnefs, and clemency : it is friendly to civilizatioi^ and 
refinement ; it foftcrs the Arts and Sciences ; it protefts 
and encourages induftry and Ingenuity, and it pofTeHes the 
befl fecurity for ufefulnefs that any human inflitution is 
Capable of, namely, that the duty and the intereft of the 
Monarch are the fame, for he cannot confult his own! 
greatnefs more than by promoting the real welfare of hil 
people. A Monajtch too may, with fafety and dignity, 
Kmper the levcrity of the Laws, by an exeKife of the 
AS Oodike 

■ . L);.l..=.JbvGOOglc 



t i6 ]. 

Godlike quality of R^rcy • : — he ' may even fotne»' 
times confirm his Throne and the public fccurity by x 
wcli^imed extenfion of pardon and forgivcnefs. But 
Rcpubliciin Rulers can never forgive : inflcad of miti- 
gating the Laws, they arc obliged, for fecurity, to ftrttch 
them to the utmoft degree of fevcrity : their dominion 
has Xo precarious a foundation, that they £nd it 
ncceflary to prop_ and fupport it by terror ; and they tnuffi 
awe and intimidate their foes by confifcatiotu, profcrip- 
tions, and exctutions. 

A/en. But. what if the Monaich fhauld be a Tyrant, 
and nfc his .^owcr for the porpofcs of Opprtffion .? Thi* 
you will furcly admit to be pof&ble, and 1 Should be glad 
t^ know, if in that cafe a Monarchy is preferaiblc to a 
Republic. 

Rir. That -darker only .exifts in an abfolnte Moi 
narchy, and not in a limited oae like ours, where the 
powen and prerogatives of the Crowa are Tcfirifted anid 
clearly defined, ^nd it is out of the power of the Sovereign 
to extend them, to opprefs his fubjeds, or infrmge 09 
the Conftinition. In comparifon w:ith fuch- a Gorem- 
meni, the d^potic power of an individual is .a juft fub* 
jeA.of abhorrence, and ought ^en in idea to excite tbs 
indignation of £nglilhmen. Butdreadfulandd,etcflableaj 
aMplute Monarchy is, it is expofed to moch fewer evils than 
tirofe which, for the reafpns Ihave ftatcd, muft ever prevail 
ia aRepublie. There is always a confiderable chance that 
thcmqftabfolutc Monarch may bejuft, humane, beneficent, 
an,d, dcfiroHa of prompting theixal welfare of his people ; 
and :l;bat .clia^se is jnuch favoured by the circumftance^ 

* Thu« the fa^oliVite fenglifh Bsfd fayc of Mercy, that 
— : — , — ^„(« It becomw 
,<> Tl|« throned MoDirch better <liaa hit Crown-ia 
* It i* cDtlveBeil ia ibt hMru of Kin|^" 



■ L);.l..=.JbvGj"10g^ 



t >T ] 
i9Mt it is his perfonal intereft to be To.— But In aR.eput>Ge) 
the Ruling Party can neither acquire nor retain its powc* , 
but by fuchmeaosas honeftmcnwoulddifdaintoeroploy; 
tbcy muft flatter the vicious, and cajok the weak ; and 
whilctbey T^heedlcthcgiddy multitude by their fpcciou» 
eloquetKe, luid by innumenible private artifices, tbcyare 
really Defpots qf the worilkind, Deipots under the malic. 
of patriotifm. It is alfo certainly, worle to be governed 
■ oy many Tyrants than by one [ and the Prince, how- 
ever tyrannical and opprefljve his ^fpolition may be, 
bis not the opportunity of doing fuch cxtenfive mifchief 
isRepuUicKi Demagngnee, whotivein tlie nudft of -{lie 
people, and have aLLtheir ■own feparate animofitics and 
FcftntmcDts to grattly. 

Mtat. I always thoi^ht it wa» e(!bntialto a RspuUic 
diattht willof die People at la^ ihould be fiiprcate ; 
tfthat is the cafe, how will they fubmit to be tyran- 
nised over ? 

Ftfr, That is, I allow, the [Hvfelled principle of a Re* 
public, bat it is never conied into pradice, nay, >m- 
poffibl« itflumld. The many are always kd by a few,, 
and thofc £ev/ by ambition and perfonal intereft. No- 
diii^ is jnore eafy tbaa to excite and to play upon tli« 
paffions of the people at large. Their cool honeft Judg- 
tnUit is never referred to ; but when their affiftance is 
wanted' for any particular purpofe, their minds are firtt 
worked np into a ftate of agitation, their feats are ex- 
ated, their ittdignation rou(ed,-their vanity flattered, and. 
their reafon amtifcd. They never fee the real ^rings by 
which the machine is worked ; and while tljcy are eucoa- 
tt^d to think that all power proceedsfrOm, and is adually 
exerclfcd by tbemfelves, they are merely the dupes and 
the tools of thofe who profefs to bow tq their authority, 
aod are cajoled, uadet the notion of an ideal Sovereignty, to 
execute 



t .! ] 

exWtrtft the plans of their Tyrants. Thtfy in c*eri litidt- 
inflruments of revenge, and arc often excited to lacrifice 
as traitors thofe very pcrfons whom but the day bdbrc they 
bad idolized as Patriots. This was frequently thecale in 
the ancient Republics ; and> to fhew that human nature 
.fiill continnes the fame, has juft been exhibited in France, 
where thofe pcrfons who, a few months ago, were revered' 
as the founders of the iirft Revolution, have been cither 
mallacred by the populace or obliged to ily for their lives. 
It is, therefore, ever attended with danger in a Republic to 
excite the refcntment oftbofe who can dire£l the public 
fiiry againit their enemies, who can let loofe the many- 
headed Monfter whenever they pleafe, and perfnade an ' 
enraged inultit;ude, that their vengeance ought to fnper-: 
fedc the authority of all Laws.— Thus is a Republican 
fiirm of Government incompatible with the enjoyment 
€»f true genuine Liberty. The freedom there enjoyed is 
mierely nominal ; for while every poflible excefs is per-, 
mitted, nay, even encouraged, on one lidc of aquefiion, 
every one who indulges in the Icaft freedom of fpeech 
againft popular prejudices, or who happens to he even 
an objeft of fufpicion, may, without any legal procels,. 
be inftantiy rewarded with a dungeoD, a dagger, or a lamp- 
iron. The Lawscannotaffbrdprote£lion againftapower- 
whicli acknowledges no fuperior, which is fubjeft.to no 
controul, which is as capricious and as fickle as thewind, 
and which is eaiily rendered the blind tool of the vileft 
mcnforthcvileft purpofcs. ItispJain, therefore, thata, 
Republic can only cxiit in name,' and that what is fo 
called, is, in|fa£t, a Government by a few ; aodas thole fejrc 
willeverbcofthemoft violent, daring, and turbulentdifpor- 
iitipn, the eftabliQiment of foch a form of GovemfnenC 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



t >9 3 
is a furc introduClion to the very worft fpecics ot Aril^ 
tocracy. 

Man. You draw a terrible piflure of Republics, and 1 
am furc it is out of my power to prove it a falfe one; 
but I have been told, that a Republic is not fo much 
expofed as a Monarchy to War, tlic greateft of all cala- 
.mities : and if fo, furcly the general tranquillity of States 
and Nations would counterbalance many internal defcfts 
of Government. What idea Can be more dreadful than for 
a whole people to undergo the miferies of a long, bloody, 
and expenfivc war, to gratify the ambition or the venge- 
ance of one man. 

Sai, Egad.that's a (hot betwixt wind and water, and muft 
go a great way towards fettling the quefUon between Mo- 
narchies and Republics. For tbo' War is my trade, and 
I have no other chance of ever walking tlie quarter- 
dcclc, I can-ealily reckon that Peace is a fine thing for 
Landfmen, becaufe as how they have a mortal diflike 
to Taxes. ■ 

Far. The idea that a Republican form of Government 
is more favourable to the peace and harmony of mankind, 
' and lefs likely to be attended with wars, than a Monarchy* 
is merely an artful pretext, ufed to prejudice the minds of 
the credulous. Ifweconfult experience, and look back 
into paft events,, wc ifaall £nd that the taoH bloody and 
cruel wars the world ever knew, have fublifted between 
Republics. Bclides, Republican States have not only been 
always more ready to engage in war than others, buthave 
alfo been th^ moil fanguinary and ferocious in the pro-' 
lecution thereof; and they have ever fhewn tbemfelveff 
much more fufceptible of revenge, ambition, jeaJoufy, 
rivallhip, and a thirft for conqueft, than the moft ab- 
foiute Monarchs. I well remember to bave read 
wheal was ■young, and prepwing for a very different 



C 20 3 

line of life to that I havcfince foUonvd. tBat the littU 
Republican States of Greece were conllantly engaged in' 
the moft violent contentions — ^Tbat the Komans and 
Carthaginians, thougli at a much greater diflance from each 
otlier, indulged their mutual a:;lino!ity for a long time willi 
nnabating fury, till the latter were touUy extirpated. Nay, 
to look at home — no'fooncr was the Monarchy overthrown 
by the atrocious murder of Charles T. than this coun- 
try, while under the influence of a Government alto- 
gether Republican, and before Cromwell had ufurpcd 
the Sovereignty, entered into a furious and obftinate war ; 
and that not with a kingdom, but with Holland, which was 
then alfo a pure Republic. And it may be alfo proper 
tp obferve, that thofe wan which Great Britain has 
oig^ged in for a hundred years back, and which 
hive been the canfe af our public debt, inftcad of being 
prompted by the ainbition of our Monarchs, have been 
chiefly called- f9r by the people at large. But the 
jvofl ftriking inAance to fhew that Democratlcal and Re- 
publican Syftems of Government are incompatible with the 
peace of Nations, prefents itfelf at this moment to our 
eyes in the example of France ; wherei notwithfbiidiiig 
the moil (air and fmooth profe^ions of univerfal peace, 
andjasfax as words could gOj anabfolutc renunciation of 
all conqueA, the rage for war, and for enlai:g«] dominion, 
haSffrom the commencement ofthe Revolution, COD tinned 
t.o increafe in- cxa£t proportion to the extenGon of 
Republican principles ; till at length the ^vourite object 
kerns to be^ to make war with every country in Europe 
that will not fubmit to the mofi infblent and arbitrary 
mandates. 

A^an. But does not France carry on thoft wars for Hit 
acnerous yurpofc of giving t,ibert)- (o Nations ? 

-, Jl^ 

L);.l..=.JbvGOOgk ■ 



r " 3 . 

Fat. That Is the moft fiimfy pretext that was «vcr 
'ufed to cover a reftlefs and unbounded ambition,— 
Without any eftabliibed Government of. their own— i 
fwithout any traceofaConftitution, and themfclves a pre^ 
to confufion and anarchy, the French have the auda- 
city- to interfere in the internal concerns of other Na- 
tions) and to didate what form of Government the^ 
ihall have. This is what they infolcntly call beftowJng 
Freedom. They offer Liberty to all Countries— ^ake 
poHeffiop of fuch as ' accept it — declare war againft 
inch as will not, and fend armies to compel them t»' 
be fret. The principles on which tficfe new-made 
Republicans carry on war, and the manner in which 
they conduct it, ferve only to 'render it a more 
dreadful and a more unircrfal fcourgc to mankind 
than it has ever appeared in die Hiflory of the World. 
Belidcshavockanddevafiation, the ufuaT attendants upon 
trar, they fpread civil difcord and infurre£tion wherever 
they go — they diffolve all the bands of Sbciety — remove 
all Conftituted Authorities, and break afunder all die 
tics of Religion and Morality. Inflcad of dcpcndii^for 
fuccefs upon fair, open, and manly hofiilities, they en- 
deavour by treacherous underhand arts, not merely to flir 
up the people againft the eftabliChed Government but 
alfo to excite them to jealoufy, contention, and ani- 
mofity among themfelves. By fuch bafe and incendiatj 
means do they obtain fuccefs in their military operations ; 
and then at once they throw off the ma(K, and fliew, that 
thf Liberty they confer is Indeed to fct people free from all 
obligations to their old eftaMi(hed Government, but in 
the ftead thereof to eftablilh the deteftabic tyranny of a 
foreign yoke. Then, indeed, do the people learn what 
it is to be enflaved— then do they fcel*what it is to be In- 
fultCfJ— their' repofe deftroyed — their property fubjcfted 



f M 1 

to. plunder— thdr lives expofed to tht aflilfin's dagger — 
ijieir lawscufloms and inanncrs violated, and all their civil 
and rejigious Inflitutions overthrown ; and to crown all, 
the unhappy country ie to be finally chained with the ex- 
pences altending its own ruin.| 

Sai. Split my lop- fails, if I fhould not hars 
gucQcd you was fpeaicing of our old enemies the 
French, though you had not named them. I know 
their tricks of old— they always Ihun fair fighting as 
long as they can, and inltcad of ct\g;^ing yard-arm and 
yard-arm, as Englilh Tars like to do, they keep alot^ 
manceuvring and firing at our rigging, that we may not 
be able to purfuc them when they llieer off. — But 
damn 'em, if they happen to lofe' tlie wind, fo that w» 
call brii^ 'cm to, we don't, fail to give a good account 
of 'e[D~-as Hawke and Rodney, and many others, could 
ttll you. 

Afan..Sxit though Republican Governments have been 
hitherto generally engaged in wars, and France as yet 
feems difpofed to follow their example, I cannot fee any 
reafon why that ftiould be the cafe. 1 fhould rather expc£l, 
tliat under their influence mankind would live as brothers. 
Far. The confiaut pradicc of Republics for fo 
many thoufand years, is enough, methinks, to fliew what 
we may expert from them ; particularly as the laft which 
has arifcn feems more turbulent and ambitious than all 
that went before,, notwitliftanding it far exceeds them if\ 
profeffions of peace and moderation. But, without rc- 
forting to faSs and experience, reafon isfufficient to con- • 
vince us, that Republican forms of Government am(t 
ever be unfavourable to tranquillity. We have already 
feen that States 'fo governed are internally expofed to 
the influence of the moft violent and diforderiy 
pa£ons-7-what rcafon, theii, is there to iniiagine that 

they 

L);.i....jbv Google' 



I '3 ] 
they fiiDuld manifeft a pacific difpofition in liieir ftrttg* 
concerns ? Is it likely that a people who are wolves and 
tygers towards one "another, ihould be lambs towards the 
reft of the world ? Iti» far from bring thc'intereft of 
their leaders to exterminate or difcouragea warlike dilpo- 
jition. War is one of their gftnd rcfources for exciting 
thofe paffions on which they chiefly depend for attainii^ 
their wifhes.— It affords a better opportunity than anj 
other fituation for thofe fpccious profefGons of patriottlh^ 
which, in popular Governments, arc the furcft ftept to 
poptilarity. It generally fuits one party or another. — -It 
is, as occafion fenTs, either a road to power for thofe who 
feek it, or a mode of preferving it when acquired. Foe 
in a ftate of lengthened cahn, nothing is fo£clde as the 
multitude in their attachments. To crown all, a Re- 
public not only contains within itfelf, and that in an un- 
equalled degree, all the fourccs from whence wars ori^' 
nate, but the people, actuated by wliat they conceive to 
be patriotifm, entertain a violent hatred and antipathy 
to their adverfaries : carelef? of their own blood and- 
treafure, regardlefs of the miferles they may bring on 
themfelves or their pofterity, they fecm to think it the 
higheft virtue to rifk their own deftru£tion in an en- 
deavour to extirpate their foes ; and if it had not been 
for Monarchy, the world would have been unacquainted 
with that mild fpirit of gallantry, honour, and urbanity, 
with which military operations are generally conduftcdj 
which fmooths the rugged face of war, and foftens its 
horrors. 

Sas. My heart tells me you are right} and I thank vsxf 
ftars that I belong to a Royal Navy, where every one 
Icnows, that to pleafe his King he mail be humane as 
veil as brave. Look-ye, I have been in many an eng;^;e* 
ment— J hflvq always fcen thcBritifh flag invincible — and 

I hope 



t »4 J 

7 hope I have always done' my duty — but no TiAory ever 
gave me more pleaAirc than I feel in remembering, that 
I lent a band to the gallant Curti^ and his brave comrades 
before Gibraltar, in faving our conquered foes from the 
waTCS, while the floating batteries were burfling about our- 
«Brs, as if hell had broke loofc. 

Far. Then, indeed, did EngJand acquire laurels which 
win never iitde. Then was the real character of Eoglifll* 
ncn, fi|^ting for dieir King and their coontry, exhibited 
in it> gcainiae colours ; wlicn the fplondoor of ViBLory. 
Was heigbtoied by the nobleft exertion* of benevolence ;. 
and bravery in the moment of fuoccfs foigot its triumph, 
and courted freOi perils at the call of homani^. 

' Men. Think not that I am infen&bletothenoblenefk 
•f fuch an afiion, «r that^ as f n Engtifhman,-! do not 
ftel myfelf honoured by it. I am alio ready to own 
tiiat 1 was- deceived in thinking that a Republican 
Government is iavourable to tranquillity, either internai 
or external. Still, boweverv I cannot bear the idea that 
a nation Ihould be involved in war at the pleafureof.A 
fiaglc individuah 

Far, That idea is as odiom to mo as it can be to 
yoarfelf. But there ii no room for fuch an a^nebenfioa 
in diis country, where,, though the power of declaring 
ilrar, and of making peace, is properly vefted in the 
Crown, as the Executive Branch of Government^ yet 
the necellary fuppliet fc« carrying on a war cannot' be 
obtained without the expreft grant of the Commons for 
that purpofc. Eefidcs which, the fair, open, and proper 
influence at the people at large is fuch, that iinlefs they 
enter heartily into a war, it can never be carricdon with 
that fpirit and vigour which are necellary toitsfaccefs-^ 
*nd we have even feen, in a \iAt inftkncft, that Admini- 
-, ^ratica hat found It expedient to ^andott fpich plana a^ 

, in 

L);.l..=.JbvGOOgle 



its anxiety for tbe permanent velfin'e -of the conotrf 
had indaced it to fonn, becaufe, by fome means op 
other, they were not fufficieatly countenaoced by thfe 
public opinion to enfure their energy and effeA, ini 
cafe, u was polHbIc, they had terminated in hoftilities^ 
It fliould alfo be lemembered, that the Crown can only< 
ad. by the agency of Miniftcrs, and with the ^ftance 
of Councils which the ConiUtntion - ha^ providod ^ 
an of whom ai«;:fuhjeSed to a complete refponfibility 
for Acir meafures ; and while honeft and able men are 
liiie in all events to have credit for their, well-meant 
and judicious exertions, and to acquire the greateft of all 
tcwards-, thcfratef^l applaufc ahd eftceni of their country^ 
Minifters of every defcriptien know that they arc refpon- 
fible to the great tribunal of the Public. Nor is this all.; 
mcafufts do not wait for their eSeda to ondcrgo a ftrt£k - 
aodfevcre farutiny — they arecontinualIyfubjeA.not only 
to the unprejudiced difcafiion of the People at large, but 
alfo to the prying eye and keen inveftigation of an able 
Party, infcparable from a free country. This Party, 
which we knpw by the name of Oppolition, is perpetually - 
aiming to difplace Minifters, hoping for an opportunity' 
of ferving the country intheirlituations i it is thcrefbrii 
for its own fake, c^r on tli? watch to dete£t and cxpo^ 
their errors ;andof couri^ it tends, by infpinng themwith. 
caution, to. render itfclf ufefiil to the Nation. And 
notwithftanding the fceming alperity with which this 
party is ufed to attack the condud of Adminiftrationy 
the Oppojition lias lately fliewo, that when the fafety of 
the country is at ilake, it will lend its aOillance to' 
Government in relifling the common danger : — I fpeak 
with an exception of only a few individuals, eminent 
indeed, for their abilities, w&i obftioately perlift 'i% 
oppofinf 



r »' ] 

appsfing mtefsfea which the united voice of Ha whole 
ttMioatbclarotto bo indirpenfablc to the public {ccnrity. 

Sar. I trufi fuch perfoDs ftre very few indeed.' Rot 'etn, 
tbey are w4rfa than rats a fhip-brard, which, whatever 
mifii^fthcj do, will not fink the vcdel b^- gnawing boles.. 
abrougfa.tbc bottom. 

Man. £ttt granting that Monarch^r i* the beC fortn of 
Gove^Dincnt,whiah 1 begin to think is the cafe, can it be 
jdenipd' that the idea of Hsreditary Monarchy is founded In 
abfurdttr > Tlioft who iUl oKces fltould be jclcaed fbt 
dwif qualification!; which cannot be thecale when birth 
govons the foccelEon. 

far. There arc few points on wljich mutkind are fo 
generally agreed as in a preference of Hereditary to ElcAive 
Monarchy. Nothing ie fo caloulated to be an objefl of 
eager competition at a Crown ; nor is there any claim to 
Sovereignty in which mankind can be brought toacquiefce, 
without envy and without contention, but that which 
j) founded upon birth, and recognized, accordi'ng to 
cftabliOied rules, by long ufage and general , confent- 
And ai a conteft upon a matter of fuch magnitude and 
wiivcrfal concern cannQt take place without producing 
Jthe greatcft public misfortuties, it is a peculiar happitieiV 
for a country to poflefs fuch a fource of unanimity and 
geuefal concurrence as arifts from a clear and undifputej 
title to die Crown. The hiftoryof this countrv difplayrf 
in a ftriking manner, dSring the Civil Wars between the 
Hoofes of York and Lancafler, the horrors refultkig front 
4ven a difputed herttiiiar-y claim. But in an EUBivt 
Monarchy fuch horrors moft recur upon every vacancy. 
Bcfidcs, an cteded Monarch has only a iife-imereft in thff 
Oown, and will, of courfe, be indifferent in what fiatef 
^ IS tranfmitred to his fucceffor ; but the hereditary 
Monarch is iirduced by tlic tics of bk>od to preferVe it»' 
coiifequcnctf 



t 2? J 

confeqnence and dignity, that his defc«iidant ttaif recciw 
it with undlminilhed fplcndour. The firft will alfo bp 
apt to remember with gratitude the iervJccs of thofe wh» 
fupported his claim, and to refeiit the oppofition of ochen ; 
but the Hereditary Prince has no fuch motives for parti^ 
diftin£tioa : he ftands in the fame relation to all ; andthe 
certainty of his title is a fource of union, and coiifequcntlf 
of ftrength and happinefs, to his people. In ftiort, tb? 
ioconvenicncies to wliich Hereditary Monarchy is expoJe^ 
are cafual, and may never happen.— The chance oftbem is 
abundantly overbalanced by the certain advantages of 
order and tranquillity. Moll of them may be provided 
againll ; and if any Ihould occur, they muft' be very 
limited in their eifefls under fuch a Government as ourSf 
where the powers of the Crown arc fo blended with tlw 
other powers eftabfiflied by the Conftitution, But the 
cyils of Elective Monarchy are fure and unavoidable, an4 
cannot be guarded againfl by any precautions Qf wifdom 
or forefiglit. 

Man. In ah Elcflivc Monarchy, however, as the people 
chufe whom tliey picafe, they may always fix upon thf 
moft worthy — But where the title is hereditary, thay muft 
take what Nature happens to give them. \ 

Far. The chance which Nature affords of bcftowing- a 
good Kine is beyond alt coinparifon better than thtf 
which (in fuch a cafe} dc;- ;iJs upon elcAion. Bdides, 
Nature ismfliftedin Hereditary Monarchy by a preparatory 
education, by a nice hereditary fenfe of honour, which 
none but the moft depraved could vanquilh.and by a kind 
of natural and family attachment to the people. But 
upon an elc£tion to fo high an office, there is no room to 
txpefl that merit will have the leaft influence upon the 
choice. The candidates w'lil be governed by ambition, 
and the ele£lor% h^ theirpaiHons or tlieir pcrfooal intereftf . 

' Tl»« 



t s8 ] 

The refpcflive claims, inftead of being (as you fuppole/ 
rdmcd to the calm uiibialled f'^nft of the people ac 
(urge, wilt be fupported by hypocrify, artifice, cabalj 
and by all the various means which unprincipled cran 
can fuggcft ; force or fraud will decide the conteft j 
and anarchy, bloodlhed, and civil war, ^ill be its certain 
attendants. The competitor who poJieiles in the greateiS 
degree thofe qualities which would be moft pernicious on 
tile Throne will have greatly the adVantiige- In a ^urfuit 
of fuch magnitude, all kind of ailiflancc will be gratefully- 
accepted, and the moftabandonedandprofligatecharaAers, 
men who ftick at nothing to obtain their ends, will.be 
Micouraged to lend their aid ; and, to crown all, it may 
beconJidcredasacerCajnty, that t[ie Monarch thus chofeiv 
will be a tyrant, or elfe a tool to the party which had 
occafion for him, and fet him up to ferve their own 
|iu,rporcs. But during this time how will the unhappy 
^country be torn and convulfed— its induftry interrupted 
—its agriculture, maiiufaftL'rcs, and commerce, neg- 
hQed — its tranquility facrificed — its inhabitants ^itated^ 
iKvided, and ii]flamed--and the attention and pajGoo^ - 
of all engaged in one fubjcA of univerfal animofity 
aflj contention. Nay, even the event of an elc£tioii 
will not, probably, be the" period of thcfe difaftcrs.i 
The unfuccefsful party may be expected to lie in wait fof 
Opportunities to difpute the validity of fuch an ele&ioR, 
and tlie progrcfs of a reign may be cxpefled to be as 
tnibalent as its origin. At befl, the Sovereign will reign- 
over 3 divided people ; and to prefcrve his dominion 
fb nctjiiired, he muft exert powers that afe incompatible' 
with a free State. Btit how i, the mind relieved in turning 
ftom fuch fccnts to that of a calm atid tranquil 
acceflioii, where the Monarch fucceeds to a clear un- 
dilputed title, recognized by "cftabl-iflied la* and by the-* 



t 29 ] • 
ymivcrfal acclamations ofa whole people, and fubjed neitbtr 
to jealoufjr nor contention. And furcly this nation 
)U3 the mofi fubHanttal rcafon to be attached to tb« 
hereditary fyftem, lince we are actually indebted to it for ■ 
' Sovereign who defervcs and pofleHes in To eminent ^ degreo 
the affeftions of his fubje£ts ; a Sovereign who, while ha 
JH revered as the King, is adored as the Father, of hit 
people. And when, in the courfe of time, the mtion 
&all iuftain that midbrtune to which, from the condition 
of humanity, jt is expofed, the excellentheart, the amiable 
and manly qualities of the Heir Apparent, which cvcnhow 
^ine throagh the effervcfceiice of youib (and which, 
1 predi£t, arc defiined hereafter to blefs this country), 
irtU afford as much confolation as fo grievous acalamity 
can admit of. 

Sai, 1 hope th^ lofs yon mention is far diftaat. I'm 
fure whenever it happens tliere will not be a dry eye ,in 
th^ Navy. . 

^ar. Theb^yalty of the Nayy is Well known -, and it b 
but juffice to fay the fame of the Army, every brava 
(oldier of which ferves hisMajefty witli zeal, fidelity, an4 
affection. 

Afan. And I declare, that no man fhall fing ^* Gotf 
'* fave the King" with more zeal than myfelf, 
^ had been prejudiced againft Monarchy , in genetal ;" 
' fnd I now f^e my error in that refpefl. But 1 am fare 
that nothing could haVe made me violate my duty to fo 
good a King. There are ftill, however, fome fubjeft* 
on which I have difficulties remaining ; particularly 
' cfpefting a bqdy of NoblcE, ^nd tlie a^u%l Hate of thv 
tleprefentation. 

Far, You (ball ever find me ready to liften to all yonr 

^iiEcultics. The Conftitution of this country will .nofl 

Dolr bear th« Itr|Cte0 iaveftigation, but the more it js 

examiaai. 



t 3° 1 
tmroiiicd, and uie better it is nnderflooi], the more it will 
be admired. No pains been bave fpared, b^ fairehood 
and mifreprclentation, to prejudice it in die minds of the 
people i and furely neither patience nor zeal fiiould be 
wanUng to repel foch mifchievous attempts, and to 
withdraw the veil of deception which has been fo indttf- 
ttioufly ipread. Sut it now grows Late, and wc will 
poftpone any further convcrfatton to a future meeting. 

Sai. 1 have liftcncd to you with pleafurc, and ihooM 
lilcc nugbtily tomcetyou again : but though that cannot 
be, I am glad to find honeft Tom here on the right tack, 
fodlikely to get into agoodcoude. Atfirft he feemed to 
be carried orer rocks and flats and qoickfands, bat you 
have towed him into good fteerage, and I'll lay my life he 
ibon comes to anchor in a fafe riding. 

Far^ Bat what arc you going to do wiU\ yonrfclf, ritac 
you can't give us another meeting } 

Sai. I hear that my King and Country want my fervices ; 
snd when that is the -cafe, they fhall never find tne 
backward in obeying their call. I fhalU therefore, fet off 
early to-morrow morning for Spithead, to enter as a vo- 
lunteer aboard the Fleet. 

Far. I am glad to hear you fay fo, and Aoft heartily 
wi{h you fucccfs againft the enemies of Great Britain. 

Sai. Succefs ! who the devil doubts it f The Britiih 
flag was never hoifted in a better caufe ; and it fliall go 
hard but -Britiih tars will keep up its credit. As to 
myfelf, 1 never longed fo much in my life to give our 
old foes a drubbing. 

/ar. They never deferved it fo much. It is not now an 
ifland, a colony, or a commercial advantage merely that they 
^want to deprive us of — but they have the infolence tq 
Jhreateneven thcfreedom and independence of the country 
ttJelf. In return for our moderation jn prcferving 
aftrift 



[ 3' ] 

a finA neutrality during all tbeir troubles an<] djftrcflet 
for four years, they fend their agents among us to 
excite an infurrcftioni and to propagate their own 
Jcvelling and diabolical principles. They receive with 
open arms, in their riotous AlTcmbly, every Englifhmaa 
who is bafe enough to be a traitor to his Ki ng and Country. 
They openly encourage and correspond with Socictio 
here formed for the puipofe of overthrowing the Confti- 
tution ; and they have even had the audacity to appeal 
to the Eritifli People againll the lawful Government. 

Sai, Their appeal fhall be foon anfwercd by thccannon't 
mouth. — Zounds I I'll fct off tb -night. 

Man. The fooner the better ; and whenever you go 
my bcft tvifhei will attend you. I /eel a true Brittlh 
heart beat in my bofom ; and no one will have more 



fpS EKS or TH£ THIRD DJAtOQpZ. 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



i);".nvC,OOijlc' 



A 

PROTEST 



A G A I » S T 



t. PAINE's *^ Rights of Man :* 

Ai>DRESSEI> TO THE 

MEMBERS 

P A 

BOOK S C I ETT, 

IN COK9t<]UEKCE OP THB 

TOTE OF THEIR COMMITTEE FOR INCLUDINC 

THE ABOVE WORK IN A LIST OP NEW 

PUBLICATIONS RESOLVED TO BB 

PURCHASED FOR THE USE OF 

THE SOCIETY. 



ND KUIN ARE Mr GAIW." HILTOIC 



THE FOURTH EDITION, 

IVITH CORRkCTIONS AND ADDITIONS. 

LONDON: 

PRINTED FOR. T. LOKOMAN, IN PATERN'OSTER-ROW 
C. NICOL, BOOKSELLEB. TO HIS MAJESTY, PALL- 
MALLj ACfDW. RICHARDSON, ROYAL-EXCHANGE. 
M,DCC,XCII. ^ 

^ ^ J ^W 



U;.t.z=dbv Google 



ADVERTISEMENT. 



IN a populoifs Village in thi? Kingdom .a 
conlidecable number of the Inhabitants hav« 
formed themfelves into a book so,ci ety, whereof 
a Committee is annually chofen for the purpofe 
of fele&ing fuch Books as they may think pro- 
per to be circulated among the Society at large. 
At a Meeting of this Committee one of the Mem- 
bers thereof propofed the publication entitled 
** Rights of Man." Another Member refilled 
ftrcnuoufly the choice of a Book, which he confi- 
dered as an infidious addrefs, under a fiditious 
and enfoaring title^ to weak heads an^ to bad 
hearts ; as replete with indecency and fcurrility, 
and as dictated by a defire of involving a free 
and happy Country in confufion and ruin. 
Being, however, unfuccefsful in his oppofition, 
jip4 being alfo unwilling that the Society Ihould 
4 fup* 



,.j by Google 



iv ADVERTISEMENT, 

fuppofa him to have concurred in fubmittyig 
fuch a Book to their perufa), be felt it duQ 
to himfclf to FROTEST againft the Vote "which 
he had in vain endeavoured to prevent, and 
to affign ax large the reafops on which fiich 
Protest was founded. Thefe reafons, deduced 
from the obvious defign and tendency oi the 
work in queftion, are detailed in the following; 
ihcets, and appear in their original and genuine 
formofjinAddrefs to the Society. And he flat- 
ters himfeW", that his conduft on this occafion 
■will be found to contain an ufefiil moral, de- 
ferving the attehtion of tho(e, who in fimilar 
fituati(?n3, and vith fimtkr fentiments and dK- 
pofitions, fuffer their regard for the pubRc welfdrt 
to be furprifed into inaBivi^ and JUpmenefs^ orvaitt 
quijhed by a dread ef appearing Jingtdax . 

\t is but juftice to add, that nothing is further 
fraMn the defign of the W«ter of this Protest 
than to infmuatc, that th6 reft of theCommittee 
were induced to vote for the Book in queftaori 
from atiy approbation of its contents. He knows, 
that they held the do£trin?s and the deiigns of 
Mr. Paine in abhorrence; but zealoufly, nay 
feudlibly attached ?q the principle of free 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



^ifcufEon, and fearful of evep jppearittg hoftile 
M theexercUeof.a rigjil fo .effeijtial to the ex.- 
-ifteuce of foidalL^hefty,|hey fiiffered rhemfelves 
(indeed iocautioufly, but. with _^ebeft inten.- 
-tioas) to . prgiuote. ,th,e circulation of a work 
-ffl(liif:ii endeavofl^s j:o convert the invaluable pri- 
vilege of A free Prels iijto an inftruroent of de- 
ftruftion -to the Staie. 

In the Advertifement to the' Second Part of 
** The Rights of Man," phe vain Author makes 
his boaft of the extenfive and numerous diftri- 
bution of the copies of the FJrft Part, and he 
feems lo infer from thence that the fenfe of the 
Publick is in his favour. How erroneous is fiich 
an inference \ A book fo remarkably diftiij- 
guilhed for wild extravagance, confummate au- 
dacity, and daring infolence, as *' The Rights of 
*' Man," could not fail to engage a certsiin de- 
-gree of public attention, upon the fame prin- 
ciple that the exhibition of a monArous animal 
^odudiion will excite jiotice and attraift gazeri 
,in proportion to the hideous deformity of the 
ipeiftacle. But thcfe who judge of the merit of 
a book from its progrefs into notoriety, will fre- 
quently find tKcmfelves miftaken. Indeed it i» 
a z not 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



V ADVERTISEMENT. 

not unufual for the merti: and the circulation t« 
be in an inycrfe proportion to each other. The 
*' Paradise Lost'* rofc by very flow degrees 
into notice ; but publications that inflame the 
paflions, the lafciyious account of a Trial for 
Crim. Con. or an incendiary produftion exciting 
to publick diforder, feldom fail to throng 
the Bookfellcr's fliop with eager enquirers. At 
Jength, however, diftributive Juftice is fure^ to 
prevail. The work of Merit, rifing by degrees 
into due cftimaiion, furvivcs the age in which it 
firft appears, and conveys the author's fame to the 
lateft pofterity ; while the coarfe, malignant, and 
inflammatory ftuff", defpifed from the firft by 
the wife and good, finks muchmore rapidly into 
oblivion ; which, with regard to fuch produc- 
tions, is happily ' 

<' A boorn from which no traveller returns." 

Mr. pAiSE, however, moft ungratefully omits 
to acknowledge the patronage of thofe bene- 
irblent coadjutors in the fame caufe, whofc libe- 
rality and exertions have chiefly contributed to 
the boafted multiplication of his copies, and 
who, by generous and prelEng donations, have 
procured the acceptance thereof by numbers 
whcj 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



ADVERTISEMENT; vii 

who tould never have been pcrfuadcd to make 
the acquifition on aiiy other terms. Unfortu- 
nately, this gratuitous mOde of diftiibution is apt 
to fuggcft an idea, that what is fo difpenfed is of 
Very inCgnificant value (like the benedi<£):ion in 
the Fable, which was beftowed after the fmalleft 
pecuniaiy donation had been withheld) ; and 
fuch an idea is a prodigious check to the pe- 
rufal of a book fo acquired : the generous cir- 
culation therefore of the far greater part of our 
Author's copies is probably of immediate conve- 
nience in divers retail branches of trade. But 
although for thefe reafons the diftfibution of 
Mr. Paine*s writings be a very fallacious crite- 
rion of th6 number of his readers, one thing 
IS clear, that be that number great or fipall, the 
generality of them .would be highly gratified 
by feeing his pamphlets lightediato proper notice, 
ilnd the Author himfelf elevated to a ftation of 
diftinguiflied eminence, in the midft of exulting 
multitudes. 

There feems to be but Very little occafion to 

travel out of the " Rights of Man " in order to 

■ afcertain die real motives of the Auth<W { *hd an 

. Englifliman mull have a wonderful jwopenfity to 

Confound his friends and his foes, who does not 

a 3 difcover 

L);.l..=.JbvGOOgk 



viii ADVERTISEMENT, ' 

difcover in that cork a ftcady and deliberate pfcUt 
to fap and undeFmine the.happinefs and proCpc- 
rity of Great BVitain. Bat in order to be tho- 
roughly acquaiiited with a man's fentiments and 
views,- it is ufeful to trace his langnage and hi» 
eonduft through diflercne periods, and to rfender 
him thereby explanatory of himfelf. If ^ve ap- 
ply this i^le to Mr. Painb, it will appear, that 
he itas not only been long ad:uated by^but chat be 
formerly gloried in avowing, an implacable ani- 
AK^ty and A rooted hatred to thrs country ; and * 
that Bot rfterely to its Government but to its 
interefiij its welfatUy its honour, its natmat 
tharaBer, its commercial and naval greatmfs. 
It is well known, that, born a Britiflj fubjedt, 
ijut deftitute of thofe qualities which are 
calculated toanraift efleem and command fuccefs 
in this country,, he conveyed himfelf, without the 
afliftance of legal interpofition, to- America, 
about the commencement of our difpuie wirh 
the Colonies. The chara&er he took with him 
was not calculated to advance him ^jove a very 
low ftarion, in which he firft appeared; but'chc' 
marked malevolence he teftifiedagajflft hisoa- 
. tivc knd could not fail to be grateful to his new 
coTlneftions, who were then in that fituaUot*- 
which renders, the Tieafon acceptable, evea 
thougji 
,.,..„„ Cogic 



ADVERT I S E M E JJ T. 1* 

though the Traitor be deteftcd. In violation 
of his natural' allegiance, he ftrained every; 
nerve to {ncreafe the animofity then fubfifting 
between the Mother- country and her Colonies, 
arid to prevent any accomrnodation from taking 
place ; his pen was conftantly employed during 
the war in widening the breach which all good ■ 
Engliftimen*fincerely deplored, and in pro" 
moting that final feparatton between England 
and America, which was then confidered as an 
event the moft fatal that could poffibly happen 
"to the former Cauhtry *. Had Experience rea- 
lized 

• By a Pamphlet enutled Couuon Ssnse, and by in. 
otxafiOD^ P^pc ^^ '^'"' Ckiiis, he laboorcd dnring tbe 
xna xa ha the fiame of difcord. and-tb indifpofe the Americati*- 
froni again recognizing EngtifluQcn as bFethren i aad in a Letter 
to the Abbe Riyna), written after the Independence of Amc 
rica had been acknowledged, he ftiil difplayed the lame deep-- 
Tooted and ioTineible enmity to Great Britain, A few ex- 
traa> frwn thtfe writings will ferve materially to explam Us- ■ 
Biotives in wilhiog fo anxioufly to meddle with our concern^ 
.— rin hii CoMUON St HIE he (ayi, " Iifen of paffive temper* 
•' look femewhat lightly over the ofFencea of Britain, AiB 
*' hoping for the beft ; and are apt to call out, Come, come, 
/* we ffaall be friends again for all this. But let as Ccaratw 
.** tbe paflioni and feelings of mankind ; bring the do£)rine «f 
■■• Beconciiiation to the touchltone of nature, and then tell me, 
."f whether yoa can hereaiter lore, honour, and bithfully fenre 
*' the power that hath carried fire andfword intoyoar bndf 
vBaje 33. 

. . **'JV 



ri ADVEfe*riSEMENri 

Hzcd thisapprehenfion, — ^hadthe lofsof Amerki 

been attended with ruin to the greacnefs and 

profpcritjr 

- •' TobltcoffiiendlhipwiththoreiDwhOinoarreafonferlM^ 
■' OS to have iahh, and our affefiions, wounded through aihon' 
" fand pores, initruft us to detell, is mftdnefs and folly .-^Th« 
" laftcordis now broken, ihc people of England are prefent^ 
" ing addreffes againft Us. There are injuriei which naturri 
*• cannot forgive; (be would ceafe to be ifttijrc if .flic did. 
•' Aa well can the lover forgive the ravilhcr of hi» miflrefs, as 
" the Continent of America forgive THE MURtJERERS df 
** BRITAIN. The Almighty hath implanted In tu thefe mi^ 
■' extinguidiubtq feeFiagi to good and wife purpofcE." Page 52. 

So feveral years after, in his " Letter to the Abbe Raynalj^ 
lie (hews that the fime enmity to Great Britain lUIl rankled 
in his breaft; and that it was founded, not in any fcnfe of in- 
jury; bat in a deteftation of the qualities of the Englifli peo* 
pie. Thai he fays, " If we talce a. review of what part 
" Britun ha< a£ted, we Ihall lind every thing which ought m 
** make a nation blafli; the moll vnlgar abufe accompanied 
" by thatfpecies of haughtlnefi -wbitt diftitigmfits thi htro of 
" » mob ft-em thi charaSer cf a gtntkmen. It was equally from ] 
■■ her manners as from her injuliice that flie loll her colonies^ 
Page 8. 

So after expatiadng upon " that greatnefs of charaSer, and 
■f tjiai fopeiioricy of heart which had marked the cendoA df 
" France in her conquefli," upon " the rival eaineoce of thft 
•' confederates, and ihe lenity of America," he fays, '■ It ii 
" England only who has been influent and cruel." — And ajati)^ 
" A imnd habituated to meannefs and injuliice commits iheib 
" without refleaion." Page 5Z— And again, " From Htrflanl 
" ilietBricain)e:xpeaeddopiici[yandfBbraiffion,andthitmiftate 

liroM 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



ADVERTISEMENT. M 

Iprofpcrity of England,— had the Sun of BrJtaitl's 
Glory then indeed " fet for ever," — we ftioyl^ 
probably have feen no roorp pf Mr. Thoma? 
I*AipE, except he had paid us a curfory vifit tt> 
infult our.,difl;refs, and to glut liis njalice with 
a view of bur calamity ; ajid finding us fuffi- 
ciently'miferable, his faiisfaaion had been com- 
plete, and'ihe " Rights of Man" would have 
" been unknown for ever, unlefs, in purfuit of the 
only repofe congenial to his difpofition, the 
Author had accommodated that work to difturb 
the felicity of fome happier clime, or to leffen, - 
jfpoflible, the general fum of'huraan happinefs. 

f' arofe from ber having afled in a number of inltances duniig 
" the prefent waiin the fame charafter herfelf. To be allied 
" lo> or connefled with Britain, feems to be an unfafe and 
f impoUcicfituation.— Make Holland and Amoricaher own al- 
f lies, and Ihe will infult and plunder them." Page ^^ — " A to- 
1' talreformationiswantedinEngbnd. She wants an expanded 
f mind." Page 56. — " Irraay be dearly feen, that the ftrength 
"■of France hasneverj'et been cried on a navy ; and that SHE 
f IS ABLE' TO BE AS SUPERIOR TO ENGL AND IN 
" THE EXTENT OF A NAVY, AS SHE IS IN THE 
f EXTEF^T OF HER REVENUES AND HER POPU- 
■ ■- LATION; andEnglandmaylamcnttheday,when by.her 
*' infoleiice and injaftice Ihe provoked in France a maritime 

;• difpofition." Page 64.— He then throws out fome hints 

for the demolition of the Britiih Navy. 

: ■ But 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



-TUl ADVERTISEMENT. 

But the unexpefted, che unexampled, the daiiqr- 
iacrcafing profperity erf Great-Brisaio, the har- 
mony, the loyalty, and the happinefs <rf its iij- 
habitants, fiimifhed a difappomtment too feverc 
to be endured with any degree of cwnpofure. 
Thefe were fcenes which harrowed up the foul 
of the envious and malignant Fiend, who, like 
bis pioggaitor, bent his courfe to this Paradifc 
of the ^lobe, eager to deftroy that felicity 
whi(:h it''}vas not in bis nature either to partake 
pf or endure. 

If is difficulty under any circumftances, to 
find pity for thofe, whofe charaftcr, condu6l, 
and defigns, merit only execration ; and yet 
one can hardly refufe to conjmiferate the ex- 
■treme feverity of their difappointment, who 
built their hopes upon the fuccefs of thefe 66li- 
ijous " Rights of Man" in this country. That 
fuccefs has been exaftly fuch as was merited, 
ftnd as might reafonably have been expefted. 
Indignation at the defign, deteftation of the 
Author's fharafter, and contempt for his per- 
formance, conftitute the public fentiment upon 
this occafion. — And at length Justicte, with 
flow but fteady pace, feems advancing to gratify 

the 



L)^.l.i=.J by Google 



AD V ERT liE MENT. kUi 

the vuitveiial'wiAi, by visdjcating the infutcoi 
dignwy^of ^e country. 

The gQo4 fenfe of the Englith People is ho 
more to be deluded by artifice than their Tigoiir 
is to be vanquifhed by force. They are not to be 
perfuaded to part with the fubftance for the 
fliadow. They can diftinguifh between the fin- 
cere and honeft advice of rational friends, anil 
th« wily enfnaring addreffes of infidious foes. 
They can deleft treachery, and defeat malice. 
They are not fo fliort-fighted as to believe, that 
in 1792 the man would counfel them to their - 
good, who a few years before was labouring at 
(heir deftrudtjon. And fenfible that under the 
friendly influence of their molt excellent Con- 
ilitution, and of the happieft poffible fonn of 
Government, they not only enjoy the greateft 
degree of perfonal freedom, as well as of per-, 
fonal fccurity, that can exift in fociety, but have 
alforifen, within the fliort fpace of eight years^ 
from penury to affluence, and from deep and ac- 
cumulated diftrefs to brilliant and ury)recedent-r 
ed profperity ; rejoiced alfo that the fruits of 
thefe great and manifold advantages have already 
tiegui> to appear io an allcviatioa of their bur-, 
theps. 



■pgiw^dbv Google 



sir ADVERTISEME,NT. 

ibens, they are not to b?- induced to flop the 
career of their greatnefs, and .to jeplungc 
into a (late of confufion and calamity worle 
jcven than that froai which they have fo happily 
emerged]. 



PROTEST 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



PROTEST 

A O A I K 3 T 

P A I N E's " Rights of Man : 

ADDRESSED TO THE 

ME M B E R S 

OF A 

BOOK SOCIETY. 



HAVING been unfuccefsful in my endeavours, as a 
Member of your Committee, to prevent the intro- 
duftion of Mr. Paine's *' Rights of Man" into the Society, 
I confider it as due to myfelf, as well as a proper mark of 
tcfpetS to the Society at large, thus to enter my Proteft 
ag^nft the Vote by which it was refolved to prefent that 
book to your infpeflion. My wi(h is, to obviate the 
fuppotltion tliat I concurred in fuch a refolution; but 
left I fliould be thought to objcft. on trivial grounds* I 
feet it incumbent upon me to aHign at large the rcafons 
upon which my Pretei): is founded. 

In the firfl place, I cannot reconcile it to my Sum feelings 
to contribute in any degree to the circulation of a wotIc, 
the palpable defign of which js to difturb the tranquillity 
and invade the happinefs of the State ; and which ap- 
pears to be folely intended to excite difalFe^on towards 
Government, to ftimulate the people to fedition and re- 
bellion, and to involve this fttt and happy country in 
fcenes' of confuHon and anarchy. 

B I tHOU^S 

■ U;.t.z=dbv Google 



( 2 ) 

1 SHOULD atfo confider myfplf as guilty of an infiilt 
upon your feelings, were I to put into yoor hands a work 
containing a moft indecent and malignant atUck wpon 
that CoNSTiTOTioN which is defervedly your pride and 
boaft as Britons, and which preferves invicdate your rights 
and privileges as free citizens; a Conflitution obtained 
by the glorious ftruggles of your anceftors — founded upon 
experience — matured by time — which has ftood the tcft of 
ages — the effcnce of which is focial liberty — the fcope of 
which is foetal happinefs ; — in Ihort, a Conflitution which 
you enjoy as your inefiimable birthright, which calls for 
your gratitude to its venerable founders, and which it is 
your bounden duty to tranfmit unimpaired to pofterity. 

If a book of which the tendency is generally admitteii 
to be immoral and diflbluCe, were propofed i^ your Society, 
every Member of it would fpurn at the idea of its being 
Submitted to your notice. And can any publication be in 
effect more grofsly or deftrudiively vicious and immo- 
ral, than one which tempts to a violation of the important 
duties of fubjc£ls— which tends to dillurb the public or- 
der — to weaken or dilFolve the bands which, by conneft- 
ing Government and People, keep Society tc^ether — to 
withdraw that refpeiS to the ruling powers which is prc- 
fcribed both by rcafon and religion — to diminifli the autho- 
rity of the laws, and thereby to remove the reftraints 
which arc neccflary to control the pa£ions of mankind— 
and finally, to facrifice domeftic tranquillity and national 
piofperity for inteftine commotions and civil difcord .' 

If a plan were pubtifhed for the purpofe of inftrufling 
and encouraging evil-difpofed perfons to fet fire to the ha- 
bitations of individuals, who would alHft in the propagation 

of 



( a ) 

^ To deteftaUe a. Icheme i Shall we hvaut then the at- 
tempts, ihall we pUronize or encourage the efforts of 
an incendiary, who aims at the conjuration of that noble 
and valuable edifice the common and comfortable dwelling 
of us all, while under its friendly and hofpltable roof w« 
participate with harmony and affection the tranfccndent 
enjoyments of a firmly-united and a well-regulated family! 

While, however, I decline to take a part in dtflemi- 
nating fedidon and treafon, I am a real friend to fair and 
candid difcuffion, which, inftead of being hoftile, muft 
always prove favourable to the Britifh Conftitution. But 
the difquifitions of Mr. Paine are by no means of this 
defcription. Under the maflc of difculHon, they really 
point to action, and that of the moft pernicious and cri- 
minal nature— they lead, not to any prafticable good, but 
to turbulence and general commotion. If they were to 
have their defired efFcft, the Conftitution would be anni- 
hilatedj our lives, our liberties, and our property, would 
be deprived of legal protcflion J Government would be 
overturned 3 and in vain might we look into the dark- 
fbme void of futurity to catch even a^int and dubious 
glimpfc of fecurity againft unbridled licentioufbefs and un- 
reftrained violence. 

It may be faid, perb^s, that if Mr. Paine's do£lrine» 
be not founded in reafon, their being prc^agated will but 
expofe them to refutation; but who would diftribute poi- 
fon for the lake of the antidote } Such doflrines, although 
fallacious and fophiftical in the extreme, nay, although ia 
a great meafurc they carry their own refutation along with 
them, may, neverthelels, among perfons of particular de- 
Icriptions, and on whom they are chiefly deiigned to ope- 
B 2 xate, 

L)^.l..=.J by Google 



( 4 ) 

rate, produce the moft mifcfiievous impreffimis. TlierftfC 
not, indeed, calculated to have this effed upon ftrong, 
experienced, and well-informed minds ; they are fhiined 
for the meridian of thofe underftandings which are un- 
accuflomed to weigh and to difcriminate ; and which are 
' ever ready, from indcdence, wealuiefs, or inexperience, to 
e &ich impreffions. 



These dilquilidons are alfo adapted to operate upon 
die reftlelTnefs inherent in man ; and they proceed upon 
the ungenerous principle, ^t human nature is a fertile 
Ibil for the cultivation of difcontent : but more efpecially 
do they feem* to be prompted by the bafe confideration, 
that it is eafy to infiife diflatisfadlion into the minds of 
thofe who occupy the lower ftations in Society, and that it 
requires but little addrefs or ingenuity to infpire fuch per- 
fons with difguft and envy, and to convince them that 
the gradation of rank, which is indifpenfable to order, 
and founded indeed in nature, is an infringement on their 
rights. Schemes of unattainable equality cannot fait to be 
grateful to thofe who have but a very fmall portion of the 
goods of fortune, who arc eafily led to believe that the 
difparity which is infeparable from the nature of So- 
ciety, is an evil and an injuftice to which they ought 
not to fubmit. Inflead of promoting contentment and 
cheerful induftry, fo beneficial to the individual and the 
community — inftead of pointing out the advantages which 
are peculiar to each Nation, and which prove, that not- 
withftanding an apparent inequality, the balance is polled 
■mth imparbal juftice — inftead of difplaying virtue as the 
only fource of real felicity, it is the objeft of the modern 
■* Rights of Man" to create teftlefsnefe and dilTatisfa^tion, 
and to perfuade mankind, diat they fuffer injuries which 

they 

D;.t.z=.JbvGOOglc 



( 5 ) 
they So not perceive, that they fudain hardOiips which 
they do not feel, that their comforts are vifionary and 
their happinefs mere delufion ; in fliort, thefe doftrines 
find men happy, prevail on them to believe that they are 
not lb, and in the end render them miferable. 

Such attemptsarc, indeed, notmore pernicious thauabfurd 

— ^not more deftrudiveof the general good, than unfriendly 
to the real interefts of thofe whofe welfere they artfully 
profefs to have in view: for, by endeavouring to remove 
a due fubordination, and to create contention between 
the feveral Orders of which Society is compofed, they 
tend to deftroy the harmony and co-operation of the 
f^ole, and to produce evils which would fall heaviefl 
on the loweft claffes, which have the feweft refources, and 
are unavoidably the moft dejiendant. It would be juft as ra- 
tiraaltoattemptto perfuade the Feet, that, confidering their 

' importance and utility, they ought not to fubmit to thofe 
offices which are afligned them — that it is a hardlhip and 
an injuftice for them to be obliged to wade through the 
dirt, and to bear the weight of the whole body — tiiat they 
are entitled to fome nobler capacity, fome more elevated 

' ftation — that having nerves as well as the Head (the pre ^ 
tended feat of. intelligence), their opinions ought to be 
taken, their will confulted, and themfelves admitted into 
the council ; and that they ought, in maintenance of their 
rights, to rebel againft the fubfifling inequality of arrange- ■ 
ment, and refufe to perform their accullomed works of 
drudgery. 

But abfurd as thefe doflrines really are, that abfurdity 

is, for the reafon I have mentioned, no fuiHcienc fecuritjr 

againft their progrefs. It is therefore rendering Society x 

B 3 fcrvicB 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



( « ) 

fcrvice to ietefi and cxpoCe their fellacy — to point out (he 
wjclceil intent from which they proceed, and the mif- 
chievous, nay ruinous conref]ucnces to which they tend. 
To do this, is to confult not merely the wel&re <^ the 
prelent age, but that aifo of pbfterity. For it is a fa- 
vourite objeft with the abettors of thefe delufivc fyftems 
of pretended rights, to poifon the tender minds of generous 
and unfufpe6iing youth— to take the judgment by furprife 
—to warp the reafon while it is m its progrefs towards 
maturity— and to imprint injurious impredions at a period 
when they are moft likely to be rendered indelible. By 
fuch means it is endeavoured to lay a foundation for diftur- 
bances in future generations, in cafe tile prefent age, 
under the influence of good education and good habits, 
fliould be Co fortunate as to defeat the machinations of 
Edition. 

But, in addition to all thefe confide rat ions, it is to be 
reifiembercd, that the doftrines 1 allude to are particularly 
intended to unite and calf into aSion the unprincipled and 
turbulent part of mankind, the common pells of Society, 
who are ever ready to fecond any attempts which lead to 
tumult and diforder. Defperate, ambitious, and malignant, 
their views are promoted, or their feelings gratified, by 
fcenes of riot and confufion, and they depend for their 
harveft upon the convulfions of kingdoms and empires. 
Men of this defcription diflike nothing fo much as the 
reftraintsof law and decorum. Their willies are thwarted 
by the controul ,of any Government which has vigour 
enough to proteifl chp good from tlie attacks of the bad, 
to repel the incurfions of violence and licentioufnels, and 
to keep Society together in a firm and compafl band of 
union. Such perfons, who from tlie nature of their dif- 
poAtions 

D3.t.z5.JbyC,OOt^lc 



( 7 ) 

pofitions and purfuiCs are abundantly more watchful and 
aflive than the friends of Order, are obliged to anybody 
who will furnifh them with a Oiadow of a pretext for 
raifmg a clamour againfl: imaginary defefls in any part of 
the exifting Government: they flock to a Declaration of 
abfurd, lifUtious, and Imprafticable Rights, as to a Mani- 
fefto of Rebellion or a Standard of Revolt — happy in an 
occafion to blow the flame which may catch all that is 
combuftible in a State— thrice happy to find a head, 
whether a Tyler, a Cade, or a Catiline, who may 
lead them to the attack, or give conCftence and eSe& 
to their confptracies. 

Thus, upon the whole, are the modern "Rights of 
" Man" intended to take advantage of all that is weak 
and of all that is wicked in Society ; of the failings and the 
vices, of the worft paflions and the bafeft propenfities of 
mankind : thus are they defigned to colleft into a focus 
the turbulent and the difaffeited : they tend to embitter 
the labourer's toil, and to infufe the poifon of difcontent 
into his invigorating draughts, which were wont to fup- 
port him cheerfully under his fatigues : and, adapted by 
their coarfe and fuperficial reafonings to minds entirely un- 
cultivated, which are unufed to the dcte^ion of ^lacy, 
and unable to trace caufes to efFefts, they form a catechifm 
of fedition and difloyalty for the lower orders of the people. 

These are the confiderations which have made me lb 
eagerly oppofe the circulation of a work which in fo many 
ways tends to produce the moft pernicious efFeifts. I ad- 
mit indeed that its impreffion is not likely to be general, 
becaufe, fortunately, it is not fo eafy a matter as thefe in- 
cendiaries vainly fuppofe, to induce a Natbn to part with 
B 4 fuW 

D;,„...ib,. Google 



( 8 ) 

fubflantial felicity and rational freedom : their nefarious 
attempts, however, keep Society in a Hats of ferment and 
agitation, give uneafinefs to the virtuous and well-dif- 
po^ed, and tend to weaicen the beneiicial energies of Go- 
vernment, Inftead, therefore, of being encouraged in any 
degree, they ought, by all polEble means, to be difcoun- 
tenanced by all real friends to their country; and if we 
cannot wholly prevent the mifchievous induftry with which 
fuch dcdtrines are prq)agated, we ought at leaft, on our 
part, to be equally diligent in endeavouring tocountera^its 

effefts. WHY SHOULD A GOOD CAUSE INSPIRE LESS VI- 
GOUR OR LESS ACTIVITY THAN A BAD ONE ? WHY 
SHOULD THE ADHERENTS OF THE CONSTITUTION BE 
LESS ZEALOUS THAN ITS FOES ? W«1Y SHOULD THE 
WELL-DISPOSED BE LESS VIGILANT, OR LESS ANI- 
MATED, THAN THOSE OF A CONTRARY DESCRIPTION? 
THE STRONGEST FORTRESS MUST FALL, IF THE GAR- 
RISON, SUPINELY DEPENDING UPON THE STRENGTH 
OF THE WALLS, NEGLECT TO REPEL THE ASSAILANTS. 

It ought not to fatisfy the minds of good citizens, to leave 
to Government the whole ta(k of preferving the public tran- 
quillity. It is on every account to be defired, that the extra-r 

ordinary interpofition of the public forceforthe maintenance 
of orderfhouldbe but feldom reforted to. Theneceffityof 
fuch interference would be generally prevented, if individuals 
were to exert themfelves within thefpherc of their influence, 
and endeavour to check caufes inftead of waiting forefFe^is} 
if they would overawe and difcourage the common dif- 
turbers of fociety by a marked deteftation of their charac- 
ters, and by a fteady and unremitting watchfulnefs of their 
meafures and t'efigns. The odium attached to vice 
furniflies perhaps a more general check to its progrefs 
(ban even the penalties of the law, 

T« 

n-i'-'ibyCoOglC- 



( 9 ) ' - 

To explain more particularly the general reafoning which 
J have already urged, we need only appeal fliortly to fome 
few paf&ges of Mr. Paine's work. 

Mr. Paine, in both the Firft and Second Parts of his 
Rights of Man, begins, very judicioully, with pre- 
paring the way for that fyftem of deftruflion which it is 
the objedl of both to introduce, The grand obftacles in 
the way of his defigns are laws and government : it 
was therefore very neceflary, as a preparatory ftep, t* 
weaken (hefe impediments, by withdrawing cw diminiihing 
as much as potBble the refped which mankind ufually 
polTefs for fuch inflitutions. Accordi^ly, in the com- ^ 
mencement of his Firft Part, our Author endeavours to 
eftablifh.asa fundamental principle, that the prefent age 
or generation is not at all bound by any a£t of precedii^ 
times, and that all lavi'S and inftitutions heretofore made , 
and eftabliflied are now deftitute of all binding authority. ^y 
This, it muft be owned, is no injudicious ftep in purfuit 
of his grand objeiEli for if he could' but get rid of the au- 
thority of all Ibcial regulations which have not been ac- 
tually introduced in the prefent day, very little would re- 
main to check the progrefs of his wiflies and undertakings. 
Such reafoning is, however, the moft abfurd and nonlen- 
fical that ever came from the pen of any writer. Man- 
kind is not really fufceptible of any fuch divifion as that of 
ages and generations. The tranfaiflions of the world, 
indeed, for the fake of convenience and hiftoricai precifion, 
arc claffed under certain periodical denominations of time ; 
but the race of men, like a ftream, is perpetually running 
off and perpetually fupplled afrefh ; its continuity is pre- 
ferved unbroken from year to year, and from century to 
century, Thcfc is no pointy line, or boundary, at which 

ow 

Dg'iw^dbv Google 



( lo ) 

niie generatton can be faid to tertniiute and another t» 
commence: at every moment fome are bcginnii^ the 
career of exlftence, while others arc going off the courTe, 
This uninterrupted chain of human exiflence preferves a 
corrcfpondent coime^ion in human affairs. Society is 
thus held conftantly together, and knows nothing, in its 
K^gregate capacity, of th;it mortality which is the attri- 
bute of ttie individuals who compofe it. Of cmirie the 
obligation ctf the /tfiifj by which Society is regidated, isne- 
ceilarily as uniform as the exiflence of Society itfelf : nei- 
ther the death of the L^^iAator nor of his contemporaries 
can diffolve or weaken their force. The Laws are not 
made to bind any particular fet of individuals, but the 
community at large, of whomfoever it may be compofed. 
We are born under fubje£tion to them, as well as undo- 
their 'proteflion. The Icgiflatjve authority exercifed a 
.hundred years ago is of precifely the fame force with re- 
gard to ourfelves as that exercifed yefterday i and the Laws 
made in our own time are in no fenfe more ccvnputfory 
than die fubfilling Laws enafted by our forefethers. The 
ktter ape even rendered more venerable by their antiquity. 
No Legiflature can indeed infringe upon the powers of a 
fubfequent one. There always exifts the fame right to 
repeal, as well as the fame, obligation to obey, till that 
right be properly exercifed. ■ Society is at every period of 
time polTelTed of the fame powers, and its right to annul 
a law of the laft year, or of the laft century, ftands exadlly 
upon the fame ground. Thus while the continued obli- 
gation of Laws, till regularly repealed by the fupretne 
authority, is necelTary to the order, the harmony, and in- 
deed the exiflence of a State ; the right exifting equally 
at all times to abrogate and to alter as well as to 
enaft, preferves the conllant independence of Society, and 
renders 

L);.i....i by Google 



( " ) 

renders it at idl times equally free. It is therefore the 
grolTeft fophiftry in Mr. Paine to contend, that the 
authority of the Parliament of 1688, or of any prior 
Pvliament, is fuperfeded by lapfe of time. We con- 
tinue to recognize fuch Authority ; we cmitinue thereby 
to reap the fruits of the wifdom then excrcifed; and we 
are, nevertheieft, as free and as independent as the people 
of thatage. So the authorityof modernPariiamentswill,in 
like manner, be binding upon Pofterity, without encroach- 
ing upon its freedom. So much for Mr. Paine's en- 
deavour to undermine the authority of the Laws. 

A SECOND grand objeft of this Writer is to perfuade 
mankind, ^at Government itfelf is almoft ufelefs and un- 
neceflary. Accordingly he tells us, in Part II. page 8. 
diat ** Government is no farther neceflary than to fupply 
*' the few cafes to which fociety and civilization are not 
*' conveniently competent :" that " The abolition of any 
*' formal Government, far from being the dilToIution of 
** Society, brings it clofer together :" that " Formal Go- 
« vemment makes but a fmall part of civilized life ; and, 
** vrfienever the beft that human wifdom can detlrc is 
** eflablifhed, it is a thing more in name and idea than in 
*' fea ;" and page 10, that " It is but few general laws 
« that civilized life requires,, and thole of fuch common 
« ufefiilnefs, that whether they are enforced by the form of 
" Government or not, the effefl will be the fame *." 

* The example of Ihe American Statei, daring the war, is quoted, ia 
order to prove that Society can exifl: without Goremment. But in a linis 
of civil war, when a country ii covcreil with armies, (hough its government 
be in a manner Tufpended, for iniir arma flliii l,gis, yet the vetf Rale of 
hoftilitieE ccmprelTet the people into compaanefs and fubordination, and 
the civil goverament is only merged in the neceflacily more vigoroui and 
more unllmJted controul of ntiUury power. 

But 

■ Dgiw^dbv Google 



{ .2 ) 

But furely it is not poffible that fuch tra{h (which I 
have only quoted in order to point out the cloven foot* 
and expofe the delign and the extent of our author's doc- 
trines) can raife a film before the underftanding, and 
obfcure the real, the eflicieot, the univerfal operation of 
Government, as maintaining the union of Society, and as 
afording to each individual the only potCble fource of pro- 
tection, in all the relations and in all the lituations in 
which he can be fuppofed to cxift. 

Society is a ftate where the compulfory obligation 
of laws is imerpofed togu'ard the enjoyment of thofc rights 
which are properly recc^nized and deHned, from palSon, 
violence, and injuftice. It is plain, that d\efe laws cannot 
be ma^ie and enforced without fome adequate authority. 
And what is that authority but Government ? which, 
as it fuperintends the whole, and every part, is neccf- 
fcrily fupremc. In what condition, in what occupation, 
in what retirement, is not the agency of this power to 
be traced ? And what can poflihly be fubftituted in its 
place ? It is the only fource of all protedion and of all 
fecurity, and alone enables us to enjoy the gifts of fortune 
and die fruits of induftry. It does not indeed furmfli the 
v^etakve principle by which the corn grows, nor does ie 
beftow the genial warmth that matures the fruit of the 
vineyard; but it extends its guardian care, over the fwcl- 
ling ear and the ripening clufter ; it proteSs the labours 
of the huftandman, and defends the harveft and the vin- 
tage from rapine and dcpredjtion. 



The dodtrine of Mr. Paine, that Government is of very 

limited importance and utility, is confuted not only by the 
plaincfl dii5lates of common fenfe, but alfo by the daily ex- 
perience 

L)^.l..=.J by Google 



( -3 ) 

■ penence of common IJFe. Do we not find that ev^fy itf- 
ferior aflbciation of mankind calls of neceffity for foma 
connefling and controuling authority i By what other 
means are the domeftic concerns of a private family (the 
moll natural type, and perhaps the original foundation of 
Society at large) to be preferved from confullon and ruin ? 
What a fcene would the application of equalizing prin- 
ciples produce in a domeftic cftablifliment ? Do not the 
common interefts of every Parifh require the management, 
direction, and control, of a Government within itfelf ? 
Nay (to defcend to inftances almoft below the gravity and 
importance of the fubjeiSl, will our author affert, that in 
the higheft ftate of exhilaration which he ever experienced 
in thofe faihionable convivial meetings (commonly deno- 
minated Clubs), he ever propofed to his free and animated 
alTociates to relieve themfelves from the irkfomc authority 
of the chair? Ten or twenty equals, aflimilatcd by their 
difpofition and habits, cannot affemble for any particular 
purpofe, and fcarcely to eat and drink tt^cther, without a 
Prcfident, Chairman, or Head, to preferve order and de- 
corum. But, if we are to credit the wonderful difcoveries 
of Modern Philofophy, ten or twenty millions of all ranks, 
habits, and difpofitions, alTociated for the proteilion of 
unnumbered complex interefts, and for the prefervation of 
multifarious rights, have but little occafion for fuch alTif- 
tance ; and with tliem the beft Government " that human 
*' wifdom can devife, is a thing more in name and idea 
« than in fiuEl! ! !" 

Mr. Paine himfelf, however, Teems to confider tbis 
ground asfo defpcrate that be foonquits it, and commences 
his attack in a different manner. He feems to recolleia 
that the world in general are not only convinced of the 

, Google 



t 1« ) 

neceffity <rf' Ibme Government, but that it is eflenttaj to 
the happinefs of any country, that the fjindions of Go- 
vernment Ihould be exercifed according to certain efta* 
blifhed fonns and rules; iriiich, without crippling its ope* 
ration, and deprivii^ it of its eflential energy> may Air-> 
nilh powerful checks againft the exertion of its powers (of 
the purpofes of oppreffion. Thefe checks have hitherto 
been fuppofed to exill in the greateft perfS5iion in that 
feparation of office, in that dillribution (^ privilege and 
fundtion, which have rendered the BritiOi Conllitution the 
fource of freedom, of felicity, and of glory, to this coun- 
try — the envy of the reft of the world, andthemafter>pieC8 
to which all rational friends of Liberty throughout die 
globe look up, as to a matchlefs model for imitation. Mr, 
Paine, however, endeavours to avail himfelf of the moft 
oppofite fentiments for the purpofe of exciting difcontent. 
He firft reprefents Government as unneceflary, in order, 
if poHible, to make fome of his readers indifferent to the 
prefervati on of that which actually exifts ; but lefthe {bould 
fdi) in this attempt, be next appears the advocate for a 
regular conftitution, and in this charafler, in order to take 
another chance of raifing diflatisfaftion, he gravely afTertS, 
that in this country, notwithftanding all we fee and feel, we 
have at tills hour no Conftitution at all ! Why did he not 
at the fame time tell us, that we have no fliowers and no 
funfliine ? Such an aflertion would not be more contra- 
dictory to common fenfe and daily experience. 

Mr. Paine vainly endeavours to iix an odium upon 
fubftfting Governments by recalling to mind the tempo- 
rary deviations from firft principles which occurred in early 
periods of our hiftory. But the recolle^ion of the Norman 
Tyranny, of the Foreft Cruelties,and the C urfewBcU, fcrves, 
,'by 

Dgitir^dbv Google 



f IS ) 

hy way of contraft, to attach us the more firmly to tJitf 
fyftem of feciirity we now enjoy agatnft the repetition of 
fuch grievous q>prefilons. Our Conftitution is not (as this 
writer would ^IMaTmuate} founded on fuch a bafis. We 
can trace its ^mI^to much higher. TheNormanConqueft 
did but retard its growth, and for a time check its prin- 
ciples from expanding; but did not deftroy, or even ulti- 
mately weaken, the beneficial energy of thofe principles. 
Through the rapacity and oppreflive defpotifm of the firft 
monarchg of that line, we can conneft fome of our deareft 
privileges with the names of an Alfred and an Ed WARD. 
Having by its native vigour recovered from a malady 
which fcemed for a while to threaten its exiftence, the 
Conftitution has fince, from time to time, been deriving 
new acceffions of ftrength ; and we hardly know whether 
to admire moft the beautiful fimpKcity it difplayed in its in- 
fant ftate, or the value and importance of thofe advantages 
which it gradually obtained and fecured, as circumftances 
pointed out their necefiity. Even perfeft as it may now 
appear, the time may come, when further improvements 
may be fuggefted by further experience. For who will 
fay, that any human inflitution can be at any time at the 
Tte plus uhra of perfedlion ? Let us not, however, be in- 
fenfible of the advantage, that, inftead of having to fubvert, 
abolifh, or expunge, our plcafing taflc is to fecure, to 
guard, to polifh, and to beautify ; and let us cautioully 
refrain from tampering with a fyftem fo admirable 
in theory, fo excellent in praftice. There is nothing, 
however valuable, that the injudicious meddler may not 
fpoi! ; but what madnefs would it be to facrifice, in one 
ralh moment, all the advantages which have been obtained 
during afuccelBon of ages; and, as our author advifes, 
to " begin anew :" that is to (ay, to lofc all the ground 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



( i6 ) 

■We have gained — to give up our hold of al] that wc pofleS 
'—to part with the fubftance for the {hadowr— ^nd to plungtf 
from the happy ftate of I-aw and Liberty into the chaotic 
abyls of anarchy and confufton i 

After his firft aflault on Government in general, and ' 
Iiis abfiird complaint of the entire want of a Conftitution 
in Great Britain, our author proceeds to attack: the ex- 
ifting Governments in the detail. And it fcems that the 
Monarchical form excites his keenell vengepnce. Nor is 
this much to be wdndered at. For, befidcs that it is the 
ilioft vigorous form in which Government can appear^ and 
perhaps the only one which can efFeftually reprefs vio- 
lence and outrage in any extenfive community, Monarchy 
in this country is the principle which gives aflivity and 
^ergy to the whole fyftem J and it 15 perhaps peculiarly 
obnoxious to fuch writers as thefe, becaufe it is a part of 
the regal prerogative to be the fountain of juftice, and thtf 
^ring which puts the laws into execution. This is an un- 
pardonable offence — and no pains are fpared to reprefent 
Royalty as an odious and an ufelefs inftitution, confifting 
merely of outward pomp and unueccffary parade, and at- 
tended with grievous and unprofitable expence. Endlefs 
changes are rung upon the abfurdity of beftowing a Mil- 
lion a- year upon a fingle individual. Mr. Paine muft have 
a very contemptible opinion of the understandings of 
Etigliflimen, if he thinks they can be irtipofed upon by fuch 
fellacious fuggeftions (reafonings they certainly are not). 
Does he conceive there is not fenfe enough in this country 
to difcover that the yearly ftipcnd he alludes toJs paid, pot 
to the man, but to the olEce — not as a fmecurc gratuity, 
but for the moft effential and important funi^ions, by tha 
■ exercife of which we are alt benefited ? — that it is not 

given 

* Dgiw^dbv Google 



( I? ) 

^iven to the individual for hisovrn particular ufe, buten- 
truned to him, as the firft Magiftrate of the country, to be 
Applied to the fupport of the various branches of executive 
Government, which areneceflary for the adminiftration of 
public affairs either at home or abroad ? Thefe fupplies 
are not merely perfonal to the King, nor are they con- 
fined to the fUpport of a numerous family and an exten- 
five hou{hoid, and the maintenance of that external dignity 
which is connected with the difcharge of the duties of his 
office, and is therefore more important to his fubjefts than 
himfelf. The fame fund defrays the falaries of the Judges, 
and of the various other Officers of Juftice — the appoint- 
ments of Foreign Amballadors — of all Officers of State — 
■ and of the perfons who fill all the fubordinate fituatlons in 
the various and extenfive departments of Government — as 
■well as penfions to a large amount, given either as a relief 
for diftrefs, or as a reward for public fervices *. Although 
Mr. Paine may chufe to coHfider the Crown only as a 
" Metaphor (hewn atthe Tower for fixpence or a Ihilling 
" a-piece," we know and value the ftrength and vigour 
of our Monarchy ; we feel that its interefts are but reCi- 

* Before the prefenc reign Ihe fund appropruled to [ha Civil Lift wh 
compored ofdlvcn hereOiliry branchei of revenue, of an iin«rtain ammint,- 
buC producing anttnillr in iTielallreign almcft a million. Itis prefeni Mrijefly, 
foon aher his aeceflion, of liis own accord, moft liberally (urrendircd to [he 
public ufo ihia hereditary and improving income, and igreei lo accept, ai 
hisCitil I^B, tlie limited Cum of !tiO;Oool. which, piovine inadequate, has 
fince been auKmenled to 900,000 I. perann.; and the revenues that he haa 
thui abandoned have fmce incrcafed (b much that they now prodnce up- 
wards of i{40i:,o:d1. anniullf. That, notwithltanding tha great in. 
cieafe of every article of expance, and the proportionate diminution in th< 
value of money, hit prcfent Mijedy, wltti a very numeroui family, hai 
eally a led income than was enjoyed by his Royal Grandfather, *nd Ihe pub- 
lic hatpiuod htU ■ million per taa. by (he above-meat ioned diSnterefled 

C procal. 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



( >8 ) 

proca! with thofe of the country ; wc eftecm tholc iifeful 
and efficient prerogarives.with which the Conftitution has 
invefted our King as a grand fource, and as an elTential 
fecurity of our national confequence and felicity ; and we 
fee with admiration the exercife of thofe prerogatives fo 
wifely and cautiouHy guarded as to render it impoHiblc 
they ihould be abufed to the detriment of our liberties. 
Accordingly, we are fo far from grudging the liberal allow- 
ance which we prcfent by our reprefentatives, at the com- 
mencement of each reign, for the fupport of the regal dig- 
nity, as well as for the various charges on the Civil Lift^ 
that we think no money can be better bellowed. 

Another quality of the Monarchy which gives great 
offence to Mr. Paine, is its hereditary nature. This 
is equally eafy to.be accounted for. The buflle, the ftnfe, 
the confufion, the intrigues, and the cabal, the plots and 
tiic counter -plots, which are fure to attend theeleftionofa 
King, would be replete with entertainment and gratifica- 
tion to thofe whofe turn of mind or of politics lerjls 
them to favour fuch fcenes. But thofe who prefer a 
tranquil inftantaneous fucceffion to a violent or bloody 
eleiflion — thofe who think a regular and uninterrupted 
continuation of the funftions of Government preferable fo 
their occafional fufpenfion— thofe who bad rather be go- 
werned by a Monarch in a courfe of defcent from an 
ancient and beloved race, than by one impofed upon them 
by the ftrength or addrefs of a party, or by force of arm* 
(which muft ever be the cafe in an elcflire Monarchy), 
fuch perfons, I fay, will rejoice In the hereditary nature of 
the Crown j not to mention that the conyulfion necefla- 
rily produced by a regal cle^ion would diftuib and un- 
hinge 



[ '9 ) 

hinge the whok madtine of the Conftitudon. The 'm- 
conveniencics to which our Author refers as arifing from 
the nonage, idiotcy, or other incapacity of the pecfon on 
whom a Crown may devolve in an invariable courfe of 
defcent, cannot exift, where, as in this country, the power 
of Parliament extends to provide againA fuch cafes : and as 
to the objections which he urges againll an hereditary 
fucceHion to the Crown, on account of the pofliblc preva- 
lence of perfonal ambition, or of a tyrannical difpofition, 
in the charaAer of the reigning monardi) they are compa' 
ratively of little weight where die powers of the Crown are 
fo limited by, fo connefted with, and fo dependent upon, 
the other powers knovm to the Conflitution At a 
time w*en the exercifc of the kingly powers vns free 
from thofe important checks which have been fmce tnter- 
pofed (for many of our moft valued fccurities have been 
obtained within little more than a century), this nation 
proved tiiat it was out of the power of liie monarch to vio- 
late or alter the Conftitution, and to diminiOi the Liberties 
of the People. In fliort, our Monarchy, although in its 
principle hereditary, yet is by no means indefeafibly {6, 
there being a power in Parliament to pafs gver, for fufficient 
caufe, an individual who may for any caufe be evidentl]^ 
unfit to fucceed; deviating, however, no fiirtherthan ne- 
ceffity requires, from tde flridl line of fucceflion. And 
however the exercife of ddpodfm may tend to corrupt the 
heart or contra^ the underftanding, the (Ituation and the 
limited though refpeSable authority <^ a King <^ England 
are calculated to inftil into his mind principles of public 
virtue, to form him to the fa^duts of good gcveniment, to 
enlarge his underftanding, to cultivate in him a regard for 
(be real and permanent iaterefts of his pecf le» aad,to rcn- 
C a der 

L);.i....i by Google 



( u ) 

dcr him the mod benevolent and uTefiil of human beings, 
"a Patriot Prince !" 

It muft alfo be remarked, that die obje^ons ariling 
from the perfonal qualities of the Monarch are fo far from 
being confined to hereditary fucceffion, that they are in 
fad more likely to occur, and in no degree more cafy to be 
guarded againfl, in elective monarchies. The experience of 
the world, correlponding with the nature of things, informs 
us, that the competition for a Crown has oftenet been de- 
cided by force or intrigue, and by thofe qualities with 
which they are generally conne^ed, than by the influence 
of perfonal merit; and that, whatever may be the fiu£tua- 
tions of charafler or talents in any particular family, here- 
£ury fucccffion is on the whole much more iikely to fiir- 
nifh Sovereigns qualified and difpofed to promote the hap- 
pinefs of their fubje£1s, than the caprice, tumult, and dif- 
order of popular election, where the conteft is frequently 
decided by violence in fevour of unprincipled ambition, or 
where thofe who arc unable to fucceed in their own per- 
fons unite in fupporting fomc nominal Sovereign, whom, 
from his weakncfs and incapaci^, they think themfelves 
likely to govern. 

Mr. pAiSE having laboured, though I truft very un- 
fuccefsfully, to create a prgudice againft the Crown of 
this kingdom, he next endeavours, with much malignant 
fcurrility, to feduce the afFeftions of a loyal people from 
the Soverrign on the throne. He wifhes to weaken the 
attachment lubfiAing between this Prince and his people, 
by reprefenting the royal lineage as conne£led by very 
flender ties with the country, and as proceeding from a fo- 
reign 

' L);.I..=.J by Google 



( =. ) 

reign Stock, recently imported, by an injudicious choice, t9 
govern a country to which it was before a ftranger. How 
falfe, how infolent to Britons, are fuch inHnuations ! Does 
this rain and malevolent writer ^cy it to be in his power 
to make us forget, that the Sovereign who is dear to our 
hearts, both for his perfonal virtues and for the-attachment 
he hife always ihewn to fhe Conflitutton, is alfo the defcen- 
dant of the Original Founder of the BritlQi Monarchy ? 
The various channels through which the royal bloo(J has 
flowed for nearly looo years, arc at length happily united in 
an illuflrious Proteftant line ; and the ancient Crown of 
this kingdom is now worn, with hereditary right, by a 
Prince, who, while he fits on the throne of his anceftors, 
reigns with more unlimited fway in the affections of his 
fubje£ls. 

Neither can it be in the power of wanton and licen- 
tious indecency to ftifle our attachment to perfons and fe- 
milies whofe memory ought ever to be dear to Engliflinicn. 
It isnotjfiirely, for malice and mifreprefentation to make us 
forget, that the Houfes of Orange and Brunswick have 
rendered us eflential fervices at critical times, and that to 
them, under Providence, we are indebted for the continued 
enjoyment of privileges which diftinguilh us from the reft 
of the world. Such names have been hitherto mentioned 
with veneration by our moft ardent and enlightened pa- 
triots : fuch names will continue to be venerated by all 
who, being rationally as well as fervently attached to the 
Confiitution itfelf, cannot remember with indifference 
thofe perfons and fatuities which have been the inftru* 
ipents of its prefervation. 

Cs It 



D;.t.z=d by Google 



( " ) 

It may not be inapplicable here to obrerve, that im^ 
thing can be more different from a pure and generous 
fpirit of real patriotifm, than that coarfe and illiberal dif- 
pofition which delights in abufe and inventive againft all 
perfons inverted with power and authority. The former 
can even oppofe with refpe£t, and will render (erious and 
determined refiftance (fbould that ever become neceffary 
for good purpofes) more weighty and efficacious, by the 
dignified decency from which it never departs: the latter 
appears to place its principal gratification in railing againit 
the higher powers ; it feems to depend for perfonal confe- 
- quence upon attacking the dignity of fupcriors, and to 
cojifider nothing as a greater proof of magnanimity and in- 
dependent fpirit, than boldly to treat with grofs fcurrility 
charaiSers and fituations which the reft of the world look 
up to with refpeft ; and, like the unblulhing profligate, it 
delights to. wound and to torture the feelings of thofe who 
retain a fenie of propriety. 

What can be more bafe and ungenerous than the dif- 
pofttion I allude to? The order of civil fociety (par- 
taking of the invariable principle of nature itfelf ) requires 
a progreffive gradation: but the higheft ranks, expofed 
as tbey are by their elevation to the fhafts of malice and 
envy, are little coveted by the unprejudiced philofophi- 
cal mind, diat juftly appreciates the advantages and difad- 
vantages of refpeitive fituations. The flacion of Roy- 
alty itfcif, with all the dazzling glare which furrounds ii^ 
is far from being enviable ; arduous as it is elevated-— the 
fymbol of pov/er, but clogged with reftraints unkno'jra to 
inferior rank — impeded in the enjoyment of numberlefs 
individual comforts—debarred even of (orat of the moft 
CQmqion, 



(■ =3 ) 

tommon, though at the fame time the moft valuable privi- 
leges of nature — ftiackled with forms and ceremonies — 
confpicuous always by the blaze of its own rays, and 
precluded from the delicious gratifications that belong to 
feclufion and privacy — befet with anxious cares, and emi- 
nently expofed to calumny, to plots, and confplracies— . 
while the high and important office of King, for the fake 
of the public good, calls for fiich facrifices from the Man, 
how unworthy and ungenerous muft it be to delight in 
wounding his perfonal feelings, and in planting his Crown 
with additional thorns ? How much more confiftent vrith 
the duty as well as the intereft of fubjeits, to alleviate his 
cares, and to fmooth his rugged path by demonftrations 
of fidelity, loyalty, and affeftion ! It is not by indulging 
fuch fentiments under a mild and ajuft Government, that 
we fhall be either pledged or difpofed to fubmit to op- 
preffion. The feeling, the generous, and the loyal cha- 
rafter would be the moft ftrenuous, and the moft manly, 
in defence ofits rights, and of thofeof the country at large. 
A nation fo compofed would be the laft to be atDcked, 
but would never be enllaved ; for the rational loyalty of a 
free people is itfelf a bulwark of their freedom, and by 
uniting them clofely together in one common fentiment, 
as well as one common intereft, prefcrves concord and 
happincfs at home, while it creates confequence and re- 
fpei^bility abroad •. 
■ In the year 1771, ihcRcT. Mr. Horhe exprelfedhimretrMfallon'ti 

" 1 would offend (tie Sav«reJea wiih as much relufUacc at lh« parent." 

*• Wlioevcr or whatever is SoHreign, deminita the refpcS and fupport of 
*' the people. The union is formed for Ibeir hipp]aefs, which cannot ba 
>* had without rnuiiol relpeft ; and he couofeli inalicloullf Tvho vrould 
■' perTiude either to a wanton breacb o( it." — It is lo be hoped, ihit in 
l^gaJoKMUoKNcToosEiErq.iEuadertbGiaQnciicaottlMrMicCcatimniu. 

C4 It 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



( >♦ ) 

It is one of the blclCngs of this country to-have \ 
monarch who reigns not only the King but the fond tathe? 
of his people i while their cheerful and affeiftionate loyalty 
conftitutcs the happinefs of his life, the chief giory of his 
crown, and the ftrength, profpcrity, and fplendour of the 
nation. 

And (hall we, while the gloom, the difmay, and the 
univerlal ftagnation, occafioned by the yet recent midady 
pf our common Father are freih in our recollection-^ 
while our hearts ftill vibrate with the tranfports of joy 
which af&iled us on his welcome and almoil unexpe^ed 
recovery — (hall we countenance the moft audacious infults 
on his perfon, and the moft malignant attacks upon his 
Crown f Or Jhall we demonftrate our attachment to him- 
fdf and his family, by configning the authors of fuch at- 
ifmpts to their proper ftation of contempt and infemy? 

As the dircfl vray lo demoKIh any building is, Sampfon- 
like, to pull down the pillars by which it is fupported} in 
order to abolifh Monarchy it is found expedient to attack 
the ariftocratical branch of governnient *. Hence a violent 
outcry againft orders of Nobility naturally forms a part of 
the fyftem to the introduilioii of which Mr. Paine's wri- 
tings are direiSed, He feems very defirous that his readers 
ftiould confider the rank of Nobility as confifting merely 

* TliuEi in-ihe laA century, when a fmalt poilion qI ihs Commoiis, b; 
the a'ul of mUiuiy farce, bad ufurped the (upremc power, coverlnE llwir 
defigns under the (late, and generally fslle pretext of the authority of Ihs 
People, they fiill found that the exigence of a Houfe o( Feerl, difheanened 
tod >lm[>lt deferted as tbataflembly then was, formed a bnnier lo the 
completion of their crime! ; — and acc:iidingly they fa^v it necclTdry to 
atianl, by a vote, the authority of that Hoofe, before they coutd practed 
itpon the delenable and itifamoits plan of mutdcriiig their Sovereign under 
piickloinuoflav. 

«\ 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



f «s ) 

in a frivolous exterioi' dilinflion, in « ribbands, garters, 
and nick-names * j" another infult on the undeiilanding 
and experience of Englifhmen j who know, by the aid of 
both, that a mixed Government and limited Monarchy re- 
qairc not only a gradation of rank, but alfo an intermedi- 
ate legiflative order, interpofed between the Monarch and 
the popular reprefentativc, which, depending for its own 
prefervation on that of the other two branches, is rendered 
thereby the natural guardian of both, and an infuperable 
t>arrier againd the eijcroachment of either, 

The people of this country are by no means fuch fliper-. 
ficial obfervers as Mr. Paine fuppofes or wishes them to be. 
.—Far from confining their attention to externals, they can 
fee that the pomp and fptendour annexed to die rank of 
Englifli Nobility, are but appendages to a high fituation, 
and to important public duties, both of the legislative and 
judicial kind. Such a fituation and fuch duties Oiould 
furely be ever accompanied with fomething to imprefs the 
fenfes ; for it is not ih the nature of Man to be always en- 
gaged in abftrafl operations. Nor is this Order, with us, 
poflefled of any peculiar privileges, but (uch as are requifite 
for the free and benelicial cxercife of thofe funftions, 
<(vhich it poflelTes for-thegood of the whole. Inevery 
other refpeil, the Peer and the Peafant arc under the equal 
adminillration of equal laws, which know not any diffe- 
rence between them in regard to thofe important rights 
which are founded in nature, and to fecure which is the 
grand objeft of fociety. 

•i.Mr. Paioe't insenioiii Jefinitioo for the cenn '■ Title." 

From 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



( »6 ) 

From fuch a community of intereft with perlbns of 
this elevated ftation, who would be equally injured with 
ourfelves by any infringement on the rights of the ful^ct^ 
we derive an important additional fecurity for the prefer- 
vation of our liberties. And thus the Peers of Great Bri- 
tain, though not aAually deputed^ do virtually poflcfs a rt~ 
frefentative charaittr, obliging them cautioufly and firmly 
to prote£l thofe rights which they enjoy in common, and 
which they can enjoy only in common with the People at 
large j while the exiftence of fuch a rank in the State, 
befides its other advantages, is conducive to the promo- 
tion of a fpirit of virtuous cnterprize. and of honourable 
emulation; and its hereditary nature is neceflary both 
to render it independent of the Crown, and to infure its 
ftabiii^ and its permanence. 

Mr. Paine, in his endeavours to create a prejudice 
againll Monarchy and Ariftocracy, retails very artfully the 
common-place topics of objeflion to which each is liable 
in its fimple form ; and he as artfully avoids all mention of 
the difadvantages attending a Government confifting folely 
of a Democratic reprefentation. But it might not be un- 
feir to a(k him. Whether in that beverage of which per- 
haps his libations are fometimes compofed, he finds that the 
fpirit and the limpid element, the fweet and the acid in- 
gredients, do each retain the fame precife properties when 
combined together, which they feverally poffeffed in their 
feparate and independent ftate ? or. Whether they are not 
blended that each may modify and correfl the other, 
and that a new and agreeable effeift may be produced 
from die union ? The allufion is a very familiar oae, but 
I hope excutable if found to be appofite. The Govern- 
ment 

L);.i..=.jb; Google 



( 27 ) • 

ment of this country is compounded of thofe three forms . 
in which alone Government has ever appeared, and which 
have ever proved highly objefUonable in their feparate 
exercifei but by blending them together in wife pro- 
portions, it fecurcs the advantages of each» while it efcapes 
the inconvenieitces tdiich each of them fmgly is calculated 
to produce. It is this union which has caufed the 
happinefs and ^lendour of Great Britain, and ^^ch af- 
fords a folid and permanent bafis for the freedom of its 
inhabitants : it is this aflemblage which has attracted the 
admiration of the world, and called forth the applaufes of 
thofe who have been moft diftinguiflied for their talents 
and powers of difcrimination. 

One of the greateft Political Charaaers of the prefent 
age, whofe talents at leaft nobody will difpute, 4nd 
who from his recent conduit feems inclined to pulh his 
notions of Liberty at leaft fufficiently far, thought it never- 
thelefs neceflary to vindicate himfelf from the fufpicion of 
not afFording his entire approbation to that mixture of 
forms which cohftitutes the Britifli Government : and in a 
dilcufTion on the Quebec Bill, in the courfe of the laft 
Seffion, he ftated.it to be his decided opinion, that every 
fimple form of Government, whether Monarchy, Arifto- 
cracy, or Democracy, was effentially bad; and that there 
could be no good or complete fyftem of Government 
without a proper mixture of all three. Such, he obferved, 
had always been his fentiments; and whoever thought 
otherwife of him, had been miftaken; efpecially if they 
thought be was an enemy to Ariftocracy : the direct: con- 
trary was the fa£t ; and there was no man in that Hou& 
who confidered a proper and well-regulated Arillocracy, 
fuch as formed a part of the Britijh Confiituthn-, more ei- 
fential to the Ibrmation of a good Government than he 

Ui 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



. ( il ) 

did } that a certain degree of Ariftocracy was abfolutrfy 
necclTary as a poife between the prerogative of the Crown 
a»Sing againft the rights of the People, and the influence 
and liberty of the People acting againll Ae Monarehical 
power; and that tberei^re a mixture fo conftituted that 
each was a checlL upon the other, he conceived to be die' 
Conftitution of this country, and the beft Coraftitution in 
the world*. 

Nor was the teftimony of the moft enlightened of the 
Ancients wanting In &vour of fuch a fyft^m of Go- 
vernment, in point of principle, long before it was ever 
reduced into praflice. Thus Tacitus regarded the triple 

form as highly deferving of admiration ; but as he 
could only view it in theory, it appeared to him rather 
to be coveted and admired than likely to be eifeitedi 
and as a degree of pcrfeflion in Government not likely to 
be either attained or preferved in praSice f. Our long ex- 
perience has, however, proved that his apprehenfions in 
thefe refpedis were unfounded, and in all other refpeifts has 
confirmed his opinion. Cicero alfo exprefsly deftribes a 
Conftitution fimilar to ours, though he had never feen it 
realized, as the moft perfect that could be fuppofed tQ 
exift i and he beftows upon it his unqualified applaufe in 
terms remarkably appofite and defcriptlve J. I might alfo 
adduce other teftimonies from ancient wifdom to the ^mc 
purport, were it at all neceflkry. 

It is unneceffary to dwell longer on particular ob- 
jeflitMis-, which, when thoroughly under{lood, are not 

• Sea Mr. Fol'i Speech on the Qoebec Bill. 

+ Cunflas natlones el urbes, popolos, aut priofM, »ut finpili regnni j 
dileda ex his et connituia Rei publics forma i.i,vPA,Rt faciUuE qQam eve- 
■lire ; vel fi evenU hauJ diulurna cfle poteft. 

J Sialuo effe optime conftitulam rempubllcam, qui ex tribus geaerlbui 
lUIa, cceali Dptimo et populari, modice coaSaSa.-. . . • 

pgmted 



( 49 ) 

pointed fo much to the abftra£t nature of particular fomiS 
of Government, as to the exiftence of any Government at 
all ; fo that whatever form might be fubftituted, if it were 
efficacious, and culpable of anfwering the purpofes for 
which all Governments are eftabliffied, the fame diflatis- 
faH-ion and the fame cavil would enfue : all the old, that 
is, all the fubfifting and long-eftabliftied Governments are 
condemned in the lump; and what is called " the new 
" reprefentative fyftem engrafted on Democracy" is ftated 
to be the only' good plan of Government. But where 
upon the whole fudace of the globe is this plan reduced 
into praftice ? Where does it now exift, except in our 
author's brain ? for, according to him, it " rejeils Mo- 
** narchy both eleftive and hereditary." It muft alfo, T 
prefume, rejeft Ariftocracy, to which he afcribes in fub- 
ftance "the feme vices and defefts" as to Monarchy. 
Therefore, upon Mr, Pajne's own principles, even the form 
of Government traced out by the New Conftitution of 
France*, as well as that now exifting in America, muft be 
radically^ 

• With rcTpeft 10 the French Revolution, which, wiih all ii) train of 
calamiliea, Mr. Paint wouid, doubilcfs, be glad to fee imitated in tlii* 
country, the People of Great Britain, happy, Toccersrul, and fiouriSiioE ia 
thnr own concerns, have nothing more to do vrjth that event, than at a 
matter of diflant, though intereftinB obfervalion. The miCerable and ilif. 
(rafted Hate ta which it hai brought a once great and flauriOiing kingdom, 
far from being ealculated to recommend the experiment of Revolution!, 
even in thofe countries where Derpotlfm Hill .-naintaini its fway, ferves as a 
beacon to wain mankind of the danger of ralh innavanlon, of mad reform, 
and of vlfionary plana cl Covemmcnt. With regard to ouirclvei, its pe 
culiar operiiion Oiould be to make ui prize ftill more highly the ryflnn of 
Liberty and of Law, which ii fecured to ui by our own excelicnl ConOi- 
tulion. The generoui fympathy of the Englilh charafler cannot liowever 
but be called forth into cmoliooi of pity and commiferatioii, when we be- 

hold 

n;".nvC,OOljlc 



( 30 ) 

radically bad, as being inconfiftentwilbhis "new(fangle<]) 
*■ reprefentative fyftem." For in the fonner hereditary 
Monarchy is ftill profefled to be interwoven, though, for 
want of an ariftocratical branch, it has been already fo 
much encroached upon, as to be ufelefs to any lalutary 
purpofe i and the latter country, after a trial for feveral 
. years of the pure democr^ical reprefentative fyftem, has 
found it neceffary to adopt both Monarchy and Ariftocracy : 
for the Piefidenc, under that denomination, is invelled 
with monarchical prerogatives } and the Senate conftitutes 
a Middle Chamber : fo that even American experience 
contraditfts all Mr. Paine's notions of Government *. 

hold the extreme corfiirion, inirehT,Mid wretchedneTi, to which, in b Otott 
« lime, our ancient rivals have been reduced { on wboni TOiifortnnes, if 
poilihie, <)ill more feiere Iccm to impend, fi^it while we ihut feel- 
ingly and linccrely lament the diltrelfti of our nrighbouti ;— »nd while 
With roaderauon we are improving tbofe fair aduant^et which tmavoidabljr 
lefuli lo ourfilves from their calamitous condition, we Ihould furely be in- 
duced by fuch confidetatlona both Co exetcife redoubted care in prelervinEi 
and aMb to enjoy with encreafed tbinkfulnefi, that fercne and piofpeTont 
tcanquilliry, foreisn and domeftic, with which Providence feemt difpcrfcd to 
blefi this favoured lUc. 

* AHEiiCA,ducinE<heniort period Gnce the eflabliOiment of bet In. 
dependence, has found, that the demoaaiic form wa< not calcolited for 
the govemnHnt of three millions of people, iliough fpreid over lb iKunenA 
a territory ; and in the year 17S7 fhe new-modelled her Conftitntion, tCfi- 
mil.iting it, as nearly as cireumllances would aikrw, 10 that of Great Bri- 
tain, by adopting the triple form of Government. In refpefl to the Mo- 
narchical part. It waj to be exfiefled that, like many other new Staiei, fha 
would athrit till that office by e^aion; and the General underwhofe con. 
dud rucceri'bsdcrowaed along and bloody war, was, according to all bv-, 
man *xpeiicncc, the iialural objea of univerfal and peaceful choice. But 
when no fuch fource of general agreement Ihill exilt, and when various 
claimanii, prompted by ambition, fliall be fopported by clafhing interest, the 
Crown of America, fhould it eontinue co preferve iii oniiy, will probably be- 
coi 'IS hereditary. 

Nor 



vlbyCoO'jIC 



( 31 ) 

Nor is it probable, tiiat the New Conftitution of Poianil 
will better accord with our Author's fentimcnts ; for the 
Crown of tiiat country, from being elcflive, has thereby 
been rendered hereditary, and its prerogatives have been 
ftrengthened and enlarged: ajid, what is perhaps wtrjl of 
all, this change has been brought about without any in- 
fringement of order and public tranquillity *. It Ihould 
feem, therefore, that none either of die old or of the new 
Governments can afFord any gratification to Mr. Paine'* 
faftidious palate ! But in feven years the fcene is to be 
entirely changed; for that is the utmoft period allowed by 
his prophetic fpirit, ** for the continuance of Monarchy 
** or Ariftocracy in any of the enlightened countries of 
" Europe j" and to accelerate fuch a change he engages 
to *' labour as faft as he can." 

If Mr. Paine and his advocates fhould ftill contend, 
that his fyftcm does not go the full length of abfolutely 
excluding every icind of Government, , it would be well if 
they would agree on the proper denomination of that fpccict 
of Government which his principles tend to eflablifb. 
Perhaps if any term.can be found to defcribe it, none wll 
accord better dian the familiar and homely appellation of 
Msh Govirnment, If the Supreme Authority, appearing 
in this fhape, afTume the name of Frtedoni^ it is entitled to 
do fo only becaufe it leaves people _/>-«# to do all the mif- 
chief they pieafe J andreftrains them merely from doinggood. 
—It aboliflies all fubfifting laws without the delay of a 
formal repeal ; and in lieu of a regular and extenftve fyftcnit 

* The Tnelancholy rcfult of ihe late flrugglB Tor Liberty in PoUod, 
while it tills the heart) nC EngliHimen with regret, fuggelb alio Ihs ufa- 
Inl lefliiD, Ihit all great and f jdtlcn cbangei arc prccariDUi in (heir tStfXs, 
and ibac * gradual acquiriEion of idviatages is ilono to be dspended opoa 
for recurity and permancncs. 

nicely 



( 3^ ) 

hicelyadjuftedand calmly applied to almoA eVery caTe that 
can be the fubjcil of legal reference, or that can occur irt 
improved and civilized Society^ it fubftitutes the capricd 
and violence of the qiultitudct and thereby] fuperiedes all 
the regular forms of juftice. In other Words, it rules by 
that fpecies of law which is ufually called die " law ctf (he 
ftrongeft ;" a law which, wherever it prevails, abro- 
gates every other, demolilhes at once all the powers, 
eftabliOmients, and inftitutions, which were before re- 
cognized, ^d fuddenly lays in ruins the former Govern* 
ment, and the entire Conftitution itfelf. 

In a pBlitUal view, this fyftem of (jovernment ever vio- 
lates and dlflblvcs thofe foreign conneftions and engage- 
ments which nations have formed for their mutual fecurity, 
and breaks through every obligation of treaty. The law of 
nations is held no more facred than thelawofthclandj and 
while the public fcth is broken, the honour of the country 
is tarnilhed, its weight and refpe^tability diminiOied, and 
its commerce and revenues annihilated. 



Ik a domefllc view, under fuch a fjftem, all orders will 

be levelled — all diflinflions effaced — the rights of property 
(formerly held facred) annuMed— -and fecurity and tran- 
quillity made to depend on the capricious will of_ an 
unreftrained multitude. 

Is a moral view, ail thofe obligations which have been 
hitherto confideted as Lcred and inviolable will be can- 
celled. The natural love of our Country, together with 
ail fenfe of duty and gratitude to the State, which pro- 
tected the otherwlfe defencelefs moments of birth and in- 
fency, will be extirpated— and an attachment to our na- 
tive foil will no longer prevail. The ufeful impulfes Of 
parental 



t >i ) 

parental afie£tton *ni fUial duty, of coi^tigal lov^ Iratenial 
regsrd> and frienill/ aOachmoit, and ^ tfae tin which had 
hefoie connc£tcd man wi^ man', and reodered them mw^ 
tually fiibfcrvicnt to each other's felicity j all thde will give 
vaybcfore amadaiuluiibridlcdlicentiou&ie&<—heattngthe ' 
tmi^ination, intcnicating the mind, inflaming the palBonS) 
and cormpting die heart; 

In a philtfiphicdl view, ciVilizatioDj which had arrived 
at a high degree of perfe^ion under the genial influence of 
fettled government and certain laws^ vriU recede much 
more rapidly than it had advanced: The decline of lite- 
rature, the extin£lion of the arts and Tciences, mull fureiy 
follow, when the fupreme power is in the hands of the illi- 
terate Manyi before whofe Gothic ravagesf, the monuments 
of &mc and meriti the depofitaries of Iqarning and the 
archives of fcicnee, will fpeedily dilappear. The gloom 
of night will then again fucceed tp the Iplendour of day; 
barbarifm will return with hafty ftrJdes ; and a new age of 
romantic chivalry will he wanted,|as the harbinger and die 
inArument of a more perfeil civilization. 

Such would be the efFe£b of a Government founded 
lipon Mr. Paine's principlesv But it is plain that human 
tiature cannot long fubfiH in a ftate fo little calculated to 
provide fijr its wants and necelHties. Therefore the Go* 
vemment of the Mobj deftrU<5tive as it is defpotic^ is necef- 
farily of very (hort duration. The biilk of the people 
fOon beC(Aie weary of a condition of fuch rcftlefsnds, and 
pant for quiet and tranquillity. They find tliat their ca es 
of complaint (whether real or imaginary} are alarmingly 
'increafed ; their difficulties greatly augmented, their re- 
&urces in propordon diminilhed, and their enjopientg, 



( 34 ) 
ttieir nteans of rubfiftence, nay» even die recompenoe far 
bodi]y labour, and handicraft fkiU, become, Kke every 
Atng dfe, precarious and infecure.* At length, tome new 
comlnnatioR of power,proitipted byambidonyand probably 
Hipported by tho& who were fbremoft in the fiibveHlon of 
-tirder and in the clamour for ^ rights," takes advantage of 
the hairalTed and enfeebled condijjon of the country j and 
after meeting with more or lefs refiftancr, according to the 
ftrength orweaknefe of contending cabals, alTumes to itfelf 
unlimited dominion ; to preferve which, it muft exert 
tfie moft abfolute and deipotic powers, and rule with a rod 
of iron. The pet^le in the mean time^ fui^rixig from 
Ae ravages of fuch a cortvulfidn, are reduced to fubmit to 
a new and galling yoke, which is better only than an entire 
abfence of all regular Government. Farther than ever 
jrom obtaining the privileges held out to them, they find 
.themfelves defiitute even of thofe which they had before 
jftoflelTed i and) having relinquished a ftate of real comfort 
and happinefs, they at length, after a long and calamitous 
ftruggle, link into a milerablc and dlfgracefiil iervitude^ 

What a pleating contrad to fuch dreadful fcenes, is to 
be found in the happy ftate of this country, where, 
.infteadef an ungovernable fpirit of licentiouliiefS} infpiring 
terror throughout the land, and making itfe^ known 
by its exce^es, ^e fee the eflef^s of genuine Libertjr 
operating as a real, an univerlal, and a permanent blef- 
Jing — founded in law — the equal and inviolable birthright 
of every individual — giving a manlinefs and an energy 
to the national chara^er, atid being the fource as well as 
thefecurity of our greatnefs, profperity, and happinefs as a 
people. Who is there, of the moft. clamorous aflcrtors of 
.pretended rights, that will point out aainftanc* in which Ae 
Ubeny 
L)^.i..=.jbvGoogle 



( 35 ) 
liberty of a fingle individual can' be illegally invaded in thiS 
cojintry? Where'is tbe poi/er that can deprive the Bri- 
"tifhfubjetSof the'proteaion of the laws? And fliall vre 
liften with complacericy to thofe who Counfel us to ex- 
change tins ftate of mild and rational Freedom and of tran- 
quil happiriefs for lavage ferocioulhefs, inteftine difTen-* 
fions, and outrageous violence ! Shall we clafp the'dcmon 
of Difcord to our breafts,'"even while the fiend is waving 
the torch offedition? No! let us rather fliew ourfelvcs 
defarving oftjienameandof the privileges of Engliflimen, 
not only by arefolute defence of our glorious Conftitution 
itfelf, but by a marked indignation againft thofe who treat 
it with infult, or aim at its fubverlion. 

It is one of our peculiar and moft eftimable advantages; 
to polTefe legal, orderly, and conftitutional means for 
the correftion as well as the prevention of abufes ; an* . 
thereby every motive for violence is obviated, and everjf 
excufe for diforder taken away. While true to our- 
felves we are invulnerable. Our grand and conllant ob^ 
jcft fliould be to preferve and enforce the true /pirit of 
the Conftitution, and we (hoald refort to that alone for 
an explanation of our rights ; regarding it as our Pol* 
ftar, not only to dired and regulate in all cafes of dif- 
ficulty and danger, but to be our conftant and invariable 
guide through every part of our political courfe. Welhoutd 
cautioufly guard and preferve the conftitutional indepen- 
dence of each diftindpart of our government, and conddtfr 
every infringement upon any of their regular funftions 
(whether deliberative or executive) as deranging dw 
balance, and as tending to the deftru£Uoo of the whcJe 
nashkie' Above aU>AYeQiiDukl be both vigilant itnd honcft ia 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



( 36 J 

Ihe cxcFcife of the important duties of dehors; and of 
obferving and enforcing the many falutaiy regulations 
lidiich the Legidature has interpcrfed to cKeck the too preva- 
lent fpirit of bribery and corruption, we fliould do all in our 
power to preieive the purity and independence of the popu- 
lar part of our Govefnment. And if, in Qiite of all our 
care, evils and abufes fliould creep in, we fliould refoTt to 
conflitutional remedies alone for their correction; andcoo- 
fider as our worft foes all who advile. the ^plication <^ 
any means irindi are not fo authorized and prefcribed. 

It may alfo be of ufe to bear in mind, that thebeft of all 
pofiible inftitutions, operatii^ upon a fubjed fo defe&ive 
as human nature, muft ever in point of pra&ice fall fhortof 
ii>ro]uCe theoretical perfe<%on. Such a conJidcration will 
not only prefcrve us from vificHiary and romantic wiOtes 
for vkat is really unattainable (than which nodiing can 
tnorc pervert the prt)per and ufefiil bias of the mind), but 
it will alfo guide to the real foutce of defe^bj and to the 
Inoll natural means both of preventing and of connteri^ 
kdtng th«n. Nothing can be more obvious, than that the 
beneficial energy even of our own excellent Conflitutlcm 
will eVcr be checkedj in proportion to the prevalence of difli^ 
pation and depravity in the manners and in the minds of the 
people, liiftead, therefore, of imputing blame Where none 
is dcfervcd, let us trace evils to their tClual caufe, and there 
apply the remedy. Let every real frieridto hisCountryand 
its Conftiiuiioii do all in his powerj by precept aJld by ex* 
smple, to inculcate and recommend a ^irit of order, ceco- 
nomy, temperance, and induftry, and the praSice of thoie 
duties which arc prefcribed bymorality and religion.'^Lct 
luiu [«fi£t as much as he «an die inci«afc of luxury and 
cUffipatioiH 

Dgiw^dbv Google " 



( 37 ) 
iJiiGpatIon> which enervate the mind, degrade the chi, 
r|^r, difqualify for manly and noble exertions, and ppei) 
all the fources of corruption. — Let him, in fhort, exer{ 
himfelf in aid of magiftracy and J:he po}ice to check the 
baneful contagion of vice and inimorality, rememberJpg 
that an independence of mind, fo congenial to free- . 
dom, is alfo nearly allied to purity and fimplicity of man- 
ners. — ^While the Throne exhibits fo excellent a pattern of 
all the virtues which ornament humanity and benefit man- 
kind, how fliould the influence of the bright and ufeful 
example be communicated from rank to rank, till it per- 
vade the uimoft receffes of fociety 1 — Then, indeed, wou'd ■ 
pivil liberty be invigorated and adorned by private virtue 
and d(Mneftic happinefs. 

I AM not now affecting to fermonize, or even to 
moralize— I am viewing the matter in a politxat light 
only. — The moral and religious difplay of thcfe topics is 
the peculiar province of the pulpit. But their civil im- 
portance calls for the attention of the ftatefman, the phi- 
lanthropill', and the citizen. It is poffible that the de-: 
praved manners of a people may not only endanger their 
fteedom, but render it a_curfe inftead of a bleffing — and ■ 
liberty, by degenerating intolicentioufnefs, becomes its own 
pertain deftroyer. But witliout carrying ourapprehcnfions 
fo ftir, it is a truth which concerns us moft nearly, and which 
pannot be too often repeated, that the benefits derived fron^ 
our CONSTITUTION will exift in greater or lefs 
perfeftion, in proportion to the prevalence of a \'ir- 
tuous principle among ourfelves : thofe, therefore, who 
wifh for the continued and complete enjoyment of that 
great and invaiuabk bleffing will negleft nothing that 

can 

Cogic 



( 33 > 
can tend to prefeirc it in purity and vigdiiij to eii-^ 
^ force its true fpirit, or to promote the genuine opeeXtiort 
df its lalutary influence. — They will venerate it thehi- 
fclres, arid Recommend it by their own example to the 
veneration of odicrs.^— They will inculcate In their chil- 
dren zn early and habitual acquaintance with its biftory^ 
its nature, and its excellencies, together wiA a fteady and 
fational attachment to its principles.-^They wiD Hipport : 
it, at all times, by a firm and rcfohite, though a decent and 
orderly adherence i Itnowing that irregularis and Vioieocti 
Would involve a direi^ violation of its fpirit: and they , 
will, if occafion Hiould require, be ready with cheerfiilnc& .. 
to rifk their lives in its defence; -« 

So (hall the British ConstituViok, the fuitable V 
and happy portion of thofe who deferve to Be free, remain 
firm, immoveable, and untmpwred for fucceedfng ages; ' 
fecitrc againft the attacks Of vifionary theorifts afid of 
wicked incer.diarics j and uniting within itfelf the fecuritj 
and energy of a well-regulated Government, and the Ut^ - 
aiofl attainable degree of real political LIBERTY. ^ - 



THE END. 



■ L)^.l..=.J by Google 



THOMAS PAINE VINDICATED. 

BEING 

A SHORT LETTER 

■ TO THE ■ 

BISHOP OF LANDAFF's REPLY 

THOMAS PAINE's 

' AGE OF REASON. 



God forbid thit A( Search after TiiUh llnuld be difcoutagcd ibr feu of In 
Ccofequenca! The Canftquencei of Trulb may be (ubvtrEve of SyiCems of 
Supentitkiii, but ckey nev-c can be injuiious Co die K>ghtt, or well founded 
IipefUgamof die HumanRace. Si/hof fTtifsii. 

Lcttby toWifdmn, not tbjr PilSoa'fiiny. Sbjir/fien. 



? Y A DEIST. 



lONDOIf: 

PRINTED FOR B. CROSBY, n" 4, STATIONERS ,COORT, 

LUOGATE STREET. 



1796. 

[Price One Shilling.] 

Coot^ic 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



JDrERTISEMENT. 



THE following letter is the fubflance 
of a few marginal notes, made 
with a pencil, while reading the Bifliop o? 
LandafPs Anfwer to Thomas Paine's Age 
of Reafon. — They were fcratched in hafte, 
amidft the frequent interruptions of a young 
iamily and domeilic af^irs. 

Fine language is not affected ; indeed, 
the lefs of it, the better. 

If any one thing is more defirable than 
another, it is an univerfal tongue^ as in- 
capable of fophiftry, and as unerring in 
its deduBioUy as arithmetical calculation ; 
and as clear and decided as algebraical, 
mathematical, or aftronomical^ec^ow. 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



iv ADVERTISEMENT. 

Infiuh a language, the word of God 
would probably have been written, if, bc- 
fides the book of the creation, any book of 
the Deity had been necel&ry. 

If ftuh a language (hould ever be 
brought about, it" will eftabUlh right 
thinking, right aSing, and human good ; 
and do away that bahUing, dclujiye, and 
very.mi/chievous thing called eloqjjence. 



vj by Google 



i 6v begin your Reply 
to Thomas Paine's Age of Reafon, by ftating, 
that you think it not monfijimmihyoxajiationy 
toanfwer it* ' 

I do not know, my Lord, my thii^ about 
your Jation that liftsryou ahove other men ; that 
exempts you from doing what you ought, n 
makes it exculable for you to do lefs. 

B Sterne 

L)^«.=.J by Google 



( ' J 

Sterne obferves, " He that does a dirty 
thing, \&3,dirtyfeUow-" aaid,by the fame rule, 
he that does a ^good thing, is a good fellow^. 
—Pope fays, 

Honour xcA fuaSt from aa etwdit'am rife, 
Aa well j«w/«-/. there all the i»wr liei. 

aad this is enough about ^o^im. 

You proceed—" I have no rekiftance in ac- 
" knowleging, that Mr. Paine poffeffes a con- 
** fiderable fhare of energy of lai^uage, and 
** acutenefs of inveftigation.** 

■ Surely thii is \tTjfusfid artd oflentatious. — 
The king and fliort of the matter is, Thomas 
' Faj^ ^d you, write on the fame fubje^l. You 
meet fairly and equally as men ; nothing more- 
need be faid about it. 

Public infccurity, and private unhappinefs^ 
. arife out of taking fyftems of religion, at go- 
vernment, -up^n trufi i Mid the inveftigation of 
truth, and all prejudice apart, abiding by her 
facred 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



{ 3 ) 
ticitd enquiries afi^-. diTcrimioation-, can alooe 
.lead to ^4ft^^ goii,J,,3,nii to int^ividuffl, comfort, . 

No' religion, . government, or fcicnce, is 
Vfoiti^ foUdituie, th^t will, not bear ^ngfitry. 

TheJ^t and fuch Uk? objervatiofusi b,4ve i<ff 
years appeared to ipe to be undeniabie axioms^ 
and by them I will examine fome remarks in 
your '.' Apology for the Bihip," in anfwer to 
Thomas P^e*? Age of Reafon. 

You fay to him, " I hope there is no want 
" of charity in laying, that it would haye been 
" fortunate, for the Chriftian world, had your 
" life been terminated before you hadful611ed 
" your inteptions of publifliing your thoughts 
*• upon religion."^-Surcly, /i« is paying Tho- 
mas Paine a great compliment, and the Chriftian 
world a v^ry bad one. — You continue, " In 
** accomplifliing your purpofe, you ■ will have 
" unfettled the faith of thoufandst rooted from 
" the minds of the unhappy virtuous, all their 
" comfortable afiurance of a future recom- 
B a " pencei 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



t( ♦ ) 

*• pence J have annibilated in the minds of the? 

" flagitious all their fears of fiiture punifh- 

'* ment ; you will have given the reins of the 

*' domination of every paflion, and have con- 

•< tributcd thereby to the introduftion of the 

" public infecurity and private unh^)pinefs^ 

*• ufually, and aimoft neceflarily, accompany- 

** ing a ftate of corrupt morals." 

All this may be very ^, .hut furely it is not 
very true. It is wntt^n prof effionally andii/hop-' 
like, but it will not bear examination ; there 
are people, and I am one of them, who believe 
juft the reverfe of this ; who believe that 
taking opinions upon irufi^ and being fright- 
ened by religious creeds and impofitions, w- 
tqfions all thefe miferies j and that free enquiry, 
and ftaritig truth in the face, will produce a 
conduct of energy, virtue, and reSittude ; will 
create and eftabliih the happinefs of man> and 
which this very Chriftian religion, as hitherto 
QonduAed, only ferves to deftroy. 

Years 



,.ib,C,ooi^lc 



( 5 ) . 

YeaR ago, when a very young mah, I rea<f 
. your " Apology for Chriftianlty," and it was 
one of the firft books that led me to confider 
the Sacred Writings,- as they are called, in no 
refpeft' above others as to their divine mgtn \ 
and I was perfuaded by your book then, as I am 
by your Anfwer to Thomas Paine now, that ■ 
they never were meant by the Supreme Being, 
to be confidered as his book for man's belief 
ZlHiA guidance. 

It might, it is true, as you fay, " have been 
*' fortunate for the Cbrifiian worlds had Tho- 
<* mas P£une*s fentiments not been publilbed';" 
but pray, is it fortunate for the world ai large 
to have. any Cbrifiian world at ally and hath not 
man's mifery and imbecility grown out of it ?— 
hath not had government, impofition on com- 
mon fenfc, and the plunder of the honeft man's 
property, arifen out of it ? — hath not his di~ 
hajement of mind and his^ovfr/jr been confirm- 
ed, and hJs chains of ftffvery, rivetted, by 
Chrifiianity ; and under it and its various mo~ 
(^C(j/«wu ?-p-Let us aflc this queftion : 

Caiv' 

L);.I..=.J by Google . 



( « ) 

Can fociety be vivFft than U is, aad hath 
been, under this blc0ed difpenfatiOD } Can 
MM live more the enen^ of mat than be does j 
and hath not religion been the watch-woid of 
imp^on and corruption ? Hare not bad ga- 
vermnetitSt ivory rapiru^ and the happinefs of 
ttwrtiy myriads pf miUiotu been facrificed to th« 
wo&THLESS FEW at' its bidding? It is the 
wire that moves the expeniive puppets that diC« 
tribute foveriyt dijhefsy and Jlavery around 
them. 

But to return— Itis fuch bodes asjpw;, my 
Lord, that will lead people to JitfpaSi the Bible 
not to be the word o/Godi not to be a book 
upon -which man's prxfeiu axiA future haf^ejs 
depends.— You, my Lord, have $ prod'^ious 
mafs of jnteUeiil and knowledge j there are 
few men greater in fome parts <^ fcience thui 
yourfclf, few more hj^ly gifted j and yet, at 
a very adva^ed age, after emj^oying a Kfo 
mainfy iadtvit^ji afld its refearches, y»» are 
obliged to write a targe book, to prove the 
validity of the BiblCj &c. why, my Lord, to 
be 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



( 1 ) 

' he what yoQ And the fe^^^Ub waht to dddke 
it appear to be^ it fhould (land in need of Qd 
fuch Jlrength and voluminous matter to fiip- 
portit. Itihouldbe elear, evideittiuuepiivoca/, 
and bear not thtiJhaJozvsi^cUuiit, and tbickdark' 
tiefs about it that it does.' 

You fay, "God made the Ifraelites the exe- 
cutOFSof-his Vengeance." Now, thcivei^eance 
of God* and his creating people to execute 
his «T»th upon, 3a:. and all/wc* (WiJrtfr, is to 
nKwtfow/TAbe^fcj and'ifthe wwdofGod,iX. a 

' caJcUtatcd to i$^o»M/, ;uidinvoIve themind-in 

-m^trf and d^atisfaSif OH. 

You write of the hifloryctfthe world, as if 
you reaifyieiav£dti)e^taic6{the:^t^mait..and 
■zcvAtftt to b& matter 53f^^; thcjail of AJam 
tand Eve to ke:iKttf, An. tifkovay it in tddt and 
■.tbevK^ aO'ttiderthiuizfevpl^u&knd years. 
'Ssuie,my L«d ! -there -we veiy many «(«*'«/ 
ttpptarances that go la prore the-w(tfld injhutely 
-^A/j'aj for as owcalcuJation goes; and it js 
not either improbable or. unphilofopbicat-to 
fuppofc 



X « ) 

fuppofc it hatli «xifted myriads of millions ttt 
»ges. ■ 

y&u afe a great man> but if a great and 
generally -tvyi man, contimui in a profe^m^ and 
fufports one in which there is fo mucb^w^, as 
there is in the ordinances of the Church, and in 
the ctmmon prayer booki fo ftiilch of all that is 
imp^i^t abfurdt contradiHory, and -I had almofl; 
j^d, blafphemous, we have a right to fufped 
cither his weahtefs or defign in the heUef-, and ad- 
mittatue of beoh attached to and the fupport of 
inch prof ^OHi and that ^0/<^o» having much 
emolument, grandeur, •weaUb, if^uence, and ari- 
fiocracy in it. 

You fay fomewhere in your ahfwer to Tho- 
mas Paine — " Priefts are- as impartial as Lay- 
-jnen," now this, I think, is not juft fo, and I 
contend, and I believe moft men will do fowith 
me, that itcxsi. educatim^ habits and interest, 
they are not fo, \as\ti%fe^ views sxApeemiary 
purpofes to anfwer, which the Xayman cannot 
hAV9 t»>on this fubjed^ 

"The 

• U;.t.z=dbi Google 



( 9 ) 

** The objeftors to miracles have, you ob- 
** ferve, febricat^d a kind of deiftical axiom, 
*' that no human teftimony, can eflablifh the 
" credibility of a miracle,"— Whether this be 
fo or not, this 1 conceive, that no teftimony 
taken from a book very jumblin^t contradiSioryf 
nk/ttrj, cntely and obfiene in its matter, will efta- 
Wifli them. 

A great part of your Apology is taken up to 
provcithat the books called the Bible, have beea 
written hy fomehody,. 

Their cxiftence proves thpir having been 
written, and who they were written by mat- 
ters not one farthing j that they are not divine^ 
or the ta^d of God^ more than any other an- 
cient piece of literature, is all the Delfts infift 



' You are too good a man, rtiy Lord, to do as 
Priefts fonnerly would have done, anfwcr Tho- 
mas Paine's book as a damnable bereff, and fend 
the author Pell-mell to the Devil j but theirs 
C wv 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



( 10 ) 

ViA& the fecure^ way to rid the world of fucfe 
matter, to hum the book, and its author itits 
the bargain, and they were right ; for tnveftiga'- 
tioH will bring out the truth, and fliake that fa^ 
bric, which force, perfeaaion, and ignorance is 
better calculated to keep entire, and which the 
coot and boneS attack of reafon and inveJHgation 
mcontrouUd, wUl infallibly dejir^, — The age of 
reafon is dawning, and your book will accele- 
rate iis perfcft light ! 

The old fyftems of Religion and Govern- 
ment mult go, and every defence of them ; and 
every fort of defpotifm to fupport them, will aft 
asunderminers. — Ignorance is paffing away; as 
that goes, the work will be accompliflied.— The 
world, perhaps for the firft time, is fet rtgh/ly 
a thinking, thanks in a great meafure to Tho- 
jnas Paine — a man, whom his l>ej} friends and 
admirers have under-rated, and whofe wifdom 
is exceeded only by his humility and con^ency. 

You fay to Thomas Paine, *' you have done 

" Kiftgs and Priefts all the harm you could, 

" and 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



( t, ) 

" and that without provocation," — how is 
this ? Hath not every man received fufficient 
provecation ixom Kings and Priejls, in having 
himfelf and .family impoverijbed^ and his mind 
debafed, and made miferable bj their impqfitioti 
on his cottmanfenfe, and picking his pocket. 

In page ^o, you obferve, " to me it is pro- 
" bable, that the memory of the creation, the 
" feventb day, was handed down from Adam to 
" all his pofterity." — And do youj my Lord, 
fcrioufly believe, that in fix days God made' 
heaven and earth, and reftcd on the feventh ; 
that Adam and Eve was the firfl; man and wo- 
man ; that the world ia no older j the ftory ot 
the apple, &c, &c. do you literally believe all 
this ? — If you do, you certainly arc a very pro- 
per peifon, to endeavour to prove the Bible, to 
be the word of God. 

.3 

" That the labourer is worthy of his hire," 
you fay, to prove the right of provifion for 
priefts, it may be, that the labourer is worih4 
Q^ hire," but let him not be overpaid, ox pEjd 

L);.i....i by Google 



( I*. ) 

at ally at the expcncc of the poor and indti/lrit. 
ous. I believe we fliould do better without paid~. 
Priefts i but if they muft be had, let their pro- 
vilion he£quat,/atr, and moderate. Eighteen 
THOUSAND A YEAR t acoach and four, or fix j 
falaees, purple, and jSue ItHen, is a hire no man 
is worthy of, or can receive, but through the 
medium of other men's mifiry. But I move, that 
till priefts exhibit more pradical chriftianity, 
more virtue in condudt, and live more like the 
Jefus Chrift they affea to follow, that they re- 
ceive no hire at all. 

There is no two things more unlike than . 
Chrifit and thofc who call themfelves his fot- 
Jowers. 

The Deifts have honefty enough to fay, they 
are not Chriftians ; the-Chriftians prove they 
are not by their conduft, and have not honefty ■ 
enough "to declare it. 

You know nothing of Thomas Paine you 

fay.— I wilh you knew him well, he is a maji 

to 

■■ i);v.nvC,oogIc 



t '3 ) 

to be valued for his gjeat capacioH/nefs of mind, 
his fimplicity, confijlency, and honefty ; » 
quick feoie of the profety and true upon- all oc- 
cafions, is bis peculiar charaderiftlcj but I af- 
feift not to draw at this time the charafter of » 
man, who, infinitely excels all other men I eve? 
knew, or read of, iorjudgmentt (tcutenefsyfciewe^ 
^Hudbte, zr^ fancy ; for he is a j&jif poet. 

Your proving the great antiquity of tythes, 
my .Lord, I am aftonilhed you fliould produce 
tojuftify. them, and to endeavour to vindicate— 
fuch grofs plunder, fuch itnpofition on fociety, 
and dead robbery, is the readieft way to lead us 
to JttfpeSl your defense of the Bible, is not fo de- 
void oi prejudice and weaknefs as it ought to be, 
to have due weight. Indeed, there are people, 
who will not llftcri with much attention to any 
man's defence of the Bible, who can continue 
in the pra£lice Aiid_fupport of iaptyk, thefacra- 
ment, and the church ceremmes in general.— If 
they will fay, he is fo weak or defi^in^ as to 
^bet and -uphold the profeflion of a hifhop, and 
the ordinances of the church of England, it is 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



( 14 ) 

no wonder he believes the- Bible to be th^ 
wordof Gvdy and fots out to fupport its divine- 
authenticity. — It does notfoUowataU, as you 
fu^ft, my Lord, that a man muft be an^ 
"atheiftical madman," who does not believe the 
account of the creation, the fall of Adam, &c. 
a man may be the beft of men, and a true be- 
liever in, and worfhippcr oE, One God, without 
believing one word of , this j and I will hazard 
an opinion, that if it is much written ahouty^ 
and inveji^ated hy hooks and in coitverfatien, 
that it will foon not be literally believed ; and 
that nian will be the happier and better for 
overcoming the force of prejudice about .it. 

In the Soth page, you talk of God's wrath^ 
and juftify his wrath to man. Of this I fay 
nothing, but that I Cannot underftand it, and 
that I do not like it. When Mofes gave the 
order, that the boys and the women of the 
Midianites fliould be put to death, but that 
the young maidens (hould be kept alive for 
(hemfelves j you fay, ** I fee nothing in thl's 
" prcc 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



X 'S ) 
*' proceeding, but good policy, combined witlt 
** MERCY •" ftrangc OTfrry this ! 

You alfo fay, the women children were 
not referved for the purpofes of debauchery, 
but of flavery ; and you are very angry with 
Thomas Paine for fuggefting the ■contrary. 

Now, this is mere aflertion, and I fee nO'- 
■ thing got by it, one way or the other j though 
yoirmayfay very acrimonioufly, "prove this, 
*' and I will allow, that the Bible is what you 
" call it, a book of lies and blafphemy !" 

What fort of women, my Lord, the A£-- 
diamtijh women were, 1 know not, but I be- 
Keye the women of car day would rather be 
Aebauchedthznmz.'A.cila.wtioij and would think 
the allotment lefs mitU 

From. p. io6 to iiij and in many other 

parts of your ** Apology for the Bible," you 

have expiaiwdawi^ its being the word of God 

ia completely yourfelf that they need no reply. 

You 



i .6 ) 
You obferve fomewhere— •• I have conie t6 
*• one conclufioil refpefting reyeakd reli^on^ 
*' you another, both of us cannot be right j 
'** may God forgive him that is in an error." 
If this be true, I do not underftand it. A 
tnan may be morally right, though matbemat'tcalty 
wrong: No man can be morally wrong in what 
he believes, though what he believes may not 
be true — belief is not ah objeit of the will. As 
to God's forgiving the errofj this is really all 
ftufF, it can be of no confequcnce to God, nor 
can he have any occaCon to forgive what is nO 
trror — a man's belief. 

*' Now, what have we to do (you iayj with 
*' the numerical cenlrdJiHions in the Bible, but 
*' to attribute them, whenever they occur, to 
•* this obvious fource of error,— the inattention 
" of the tranjlator, in writing one letter fot 
«* another, that was like it." — Does the wordof 
Goi/then, wbich ought to comej^fd/Z/wMJar//, 
unequivocally t and carry conviSmt depend on 
tranftaiors or the idiom c£ languages i on the 
temper of deigning men, who have given it 
any 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



T 17 ) 

any drefs they like ; on jumoi, who exclude 
what they pieafe (the Apocrypha, &c. for in- 
ftancej and adnjit what fuits them f Is it to 
depend on tranjktors and iranjkttiotis, and be 
fo confined as not to r&ach '^ mtlUonth part of 
mankind ? 

To me this is very fatisfaftory indeed, for 
it certainly makes again'ft the pofition you wifll 
to eftablilh j indeed, your book, my Lord, ^ 
all throughj is calculated to j^ovoke a dif- 
(uffiott that wiU/crMflTii as much the principles 
of deifm, as fome late monarchical books have 
done thbfc of ripuMkaai^. The vulgar adage 
may be applied to the fupporters of old re- 
ligious creeds, as well as the pUtical ones— 
" The more they Jir the more tkey _^ink." 

You have converfed, you tell us, with, many 
t)eifi;s, and if you live long, my Lord, I pre 
dift, that you will converfe with many more 
and I.truft, find them very good chara<ftersi 
and calculated to render focicty hQilourable 
find happy. . 

., . I> Proof; 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



( >8 ; 

Proof, proof, you exclaim, is what wc tf-T 
quire, and not aflertion ; fo much the better ;: 
and it is proof, proof, tliat the advocates of 
Deifm want, or rather do not want, for the 
moft of it fcems to be on their fide ; they have 
not fo many' ^rwd/tf views to anfwer, as Priefis 
have, and the ftiU utiperfecuting voice of phi'Ufo- 
ffy and &uih, feems to be on their fide ahnofl 
univcrfally. 

You complaiff nruch of (he fcutrillty of 
Thomas Paine.— No author h>d ever fo littld 
perfonal abufe in him, and amidft the fevereft 
conduA from Govertmem, bodies of men, and 
individuals^ he hath pcrievered , in cmfiftencft 
truth, and phihfopkf. 

Under the fpecious appearance of candour, 
you are not always candid, and occafipnally 
evince much littlenefs and illibeiality, which is 
meant to be the more cutting, from the affgSa* 
tion of charity and temper that it bears. Boling- 
broke and Voltaire, you fay", muft yield tfie 
pahn of fcurrility to Thonus Paine.— Thef 
were 

U;.t.z=dbv Google 



( •» ) 

wer-e.Tcry great men, my Lord j whetlisr tlief 
muft yield the palm of fcurrility to him, or 
whether there is any fcurrility in the matter, I 
cannot tell, but this will be pretty generally 
acknowledged, they muft .yield the j»lm of 
cgtwiilim to him ; and that he will take the 
lead \n ^cjff infinitely of both thefe, and wri- 
ters on your fide the queftion; 

•* Permit me (you fay to Thomas Paine) to 
*' ftate to you, what would in my opinion, 
^* have been a better mode of proceeding ; 
" better fuited to the character of an honeft 
*' man, fincere in his endeavours to fearch out 
" tnitb. — Such a man id reading the Bible, 
^^ would, ii} the fifft place, lEzamine whether 
'' the Bible, attributed to the Supreme Being, 
" any attributes repugnatu to fobriety, truth, 
** and Jajice j y/hether it reprefented him m 
" fubjedk to hum^n infirmitips, &c."— Now I 
do not know ths^t fatqili/y may be applied, as 
tbaraSleriflic of the firft part of this par^raph, 
^ut it ftrikes me as very vmharttahUt itti^al, 
#Qd uniecoming. 

D * I have 



Dgiw^db; Google 



( « ) 

I have before feid what I know Thomaa 
If 

Paine to be, and I wlfli every man was as bo-* 

Iteji and fmcere in his endeavours *' to fearch 

Out tru.th," and as incorrupt in his inter cottrfes^ 

we Ihould then, mv Lord, have very foon very 

little error in tli^ world in either theory op 

practice. As to the htterpart of thisfentence,, 

you are calling upon Thomas Paine to do, what 

he hath vcrv conviivlh^ly done, and what every 

trnpreju'-iijed rca.!.,- of the Bible mujt (Jft— dif-. 

cover that It attrib-ixsto the Supreme Being, 

attributes repugnant to fobriety, truth, and 

juftice. 

In page 207, 209, you have ajfw paflage, 
in reply to Thomas Paine's faying, — *' I have 
" gone through the Bible, as a man would 
" go through a wood, with an axe on his 
" (houlder, and fell trees ; here they lie, and 
" the Priefls, if they can, may replant them ; 
" they may perhaps flick them in the ground, 
" but they wjll never grow.*'— ^Here,my Lord, 
you fly off to nie very unintelligibly. — " You 
" have loft your way on the mountains of Le- 
*' banon, 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



'( i^ ) 
♦• banon, tlie goodly cedar trees whereof la-i 
" meriting the madnefs, and pitying the 
•* blindijefs of your rage againft them, have 
** fcorncd the blunt edge, and the bafe tem- 
** per ,of your axe, and laughed unhurt, at the 

" feeblenefs of your ftrokc." Hey Presto f , 

here's your works ! — this is very, very fublime, 
very liberal, and very convincing ;' fomewhat af- 
ter Burke's manner ! — O rare goodly trees of 
Ijcbanon ! Thomas Paine's bafe, blunt edged 
a«^, fliall not injure you ! 

Amongft other complai^iings againft Tho- ^ 
mas Paine, .you (ay, " he has perplexed the 
" minds of honeft men, who wifh toworfhip 
** the God of their fathers in fincetity and 
** truth;" this is aflertion, and I believe 
falfe aflertion ; for I think the writings of 
Thomas Paine, and all/a/r, not to fay unfair *- 
difcuffion, is the way to unpefflex the rnind, 
and the day of wip^^yfeivw^ people's minds feem« 
to Ije at hand, both in religion and polities j 
fo (hall more of that fincerityand truth you 
^ude to, be, and increafe in the world ; to 

find 3 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



■ ( « 1 

find It now it digiatltt notwithftandii^ we av 
fiich a believingy prefeffingt rtligiota^ v^fU^ 
governed Cbttreh and State pcf^Ie. 

In alludii^ to the miraculous conceptioa, 
wMch Thomas Paine efteems a &bk, and it 
certainly, founds more like a fable than any 
thing elfe, you quote the angel's declarati<m to 
Mary, as matter to prove the incamaHonr— 
** The Holy Ghoft (hall come apon thee, and 
" the power of the higheft (hall overfhadotr 
*' thee, therefore that holy thing which (halj 
" be bom of thee, fhall be called the Son of 
** God." 

To believe this, we mull believe the con- 
Tcrfat ion of angels with men literally ; but of 
this angel to Mary what of it ? — the paflage 
implies not to me, even then that Mary's 
child, Jcfus Chrift, was begotten but by Jo- 
feph, and this is fo natural withal ;— the other 
is fo unnatural, obfcene, not to fay blaf^emovs, 
and fo very equivocally expreffed, that I con- 
fcfc it carries nd) eonviftion to me, and it fecms 
alto. 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



.( *3 J 
■adtogerher more likely to have grown out df 1 
the heathen ftory of Jupiter's intrigues oa 
*arth, &c. aad talcs- of that ibrt.— See Firfl: 
Part of the Age of Reafon. 

; From p. XZ4, through fcveral page»on, you 
admit, my Lord, fo much of the loofenefSi and 
itUKOtracy of the Teftament detail, that it goes 
very far to do away the notion of its being the 
word of God, which Ihould be more dear^ dif- 
-■ tinSt !ind ^cf^ contradiSory, to advantage your 
aigument. 

After this comes a long tracing'of genealogy j 
this m^y be worth your and Thomas Paine's 
inveftigation, but I have always /^// that it is 
not worth mine, aftd I am totally indifferent 
about it. 

Thomas Paine fays, '* who would now be- 
•' lieve a girl', who (hould fay ftie was gotten 
'• with child by a ghoft " This queftion you 
call abominably indecent and profane. Now, 
I cannot fee it either the one or the other ; and 
it may be fairly anfrtered ; ho perfon would 
believe 

U;.l....lb,.C,OOljlc 



i M ) 

"believe it, nor is it any way ■ejfenttal to cm hdp* 
pinefg, that we (hould believe ibe imarnation.— 
Believers who fwallow fuch notioi;s as thefe> 
are, I dare affert, believers upon/nj/?, and ex- 
amine ftot i and have been frightened for cor- 
rupt ptirpofes, to pro/e/s creeds, which -to bo 
happy, fociety mull do away, andnot «/>fte/rfj 

It is well faid by .Dr. Young, 

*' Truth never wa» indebted to a lie." 

*' Thomas Paine, you obferve, will neTcr 
*' perfuade the world that the Holy Spirit of 
'* God, has any refemblance to the ftage 
*' ghoftsofHamkt or Macbeth; from which 
•* you feem to have derived your idea of it." 
Where Thomas Paine got his idea of ghofts 
I never heard him fay, but fuch ghofts as youj 
my Lord, allude to , above, are, I fancy, iri 
moft peoples belief, the litelieft to gei chit 
dren. 

I alk no excufe for thus treating the fub- 
jc& i — let every plan have the.^erty of .treat- 
ing 

Dgiw^dbv Google ■ 



( »5 ) 

ing a fubjeft, as heplcafcs. I have do reafoa 
to be grave about it j no intereft in its being 
believed or not ; let thofe who have, hcfolemn, 
feritms; overbearing and angry. 

The allufions you make about the authen- 
ticity of events, do not feem to me to be 
,at all happy.— The events 'you advert to, 
were mere human events ; they involve no be- 
lief of the incarnation^ and fuch incomprehenJibU 
matter, and therefore are not in point. 

You fay to Thomas Paine,—" You cer- 
" tainly have read the New Teftament, but 
" not, I think, with great attention." — I be- 
lieve you are right, my Lord, that he never 
fiudied that book ; and I think it is very well 
for his opponents he has not; for, if he had, 
judging from what fome attention to it hath 
done, he would have bothered you ftill more, 
and as it is, he hath made objeBions to Chrifti- 
anity, and word of God believers, that are not 
removed that ^ lee. 

E I do 

L);.I..=.J by Google 



( 46 ) 

I do not know what illuftrious chara^rt« 
Thomas Paine calls liars, fools, andknav«S} 
bot this I do know, mankind have had their 
nnderftandings fhockingly tmpofed on, and their 
pockets drained, by charafters in high/;iw/w«J • 
and ftations, and thAtfurreptitious and falfe con- 
Jequencsy hath m^ferably debafed and enervated 
thdr minds, and villainoufly plundered them. 

In the whole courfe of your Apology, you 
manifeft great forenefs at the way in which 
Thomas Paine mentions the priefts. Now, 
this I wonder at, not pnly becaufe it looks 
like being hurt, but becaufe the obfervatlons 
on this head are generally /ii;V, and fuch ob- 
fervations are generally allowed to be fo. It is 
only doing what priefts themfelves have always 
done of one another j their lives have been made 
Up of dtferentes and revUings — d^erenees even 
about this very book, the Bible and Teftameftt; 
for religionifo differ fo greatly about it, and 
each of them obje<fting to the admittance Of 
certain parts they have at one- time or another 
themfelves upfet and denied the validity and 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



! »7 ) 

Jivine authenticity of the book. There can 
be no doubt but that priefts of all ages, and 
all fefts, liave flood in the way of man's hap-, 
pinefs : robbed him and made htm miferable. 

Speaking of the Sacred Writers, as they are 
called, you fay, " had they been Impoftors, 
** they would have written with more caution, 
" and have obviated every cavil, and avoided 
*' every appearance of contradiction ; this 
** they have not done, and this I ^onfider &3 a 
** proof of their bettffiy and veracity" This is 
rcafoning indeed, but it is greatly againft your- 
felf J and I will engage, that the majority of 
readers do not think with you, that this ts 
matter of proof in your favotir, more than 
many other of your, following pages. Yon 
fey, " there is nothing in Deifm but what is in 
" Chriftianity; but there is much in.Chrifti- 
*• anity which is not in Deifm;" there is, in*- 
deed, much of what Deifm hath mt—coniroMc- 
tioH, nr^ery^ and uHinteiligibiUly, 

E z -It 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



(.18) 
It is by no means true, that the doubts of a 
Dciil, of a future ftate, are greater than thofe 
of the Chriftian. The faft is, Chriftians, as 
the)- are called, take things on truft^ and adopt, 
as a fajhion or habit, what they have never eX' 
amined\ — ' '' thctn fet about examitntig — this 
wtli make them really, tmfy, and at heart, of 
fome belief i this will give thtm fxl principles, 
and I have no doubt, mend their conduA, ««- 
cpeafe their energies and virtues, and do away 
much vice, which forms, and religious cneds^ 
have made them fet down quietly under. 

Indeed, indeed, my Lord, Chriftians muft 
exhibit infinitely more reElitude of manners, 
and ^eatnefs of mind; before they will make 

. their profeflion refpeBed, or the truth of their 
fyftem believed. They muft, my Lord, have 
much lefs of the pomps and vanities of the 
world ; much lefs luft of wealth, and the other 

. finfiil purfuits of the flefh, before their holy 
religion will be held facred, or efcape fufpicion 
of validity. 

" The 

D;.t.z=d by Google 



( '9 ) 

*' The Chriftian admits, you obferve, the 
** Providence of God, and the liberty of 
*' human aiflions ; the Deift is involved in 
f' great difficulties, when he undertakes the 
*• proof of either." You are right in fay- 
ing the Chriftian admits ; the people called 
Chriftians, do indeed admit a- wonderful deal, 
and a wonderful deal more than they believe, or 
have ever troubled their heads to refieSi on ov 
inveftigate ; but when they enquire, inftead of 
admitting, they are involved in the fame diffi- 
culties as the Deift. — The cafe is, the Provi- 
dence of a God, and the liberty of human 
actions, may be as readily denied, or admitted,. 
by the Deift, as the Chriftian ; but has man's 
happinefs any thing to do with it, and is it not 
like other metaphyfical points, mere matter of 
Jpecvlation, and may it not be admitted by 
fame, and denied by others, without any in- 
fringement of the comforts of fociety. It is 
not fpeculation, but adopting fpeculations 
into impofing creeds, and making matter of mo- 
ney, or influence of them, that does the mif- 
Chief. 

Thomas 

Dgiw^d by" Google 



( 30 ) 
Thomas Paiae aflerts, there was no fuch 
book as the New Teft^ment, till more than 
three hundred years after the time that Chrill 
is faid to have lived j this you affeft to dif 
prove, but by no means do it, and after col- 
lefting all your ftrength and authorities, only 
leave a matter douhtful^ vagugy and unexplained^ 
that ought to fubftantiate your opinions, to 
be as clear as light, and the quoting Justin 
Martyr, or any other authority, is weaken- 
ing the fabric you want to eredt ; for the doc- 
trines you want to prove, ought to ftandj^//, 
clear, and unequivocal, and he felt and acknow- 
leged, without having all this uncertain mat- 
ter to make them be underftood. . According 
to your account, Faustus's authenticity, &c. 
.ought not to be received — why then Mar- 
tyr's, &c. &c. 

When Thomas Paine objefts to the evi- 
dence of Paul in the cafe of his being ftruck 
to the ground, when journeying to Damafcus, 
and his hearing a voice iffuing from the lighten- 
ing, fpeaking to him in the vulgar tongue, 
you 

Dgiw^dbv Google 



( 3- ) 
you tell him to read Lord Littleton's Obferva- 
tibns on the Converfion of St. Paul. — Surely 
this, my Lord,, is childilh, and unargumentative. 
The opinions of Lord Littleton on this fubjeft, 
muft, to be fure, have great weight.— If a 
l.erd cafiKot prove a Saint to be right-, we arc 
badly off certainly ! 

As to your obfervations about holy incn, 
and holy things, and Thomas Paine's abufe 
of them, the fa<5t is, you do not think the 
fame men and things, holy ; and in point of 
acrimony, the Bifhop of Landaff is not behind 
Thomas Paine' ; the latter, I think, abundantly 
fiiUer of proof all through his book, and I do 
not believe with you, if you do believe if, 
that the holy men, and holy things you allude 
to, will be remembered, when Thomas Paine 
■and his arguments are forgotten. If this 
fhould happen, fo be it j to fearch, invefti- 
gatc, and have opinions, can alone fecure man's 
happinels ; and his being wife and good, can 
only arife out of the deftru-ftion of all civil and 
religious impofitions and opprejjions. 

« Thft 

Dgiw^dbvGOOgtC 



( 3* ) 
" The Bible, you exultingly exclaim, has 
•• withftood the learniiig of Porphyry, and the 
" po c of Julian, to fay nothing of the 
" manichean Fauflus ; — it has rcfifted the 
" genius of Bolingbroke, and the wit of Vol- 
'" taire;" and fo you infer it is to ftand for 
ever. The old French government flouriflied 
many ages, and withftood the attacks, and 
triumphed over the aflaults of the wi/e/i and 
bej, but it went at hfi. 

But it is notjuft as you ftateit, for the Bible 
hath not withfiood the attacks of its contro- 
verfies and objedors, but it hath confiderably 
and greatly.i;^ its value in the minds of many j 
and a blind confidence in it,, and tbofe who have 
created it, into creeds sjA jyfiems of impqfitioKs, 
hath abated In many, many thoufands, and an 
improper refpeft for it and them, is daily wea-' 
ing away, and that amongft thofe, whom the 
ftale malignant obfervation of priefts cannot 
be brought againft,— that men of bad morals 
and manners are alone its enemies. 

You 



( 33 ) 
You fay, " No, Sir ; no, this miferable fluff; 
" this blafphemous perverfion of Scripture } 
*' that the Almighty committed debauchery 
" with a woman, is not the doftrine of the 
•* New Teftament ;" — how is this ? if not, 
furely your dodrine of the incarnation goes to 
the ground. If Chrift was not the Son of 
God, whole fon was he ? Your obfervation, 
here, feems to me to be quibbling^ as well as 
abulive. If you do not mean to prove Chrtft 
the Son of God, what do you mean io prove f 
If the Son of God, how begotten ? 

A little after this, you tell what the Scrip- 
ture teaches — *' to them that have done evil, 
** the refurreiftion unto damnation" — this is 
a bard word, and very unlike the word of 
God 1 think. Your alludingafter this to the 
excellent moral fentiments of the New Tefta- 
ment, hath nothing to do with it : their m«/- 
knce is not denied ; the didaftic part of the 
NewTeftament is heldinas much ■reQ)eft, and 
as much valued, by Deists as by Christians ; and 
it makes no part of their interest to believe 
F any 



C 34 ) 
4ny farther, or to induce others to do fo. 
Prieils, I again fay, have an interest in doin^ 
fo, or I am wrong informed of the Church 
revenue (the estahlijhed Church only) of this 
country, which I conclude is about twenty -five 
hundred thoufand pounds more, yearly, than 
the whole expence of the government of 
America. 

As to your rant,- my Lord, about j^»n«« 
philofophy, democratic fociety, and equaliza- 
tion of property, it is altogether beneath you, 
or any man of common fenfe, and common honesty ; 
equalization of property hath nothing to do with 
Thomas Paine, or h\s principles { and this part 
of your Aplogy for the Bible deferves no anfwer. 
We underlland this, and all about It, and fo, 
and where it comes from ; fo good bye to It -, 
it makes to be furc, a part of the Bible story. . 

The fag end of this paragraph contains a 

■ great truth. This is the wife obfcrvation ; 

" No man has a right to do wrong." No» 

my Lord ! nor any fet of men, how high foever 

in title, power t or rankp civil or religious. 

The 



( 35 ) 
The phil&fphic pages that follow,are fublime 
and affetSing — they are fcntiments common to, 
and belonging to all men, and are more likely 
to acquire force, beauty, and energy, under a 
fyftem of Deifniy than that of Christianity. 

The hiftorically afcertaining events, and 
thus ftep by ftep certifying them, does not 
prove revelation : — it proves a regular fucceflion " 
of account, but that does not validate t\it first 
rumour i for there may be as regular a detail of 
a lie, as of a truth. Your reply, my Lord, moft 
likely is : butwhyfuppofe the circumftance itfe// 
falfc i — I anfwer, Becaufe it doth not accord 
with what hath generally been j is inconjiftent 
with the regular laws of nature, the dimity 
and beauty oi its author's univerfal works and 
■ proceedings, and calculated too generally to 
infpoje on the underftandings, and pek the 
pockets of fociety. 

You telling Thomas Paine, my Lord ! that 
Sir Ifaac Newton was a Girillian, is tacitly fay- 
ing, and you ought tq be fo, becauje he was. 

Suppofe- 



( sO 

Suppofira biihop in Sirlfaac Newton's day, 
had told him, he had no right to think differ- 
ently from Copernicus^ as a natural philofophcr ; 
would this have been moft reajonahk or ahftad ? 

The Chriftian religion itfelf was once an 
innovation, and is now rejeifted by above three- 
fourths of manfcind, who hold other religious 
opinions. 

At the concliifion of your book you fey. 
You will not reply to any anlwer to it ; whether 
this arifes from confcious vulncrabdity, or felf- 
fufficiency, I know not j but this I know, it 
neither recommends yourfclf. or ftrengthcDs 
your caufe. 

Sincerely wjfhing, that you may become a 
partaker of that faith in Deifm, which is the 
foundation of my happinefs in this world, and 
of all my hopes in another, I bid you fere- 
well! 

A DEIST" 



L);.I..=.J by Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



Dgiw^dbv Google 



^Coo'^lf 



